12.5, the whole of the newer Palaeozoic formations. In many regions the
a bay English race-horse. This foal, when a week old, was marked on its
aberration, could have been formed by natural selection, seems, I freely
a better chance of the occurrence of profitable variations. Unless such
abnormal structure in the class of mammals; but the rule would not apply
aboriginal species; but by crossing we can only get forms in some degree
abounding in individuals, even on the extreme verge of their range. For
about forty yards back, to a very thick clump of heath, whence I saw the
above-described appearances are all due to ancient crosses with the dun
above given accords with their natural arrangement in group under group;
above-named three approximate faunas of Eastern and Western America and
above two principles the fore-limbs will not have been much modified in
abraded and how seldom they are rolled about! Moreover, if we follow for
absent in it, but which occur above and below: so in space, it certainly
absolute perfection, nor do we always meet, as far as we can judge, with
accidental. The same number of joints in the tarsi is a character common
According to these views, it is obvious that the several species of the
according to the view lately advocated by Dr. Gunther, they are probably
accord with the belief of vast intervals of time having elapsed between
accounted for by inheritance from either parent or from some more remote
account for the above resemblances, independently of natural selection,
accumulated. And if, in every separate territory, hardly any idea can be
accumulated, by the incessant coast-action, as we now see on the shores
accumulated through natural selection, other modifications, often of the
accumulate, in the same manner as man accumulates in any given direction
accumulating to any extent slight modifications of instinct which are in
accumulating within the same area during the whole of this period. It is
accumulation. When we see, as is so often the case, a formation composed
accumulation; yet no one ignorant of this fact would have even suspected
a certain number of plants of any species. Insects in seeking the nectar
a comparatively short time would be necessary to produce many divergent
a complete change; their eyes disappear; their legs and antennae become
a considerable degree of fertility. These facts show how completely the
A corollary of the highest importance may be deduced from the foregoing
acquired, as I shall show, by the preservation of successive profitable
acquired, if carried out to a much less extent even than in our British
acquired through natural selection, we need not marvel at some instincts
acquire slightly longer necks? In every district some one kind of animal
A critic has lately insisted, with some parade of mathematical accuracy,
acted, on one or both parents before the act of generation. It deserves
action. But as we have no facts to guide us, speculation on the subject
action for the sole good of another, with which I am acquainted, is that
action of the severe climate? For it would appear that climate has some
active, as in the nuptial plumage of many birds, and in the hooked jaws
actively at work--in that district and among these species, we now find,
acutest observer, by examining its dead body, would never have suspected
adaptations, it repeats a phase in the development of its progenitors."
adaptation to widely different climates, does not always prevent the two
adapted to any country which they inhabited. In treatises on many kinds
adaptive characters, and yet use these same characters within the limits
added another and lower stage, abounding with new and peculiar species,
add that the good effects of intercrossing, and the ill effects of close
A distinguished zoologist, Mr. St. George Mivart, has recently collected
adjoining cells; and the following view may, perhaps, be considered only
adjoining spheres; but, as far as I have seen, they never gnaw away and
admirable work, but which would certainly be ranked as distinct species
admission of great and abrupt modifications. Under a scientific point of
admit. It can act only when there are places in the natural polity of a
admitted as true, for the domestic races of many animals and plants have
admitted by Owen in his most interesting work on the "Nature of Limbs."
admitted to be inheritable. Perhaps the correct way of viewing the whole
adult. If, for instance, the digit of an adult animal was used less and
advanced and be still advancing throughout the world, yet the scale will
advanced for the same purpose in an able article lately published in the
advanced through natural selection and competition to a higher stage of
advantage in certain individuals, at any age or during any season, over
advantage of, and still further modified, for the good of species under
advantage over the intermediate variety, which exists in smaller numbers
aerial mammals or bats. We can see why, in islands, there should be some
a few colonists, and their descendants, though modified, would still be
affected by the same movements. When two formations have been deposited
affected by various circumstances, that for all practical purposes it is
affecting any important character, but from occurring in several species
affects plants and animals; or that the poison secreted by the gall-fly
affinities. Nothing can be easier than to define a number of characters
affinities of the various elements?--and yet an acid cannot strictly be
affinity. Although many distinct genera within the same family have been
affinity of most of these birds to American species is manifest in every
affords a simple explanation of these facts. We have evidence of almost
a first-rate heartsease or dahlia from the seed of a wild plant. No one
a former chapter, by which the materials forming any part, if not useful
Africa and to the mountains of the Cape Verde archipelago, is one of the
after long intervals, due to the occurrence of physical changes of some
After ten thousand generations, species (A) is supposed to have produced
After this interval, I felt sure that the aphides would want to excrete.
after very long intervals of time, and after great geographical changes,
again it has been shown that generally the embryos of the most distinct
Again, no one will say that rudimentary or atrophied organs are of high
against what would be effected by occasional means of transport, during
again there is no close relation to the size of the genera. The cause of
agencies; and that these same unperceived agencies are amply sufficient
ages, or to those which have changed after having migrated into distant
a great advantage to a twining plant to become a leaf-climber; and it is
a great advantage to the plant to have a shorter or more deeply divided
a great and sudden leap, but must advance by the short and sure, though
a handful of feathers, and all fall to the ground according to definite
a herd of deer, and driving them to a distant point, we should assuredly
aided it in seizing or tearing its food. If so, it will hardly be denied
air. For these species, from belonging to distinct families, would have
air, now connect the Galeopithecus with the other Insectivora, yet there
a knife which has to cut all sorts of things may be of almost any shape;
a large amount of migration due to climatal and other changes; and when
albinism, prickly skin, hairy bodies, etc., appearing in several members
a legitimate manner, may be strictly compared with that of hybrids when
a length of time, we may infer that the result would be almost uniform;
alike in nature. An animal may possess various parts in a perfect state,
all ages are affected, the forms are ranked by all entomologists as good
all animals and plants. Even if these take place only at long intervals
all animals--that is, if they vary--for otherwise natural selection can
All fall into a few grand classes; and this fact is at once explained on
all functionally important characters will have been determined through
allied natural species--for instance, of the many foxes--inhabiting the
allied or representative species in two areas, however distant from each
allied species, with slightly different grades of difference, have been
allied sub-breeds. And when a cross has been made, the closest selection
allied to each other, are crossed with a third species, the hybrids are
allied to our starlings, have parasitic habits like those of the cuckoo;
allied to that which so frequently affects pure species, when exposed to
allied. With these exceptions (and with that of the perfect fertility of
all inferior animals, but protects during each varying season, as far as
all less like the imitated object, they would be eliminated. There would
all my faith in natural selection, I should never have anticipated that
all of small size with widely different jaws; or lastly, and this is the
allowances as before for our ignorance, and remember that some forms of
allowed for the varieties in each to become well modified and perfected.
allow for the entire extinction of some preceding forms, and in any one
allow the accumulation of a considerable amount of divergent variation.
all relations, and as the two countries will have received colonists at
All the foregoing rules and aids and difficulties in classification may
all the inhabitants of the same country being already so well adapted to
all the requirements of natural selection, though it may cause the death
all the species of the same genus having descended from a common parent,
all to be classed under the same genus; and thus the descendants of two
almost any extent in form and size, and yet remain connected together in
almost equally simple, though very different plan occurs in many plants
almost implied by reproduction; Variability from the indirect and direct
almost indispensable, and it may often have happened that the requisite
almost invariably rare insects; the mocked in almost every case abounds
almost like a creeper; it sometimes, like a shrike, kills small birds by
almost necessary for the accumulation of deposits rich in fossil species
almost nightly catching woodcocks or snipes. The tendency to catch rats
almost simultaneously throughout the world, and therefore under the most
almost universally implied, though it can rarely be proved. We have also
alone are furnished with a pappus; and in Hyoseris the same head yields
a long course of time, than with the belief in the former connection of
a long succession of ages to adapt an organism to some new and peculiar
along this line the vertical displacement of the strata varies from 600
already recorded species. Our classifications will come to be, as far as
also be adduced of occasional and strange habits in wild animals, which,
also, bear in mind the occurrence in both hemispheres of former Glacial
Although natural selection can act only through and for the good of each
Although no graduated links of structure, fitted for gliding through the
Although the belief that an organ so perfect as the eye could have been
Although we have no good evidence of the existence in organic beings of
Altogether at least a score of pigeons might be chosen, which, if shown
America, and by Alph. de Candolle in regard to Australia, that many more
America; and some of these fossils may have been the actual progenitors
America in the same region with numerous monkeys, and probably interfere
American cuckoo, and that she occasionally laid an egg in another bird's
American cuckoo laying full-sized eggs. Thirdly, that the young cuckoo,
America to the western shores of Ireland and England; but seeds could be
Among insects there are innumerable instances; thus Linnaeus, misled by
amount of difference than that between the local forms and sub-species,
amount of possible variation is a strictly limited quantity, is likewise
amount of subsidence. But this same movement of subsidence will tend to
amputated, imperfect nails have been known to appear on the stumps, and
A multitude of cases could be given of very closely allied species which
a multitude of smaller groups will become utterly extinct, and leave no
an African monkey (Cercopithecus) clinging to the under surface of their
analogical or adaptive characters, although of the utmost importance to
analogous steps, after ten thousand generations, either two well-marked
analogous variation, in the enlarged stems, or as commonly called roots,
analogous variations is afforded by parts or organs which are generally
analogous views on the origin of species are generally admitted, we can
an animal, whether it would vary in succeeding generations, and whether
An argument of great weight, and applicable in several other cases, is,
ancient form. The curious case of Sitaris--a beetle which passes through
and 1845, on this "law of the succession of types,"--on "this wonderful
and a copious supply of oil-bearing seeds. When the seeds in our fruits
and ancient animals resemble to a certain extent the embryos of the more
and animals. Under this point of view, the productions of Great Britain
and are carried so erect that in good birds the head and tail touch: the
and are thus constantly destroying life; or we forget how largely these
and at present I am quite unable to say to what class they belong. They
and a vast majority of plants are hermaphrodites. What reason, it may be
and before it had become fully stocked with inhabitants. On almost bare
and better fur the further north they live; but who can tell how much of
and be used for a distinct one: in certain fishes the swim-bladder seems
and consequently is often assumed to be of high vital importance to the
and degraded flowers; in the latter, as A. de Jussieu has remarked, "The
and denied that the American cuckoo occasionally lays her eggs in other
and dominant groups within each class, which will ultimately prevail and
and equal periods of time, may, perhaps, be nearly the same; but as the
and even stretching into Spain. The now temperate regions of the United
and exceptionally resemble closely either pure parent. Nor do I pretend
and fertile females, and yet, from being sterile, they cannot propagate
and fertility of all organic beings; and secondly, that the crossing of
and for sifting the water; then into lamellae like those of the domestic
and fourteen hours. Fresh-water fish, I find, eat seeds of many land and
and greater numbers, through the survival of the parents which generated
and here comes in a sort of struggle between the parasite and its prey.
and how much to the definite action of the conditions of life. Thus, it
and I found that numbers of the extremely minute and just-hatched shells
and illustrated by examples, between the forms which are most like each
and I must trust to the reader reposing some confidence in my accuracy.
and in a lesser degree in some analogous cases, is that each new species
and in general activity. And these conditions have, it is probable, been
and in such cases there will have been ample time for great geographical
and in the flattened and fringed legs of the water-beetle, the relation
and in the peninsula of India. For at these distant points, the organic
and in this case all the individuals of the species would be modified in
and in this sense higher; not but that it may leave many creatures with
and is destitute of mouth, stomach, and every other organ of importance,
and large a degree of difference as that between the species of the same
and less Arctic." Besides these identical and closely allied forms, many
and likewise making separate and very irregular rounded cells of wax. At
and likewise of acknowledged varieties), exist in the intermediate zones
and little trees, which had been perpetually browsed down by the cattle.
and mountains, of the forests, marshes, and deserts, are linked together
and myself, and has illustrated them with admirable art and force. When
and not by miraculous acts of creation; and as the most important of all
and not common to others, they use it as one of high value; if common to
and not merely adaptive, they must be due in accordance with our view to
And now one of the richest known accumulations of fossil mammals belongs
and of flying when made to take flight, would be mistaken by any one for
and of mongrels, and the sterility of hybrids; but plants not propagated
and of stronger ones in the other, the differences would become greater,
and of the surrounding conditions, as well as through the intercrossing
and of varieties when crossed may be compared in several other respects.
and, on the other hand, that the fertility of pure species is so easily
and other marks; and when any breed assumes by simple variation a bluish
and other objects likely to carry seeds have been largely imported into
and owing to the imperfection of the geological record, we have no just
and power of the nuthatch. In this case a gradual change of structure is
and qualities of their cattle. Slow and insensible changes of this kind
and sessile, though differing widely in external appearance, have larvae
and some others, congregate, and successive males display with the most
and subsistence under past and present conditions permitted, is the most
and supplanted form. Even on a wide area, which has during a long period
and tertiary stages, would still be manifest, and the several formations
and the dotted lines diverging from them the species in each genus. The
and the fertile females in structure, as in the shape of the thorax, and
and the gracefully sculptured ammonites of the Secondary period, created
and their not being blended together by innumerable transitional links,
and then to species. The passage from one stage of difference to another
and the periods during which species have undergone modification, though
and the relative proportional numbers of the various inhabitants of the
and these had not been, at least at first, confined to some one region!
and the United States during these intervals existed as dry land, or as
and they will consequently be related to each other by circuitous lines
And this continuity of the circumpolar land, with the consequent freedom
and this is a great convenience to the fancier, for thus many races may
and those of the smaller genera on the other side, and it has invariably
And thus, the forms of life throughout the universe become divided into
and thus the septenary, quinary, quaternary and ternary classifications
And thus, the strange fact of an increase of fertility in the successive
and to exert its full powers of action, the principle of inheritance at
and to make its nest exclusively of inspissated saliva? And so in other
and tongue, has its whole frame beautifully adapted for browsing on the
and to the conditions of life and of one organic being to another being,
and two seeds of beet grew after having been thus retained for two days
and under a condensed and simplified form up to the fourteen-thousandth
and varieties of flowers, take the place of older and inferior kinds. In
and varieties which are acknowledged to have been produced by secondary
and well-established facts at once annihilate the theory. In the simpler
and were kept in a chamber in his house. That these processes are often
and where our oscillating continents now stand they have stood since the
and which are least broken up, that is, which have as yet suffered least
and which rarely produce any offspring, are generally very sterile; but
and which varieties. Mr. Walsh ranks the forms which it may be supposed
and while kept in a considerable body, so that free intercrossing might
and widely ranging species which vary most frequently and vary most, and
and with its wings furnished with two free claws, has been discovered in
and yet the viscid mud was all contained in a breakfast cup! Considering
and yet they may in one sense be rudimentary, for they are useless: thus
a new glacial period slowly to come on, and then pass away, as formerly
an hermaphrodite species, having of course a well-developed pistil, the
animal; and here we have parts commonly called homologous which bear no
animal, but would retain nearly its original standard of development in
animals, but is highly organised for its class; it existed in countless
animals from several wild stocks: the blood, for instance, of a tropical
animals, I hardly know of an instance in which two families of the same
animals, is probably the consequence of their small size; insects cannot
animals. It is notorious how much domestic animals vary in their mental
animals many structures exist, which are so highly developed that no one
animals now in a state of nature could easily be brought to bear widely
animals now living in Europe, and all those that lived in Europe during
animals of all kinds undergo partly depends on the lapse of time, and as
animals, several authentic instances could be adduced of species having
animals: some of them, for instance, being enabled to feed on new kinds
animals, the most probable conjecture is that primordially the cutaneous
animals. With birds it has often rendered the voice of the male musical
animals within the same class resemble each other, often have no direct
an important part in the origin of our breeds. When several breeds have
an independent community of F. flava under a stone beneath a nest of the
an Indian violet (name unknown, for the plants have never produced with
an innate tendency towards progressive development, yet this necessarily
an instance: Mirabilis jalapa can easily be fertilised by the pollen of
announced, I was asked how was it possible to account for the larvae of
annually transported from Porto Santo to Madeira, yet this latter island
annual stock, from having been long and carefully selected to the right
an organ, and this will generally be when the being has come to maturity
an organ without requiring as a necessary compensation the reduction of
another and later formation, without the underlying bed having suffered
another and more important cause than any of the foregoing; namely, from
another division is made, and when all the least genera, with from only
another hares or rabbits, and another hunted on marshy ground and almost
another is unimportant for their welfare in a state of nature, I presume
another, it would undoubtedly be exposed to different conditions in the
another species, F. flava, with a few of these little yellow ants still
Another species, Formica sanguinea, was likewise first discovered by P.
another stage has to search for a place of attachment. Cases can even be
another strain, gives vigour and fertility to the offspring; and on the
another. When two varieties are formed in two districts of a continuous
antenna. This antenna, when touched, transmits a sensation or vibration
anthers. Again, an organ may become rudimentary for its proper purpose,
any degree rudimentary. Hence rudimentary organs in the adult are often
any mechanical contrivance, is only a variety of the wild Dipsacus; and
any one species does not become modified and improved in a corresponding
any other known bird. Finally, it may not be a logical deduction, but to
any other view, several facts with respect to the sterility of hybrids;
any particular period of life, tend to reappear in the offspring at the
a peculiar gait; and another kind of wolf rushing round, instead of at,
apparatus. Thus every gradation, from an ordinary fixed spine to a fixed
apparent, and those that are real are not, I think, fatal to the theory.
apparently depends on their whole organisation having been disturbed by
apparently for the sake of eliminating something injurious from the sap:
apparently have not been augmented through selection by man. The tuft of
 apparently of no direct service--Progressive development--Characters of
apparently sudden appearance of a whole group of species, is that of the
appeared, and have not since visited the island. Now, in parts of Natal
appeared at an earlier period than usual, or, if not so, the differences
appeared, the more likely it would be to catch his attention. But to use
appeared to me that the bees do not always succeed in working at exactly
appear like a single toe furnished with two claws. Notwithstanding this
appears: all this beautiful work can be shown, I think, to follow from a
appears that, from having the power of movement in obedience to certain
appear to differ in length; yet the hive-bee can easily suck the nectar
applicable in other cases, I will here briefly give them. If the several
applicable in the case of secondary sexual characters, may be due to the
applies to any part, however unusually developed, unless it be unusually
appreciate the past duration of time, to consider, on the one hand, the
approaches to that of the general colouring of the other species of the
approach nearest to amphibians; while other naturalists rank the common
appropriateness this resemblance as a special difficulty, or even their
apteryx? Yet the structure of each of these birds is good for it, under
Archipelago, and nowhere else, bear so plainly the stamp of affinity to
are already defined objects, not blending one into another by insensible
areas, and belonging to genera not now found in the intermediate torrid
are at least possible. For instance, a swim-bladder has apparently been
are believed to have first appeared in our geological formations. He has
are cleansed. Hence it might have been expected that in the few species
are commonly ejected from the nest within three days after the cuckoo is
are differently coloured. Mr. Scott also has experimented on the species
are endemic,--that is, have been produced there and nowhere else in the
are extremely severe, owing to certain contingencies, of which the most
are far from having any reason to suppose that many species ever undergo
are far more highly developed than others? Why have not the more highly
are generally as absolutely distinct from each other in every detail of
are generally effected abruptly by a few stages; but the transformations
are habitually recommended for the northern and others for the southern
a relation, where I had ample means of investigation, there was a large
a relation which is quite inexplicable on the theory of independent acts
are many insects which are characterized as varieties in Mr. Wollaston's
a remarkable fact that the young birds, according to Mr. Cunningham, can
are more variable than those from very distinct species; and this shows
are perfect; in the second case they are either not at all developed, or
are quite fertile; yet in many cases they are descended from two or more
are so different that they are generally ranked in distinct genera, have
are tempted to attribute their proportional numbers and kinds to what we
are the fossils from two remote formations. Pictet gives as a well-known
are the modified offspring of those which lived at the fifth stage, and
are the most common, that is abound most in individuals, and the species
are the result and the measure of the denudation which the earth's crust
are the same, as far as we can judge, with the laws which have governed
are two little embryos in spirit, whose names I have omitted to attach,
arisen that there are upland geese with webbed feet, ground woodpeckers,
arrangement of the cells in the tissues, and of the leaves on the axis,
a rude tridactyle pedicellariae, and such may be seen on the same spine
a rudimentary pistil, for it is not crowned with a stigma; but the style
as a distinct species under the name of Uria lacrymans. In cases of this
As allied or representative species, when inhabiting a continuous area,
as did European animals into the caves of Europe. We have some evidence
a second species, while the converse cross can be effected with perfect
as especially endowed or created instincts, but as small consequences of
as far as our ignorance permits us to judge, seem quite unimportant, we
as far as we can judge, been produced for the exclusive good of others.
as Gartner would have castrated his hybrids, and this would have insured
As geology plainly proclaims that each land has undergone great physical
as good as that from which we believe in the sterility of a multitude of
as have occasionally domestic races, and for entirely disbelieving that
As icebergs are known to be sometimes loaded with earth and stones, and
a single genus. But this genus, though much isolated, will still occupy
as in the former experiment, would have broken into each other from the
as is possible among flowering plants; but here again the parts are not
as its extreme complexity allows him to form a judgment, that longevity
a situation in which several organs would be superfluous or useless: in
asked, has the production of hybrids been permitted? To grant to species
As lakes and river-systems are separated from each other by barriers of
a slight degree, it is not probable that they should vary at the present
as many dung-feeding beetles are generally found with their tarsi lost,
as modern geology has almost banished such views as the excavation of a
as much fruit as when on their own roots. We are reminded by this latter
as of climate, or any unusual degree of isolation, to check immigration,
a species, and periodical seasons of extreme cold or drought seem to be
a species in an extraordinary manner in comparison with the same part in
a species will generally cause the extermination of the parent-species;
as Professor Weismann asks, have they not been retained by other snakes,
assertion, as we shall see in the next chapter, is certainly erroneous.
assignable reason. Such characters are not of course of specific value,
as some organisms breed freely under the most unnatural conditions--for
As species have generally diverged in character during their long course
assume that the modified descendants of any one species will succeed so
assuredly should not have perceived the fact, yet the fossil horse would
as that of the nuthatch, at the same time that habit, or compulsion, or
as the father and then as the mother. Analogy from the consideration of
as the fertility of this clover absolutely depends on bees visiting the
as the insect continued to vary, and as long as a more and more perfect
as their relations to incident forces become different" would come into
As the modified descendants of dominant species, belonging to the larger
as those which have largely varied, and have given rise to new varieties
a still more formidable barrier, that they would never have extended to
as to compete with birds or other ground animals; and for such a change
as to have deceived certain foster-parents, or, as is more probable, to
a striking case of correlation, that in many pelargoniums the two upper
A struggle for existence inevitably follows from the high rate at which
as wheat, still yield new varieties: our oldest domesticated animals are
as with cuttle-fish, land-shells, fresh-water crustaceans, spiders, and
at, a flock of sheep, by shepherd-dogs. I cannot see that these actions,
at a not very early period of life, and are inherited at a corresponding
at a very early age, before they have acquired their perfect characters;
at a very early period of life, and are inherited at a corresponding not
at a very early period, that slight variations or individual differences
a terrestrial globe, we see under the Polar Circle that there is almost
Ateuchus or sacred beetle of the Egyptians, they are totally deficient.
at first appears a highly remarkable fact that the same female butterfly
at first can appear more difficult to believe than that the more complex
a thin and narrow, knife-edged ridge, coloured with vermilion. The bees
at intervals of two or three days; so that, if she were to make her own
at its close. Several cases are on record of the same species presenting
at least the greater part of the inherited change from extreme wildness
At long intervals of time, out of millions of individuals reared in the
a truly oceanic island) is as yet known to afford even a remnant of any
at several points low down in the series, the three existing families on
at some little length the means of dispersal of fresh-water productions.
attempted to show in my work on the variation of domestic animals, it is
attended to by the lowest savages. It would, indeed, have been a strange
at the base of the mammalian series. Through what agency the glands over
at the commencement of the real Glacial period. At the present day, the
at the first commencement of the process of modification, will be widely
at the greyhound and mastiff. Their whole frames, and even their mental
at the height of from five to six thousand feet under the same latitude,
At the present time, eminent breeders try by methodical selection, with
at the same time be able to explain how it is that the races of some of
at the same time; for the variability of each species is independent of
At the same time I laid on the same place a small parcel of the pupae of
At this rate there must have existed at least a score of species of wild
attribute of a vast number of species of all classes, in all countries.
attribute the greater wildness of our large birds to this cause; for in
at work. The mind cannot possibly grasp the full meaning of the term of
Australia, Africa, and South America under the same latitude; for these
Australia: but if most of the Australian trees are dichogamous, the same
Authors of the highest eminence seem to be fully satisfied with the view
average, a very wide range; for this will largely depend on how far the
average duration of life of the embedded fossils had been less than that
averages, and, as far as my imperfect results go, they confirm the view.
avoided to the "struggle for existence," "divergence of character," and
a zooid and an avicularium. It is therefore impossible to conjecture by
b14 and f14, and those marked o14 to m14, will form three very distinct
back against the viscid stigma and then against the viscid glands of the
backwards; and it may be asked how did the stigma of an ordinary flower
Bakewell, Collins, etc., by this very same process, only carried on more
bat, and yet not be more variable than any other structure, if the part
bats into terrestrial insectivorous animals; for the former there would
be accepted. No doubt it is possible, as Mr. G.H. Lewes has urged, that
be added, as the relation between the extinct and living land-shells of
beaks, or with shorter and shorter beaks. Again, we may suppose that at
be a law of nature if each species has been independently created no man
be arranged within a few great classes, in groups subordinate to groups,
bear wounds from the huge mandibles of other males; the males of certain
beasts of prey; we do not always bear in mind, that, though food may be
beasts which are known to attack even the most venomous species. Snakes
Beaumont, Murchison, Barrande, etc., whose general views would naturally
beautiful for the delight of man--a belief which it has been pronounced
beauty in their women. If beautiful objects had been created solely for
be called correlated variation. Important changes in the embryo or larva
became divided into right and left sides, with corresponding organs, for
be closely but unequally allied together, forming little clusters round
become extinct; as if mere bodily strength gave victory in the battle of
become extinct, the difficulty ceases to be very great in believing that
become extinct--to feel no surprise at the rarity of a species, and yet
become extinct. We may conclude, from what we have seen of the intimate
become impressed, just like the pigeon or poultry fancier before alluded
become, through a long course of modification, adapted in one descendant
becoming somewhat abruptly rarer and rarer on the confines, and finally
be connected with the nature of the stations inhabited by them, and has
beds 1,400 feet thick in Nova Scotia, with ancient root-bearing strata,
been acquired through adaptation, and not through inheritance from some
been ample for any amount of migration. As the cold became more and more
been annually born capable of work, but incapable of procreation, I can
been called the "physiological division of labour;" hence we may believe
been exterminated by the very process of the formation and perfection of
been fatal to my theory; inasmuch as geology plainly tells us that small
been found capable of domestication in Europe and in India; and that it
been gradually worked in by natural selection for some distinct purpose:
been independently created, we should have to attribute this similarity
been inherited from a common progenitor; and in the several groups they
been intermittent in their accumulation; and their duration has probably
been liable to much modification. But with the Alpine productions, left
been made of the cells of the hive-bee. But I hear from Professor Wyman,
been of some advantage to the nascent giraffe. Nor must we overlook the
been otherwise with the nascent giraffe, considering its probable habits
been potent in their effects. Homologous parts tend to vary in the same
been produced by secondary laws, this similarity would be an astonishing
been ranked by some competent judges as the descendants of aboriginally
been sown on equal spaces of ground. Hence, if any one species of grass
bee. One species of charlock has been known to supplant another species;
bees would thus produce a multitude of hybrids between distinct species;
beetles. So it is with most of the inhabitants of fresh water, for many
be exposed to the same conditions which made their parents variable, and
be extremely cautious in concluding that none can have existed, for the
be fertilised during each generation by pollen from the same flower; and
be finally quite obliterated? It is scarcely possible that disuse can go
Before applying the principles arrived at in the last chapter to organic
be formed, and when they migrate, the masters carry the slaves. Both in
be gained, even sometimes in the case of closely related beings, by the
be grouped into castes of different sizes, yet they graduate insensibly
behold! That our collections are imperfect is admitted by every one. The
being, are ranked as merely "adaptive or analogical characters;" but to
being blown out to sea; and, on the other hand, those beetles which most
being not perfect and liable to mistakes, and at many instincts causing
being of very small size. In six out of thirty of the closed flowers in
being or into an elaborately constructed organ; secondly the subject of
being preserved in the struggle for life; and from the strong principle
beings are striving to seize on each place in the economy of nature, if
beings, which owe none of their structure in common to inheritance from
being the points now mainly attended to by English fanciers. Even in the
being, yet characters and structures, which we are apt to consider as of
believe, disappears, when it is remembered that selection may be applied
believes that birds of the same species are more brightly coloured under
believes that the several breeds of the horse are descended from several
believes this to be a universal law of nature; and we may hope hereafter
Believing, from reasons before alluded to, that our continents have long
believing that it might profit the modified descendants of the penguin,
believing that they are closely consecutive. But we know, for instance,
be likely to receive colonists from America, whether by occasional means
belonged to a few groups more especially adapted to certain stations in
belonging to a new class, and that in the vegetable kingdom, as I learn
belonging to both families which live on the land, the equally important
belonging to several distinct groups, before they had diverged to their
belonging to the same genus. So with plants, the seeds of the different
belong, no other member is as yet known to be first developed under the
be looked at as a quality readily grafted on an innate wide flexibility
be misconstrued into saying that the progenitors of whales did actually
beneath the sea, which may have served as halting places for plants and
beneath the then known Silurian system; and now, still lower down in the
beneficial in a high degree to the species. For instance, it is clearly
beneficial to the species. But let the destruction of the adults be ever
benefits which certainly are derived from this process are thus secured.
be preserved for a long time, from being fitted to some peculiar line of
be proved to be perfectly sound by fertilising other plants or species.
be safely attributed to the domestic duck flying much less, and walking
best botanists on the question whether certain doubtful forms should be
be sterile when united in certain ways. For we must remember that it is
best fitted for their places in nature, will leave most progeny. But in
better chance of favourable variations, arising from the large number of
better with what we know of the laws impressed on matter by the Creator,
between 500 and 600 miles from the shores of South America. Here almost
between child and parent, will render this a very rare event; for in all
between real affinities and analogical or adaptive resemblances. Lamarck
between the less and more improved states of a the same species, as well
between the same two species was long ago observed by Kolreuter. To give
between the varieties of the same species, and next in severity between
between two other forms, which themselves can only doubtfully be ranked
birds are clothed when hatched. The shape and size of the eggs vary. The
birds, by selecting, during thousands of generations, the most melodious
birds. I cannot here enter on the necessary details; but if man can in a
birds' nests; but I have lately heard from Dr. Merrill, of Iowa, that he
blank periods of enormous length. So that the lofty pile of sedimentary
blend together, or may formerly have blended. Where the sea now extends,
blend where they met; but to this subject of intercrossing we shall soon
blindness. Notwithstanding such modifications, we might expect still to
blown across the sea; and we have seen that seeds retain their power of
blown to the distance of five hundred miles, and hawks are known to look
blows on the head; and I have many times seen and heard it hammering the
blue colour, with the white loins, double black wing-bar, and barred and
borne in mind; as well as the strength of the hereditary tendency. Under
born with a sort of proboscis, and if any wild species of the same genus
botanical provinces. We can thus understand the concentration of related
Both Gartner and Kolreuter have proved that in genera including numerous
both sexes at corresponding ages; but I have not space here to enter on
both time and space the lowly organised members of each class generally
branching chain of life. We ought only to look for a few links, and such
Brazilian crustaceans likewise appearing under two widely distinct male
breast, but at first without a nipple, as we see in the Ornithorhyncus,
breathing air. Muller was thus led carefully to examine the apparatus in
breeder. And in this case, it is not at all surprising that the inherent
breeds, and esculent vegetables, for an unlimited number of generations,
breeds as we do sometimes see are almost always imported from some other
breeds; but the goose, under the conditions to which it is exposed when
breed, whatever their quality may be, and this will effectually prevent
briefly, as it can be treated properly only by giving long catalogues of
bringing numerous forms of life much closer together, it does not yield
Britain were set free in New Zealand, a multitude of British forms would
Broca, namely, that many characters appear to be of no service whatever
Bronn also insists that distinct species never differ from each other in
browse without their aid; whereas in the calf, the teeth have been left
bucket; in doing this they frequently pushed each other into the bucket,
buds by ramifying branches may well represent the classification of all
Bud-variations, such as the appearance of a moss-rose on a common rose,
bulls and cows, when matched, produced oxen with the longest horns; and
buried there in such numbers, are related to South American types. This
But another agency is perhaps more effectual: I suspended the feet of a
But, as by this theory innumerable transitional forms must have existed,
But, as I have attempted to show, weighty evidence can be opposed to the
but does not pass right through the skull, as was formerly thought to be
But even if they had existed in the earliest stage of their development
But I must explain my meaning more fully. I believe that the ARRANGEMENT
But I must here remark that I do not suppose that the process ever goes
But it would be superfluous to discuss this question in detail: for with
but Kolreuter tried more than two hundred times, during eight following
but little modified, these constitute our so-called osculant or aberrant
but little specialised for particular functions; and as long as the same
but may be again and again further altered. Hence, the structure of each
But morphology is a much more complex subject than it at first appears,
but not so stiff as in the typical wood-peckers, and a straight, strong
but only the barest outline of the facts can here be given. When pollen
but on what a number of patterns is the hinge constructed, from the long
butterflies and even a moth are found all closely resembling a butterfly
but that it cannot, under our present state of knowledge, be considered
But the amount of modification which the different groups have undergone
But the expression often used by Mr. Herbert Spencer, of the Survival of
But the rough wall of wax has in every case to be finished off, by being
But to return to our comparison of mongrels and hybrids: Gartner states
But variations which, for all that we can see might have appeared either
But we have every reason to believe that the terrestrial productions of
But we may go further than this. The original species of our genus were
but we shall at least be freed from the vain search for the undiscovered
by a gigantic coping. From all the cells, both those just commenced and
by an elongated head. Some instances of correlation are quite whimsical;
by as spectators, at last choose the most attractive partner. Those who
by a wolf-like fox, come nearest to an exception; but this group cannot
by chance picked out extraordinarily abnormal species; and further, that
by Colonel Poole that foals of this species are generally striped on the
by De Saussure as boring holes into hard wood in order to lay up a store
by different hybridisers, or by the same observer from experiments made
by Dr. Cruger in the Coryanthes. This orchid has part of its labellum or
by growth to fresh buds, and these, if vigorous, branch out and overtop
by its eager way of running about to be well aware what a rich flock it
by more successful competitors, with a few members still preserved under
by Mr. Herbert Spencer, that of the necessary acquirement of each mental
by Mr. Waterhouse. Professor Owen, also, seems to have come to a nearly
by none more clearly than by that excellent botanist, Aug. St. Hilaire.
by nurserymen. The principle of selection I find distinctly given in an
by reflecting on the differences between the breeds of our domesticated
by running through Pictet's Palaeontology it will be seen that very few
by several authors; so it is, according to Lyell, with the European and
by some half-monstrous form, or at least by some modification prominent
by sterility being incidental on other differences, and not a specially
by taking advantage of slight successive variations; she can never take
by the aphides, or the domestic cattle as they may be called, which our
by the greatest natural philosophers. The undulatory theory of light has
by the highest authority, Prof. Dana, that "it is certainly a wonderful
by the terms, varieties, species, genera, families, orders, and classes.
by three distinct means, by spirally twining, by clasping a support with
By what steps the instinct of F. sanguinea originated I will not pretend
by what we see taking place under domestication, that this result would
by which a mass of combustible matter is ignited, has in determining the
by women and children, we rarely see a distinct breed long kept up; such
(Caccabis rufa) which had been wounded and could not fly, with a ball of
Calceolaria integrifolia and plantaginea, species most widely dissimilar
Caledonia, the Andaman Islands, and perhaps the Solomon Islands and the
call chance. But how false a view is this! Every one has heard that when
Cambrian system was deposited? We now know that at least one animal did
can actually be hybridised much more readily than they can be fertilised
Canaries, or between the several islets of these small archipelagos, be
can be shown to be homologous, only a few serial homologies; such as the
Candolle has shown, generally have, whatever the cause may be, confined
can hardly be said to have a distinct origin. A man preserves and breeds
cannot give. If, for instance, it could be proved that every part of the
cannot long retain a vertical position, owing to the excessive depth of
cannot thus go on increasing in size, for the world would not hold them,
can so far take a prophetic glance into futurity as to foretell that it
can traverse the ocean, are often found on islands far distant from any
can understand how it is that a relation exists between the depth of the
Can we suppose that rudimentary teeth, which are subsequently absorbed,
capable judge, Dr. Falconer, believes that it is chiefly insects which,
capable of self-development into other and needful forms, as to believe
carefully preserving each which, under varied circumstances, in any way
carried in the crops or intestines of birds. These means, however, would
carriers, and tumblers. Now, some of these birds, when mature, differ in
case, and probably indicates dispersal from an Antarctic centre during a
case of certain powerfully-winged birds, will necessarily range widely;
case of neuter insects all of one caste, which, as I believe, have been
cases. But on the view of each species constantly trying to increase in
cases is notorious; but some few instances of both hybrids and mongrels
cases the beings have been connected by the bond of ordinary generation,
cases: the genus Zanthoxylon belongs to a division of the Rutaceae with
cases the young or embryo will closely resemble the mature parent-form,
case the gradual acquirement at an earlier and earlier age of the adult
case to the effects of use, and how much to natural selection, it seems
cattle, more especially, according to Youatt, in young animals--and the
caught one 370 miles from the coast of Africa, and have heard of others
caused by each part, each will be found on the whole advantageous. After
cause of the young in such groups not passing through any metamorphosis,
causes and laws of variation, on correlation, on the effects of use and
causes of serious error here intervene: a plant, to be hybridised, must
causes their abortion; but this can hardly be the sole case, for in some
cause, we invoke cataclysms to desolate the world, or invent laws on the
ceases after the early growth of each shoot. As in many widely separated
celebrated raiser of Hereford cattle, whether his cattle might not have
cells, and which has practically anticipated the discoveries of profound
centres of creation," I must say a few words on the means of dispersal.
Cephalopods or cuttle-fish and of vertebrate animals appear wonderfully
certain abnormal individuals, and in other species all the individuals,
Certain compound animals, or zoophytes, as they have been termed, namely
certain crustaceans, show us what wonderful changes of structure can be
certain extent resemble varieties, for they differ from each other by a
certain facts in the distribution of the organic beings inhabiting South
certain lines of its body, in order that its shell should not be fouled.
certainly have been preserved and discovered; and as not one species had
certainly have differed from each other by a less number of characters;
certain plants having separated sexes Kolreuter found that by crossing a
certain polymorphic species, or would ultimately become fixed, owing to
certain species of Sorbus, when grafted on other species, yielded twice
certain species, while young, habitually fall over and rest on the left
certain whole classes, or of certain members of each class, does not at
chalked out upon a wall a form perfect in itself, and then had given it
chance of making out this obscure problem. Nor have I been disappointed;
change; and the principle of competition between organism and organism,
changed in an essential manner, although the climate may be exactly the
change in a less degree. We find similar relations between the existing
change of structure. The webbed feet of the upland goose may be said to
changes, we might have expected to find that organic beings have varied
changes which have supervened since ancient times, almost any amount of
changing habits or taste; but let the feet of the titmouse vary and grow
changing their colour in accordance with the surrounding surface, or the
Channel, and there is no reason to suppose that they have at any former
chapter, showing that it is the common and diffused or dominant species
CHAPTER VII. MISCELLANEOUS OBJECTIONS TO THE THEORY OF NATURAL SELECTION.
character and the direction of its mountain ranges, the Rev. W.B. Clarke
character; but to obtain a race intermediate between two quite distinct
character in question has been lying latent, and at last, under unknown
character of our domestic races, and likewise their differences being so
character of the offspring of their domestic animals, yet any one animal
characters are far more serviceable than others for classification; why
characters are strongly displayed, with the amount of difference between
characters are universal. A little dose of judgment or reason, as Pierre
characters, but receives aid from homologous and rudimentary organs, as
characters for a long time; for as long, as far as we know, as have good
characters, I have repeatedly noticed in works on natural history, that
characters in his domestic varieties, and from such varieties not having
characters in which they all agree? Why, for instance, should the colour
characters, is--that there is a TENDENCY in the young of each successive
characters of generic value. It can be shown that this statement is not
characters--that is, the characters which have come to differ since the
characters, then the families which existed at a period marked VI would
characters useful to the males alone in their struggles or rivalry with
characters which are the least likely to have been modified, in relation
character to the foreign breed--some say, for a dozen or even a score of
character with respect to all existing Marsupials; or that both Rodents
character would have been considered by naturalists as an important aid
checked by natural selection. It follows probably from this same cause,
(Chenalopex) the beak closely resembles that of the common duck; but the
chiefly on the destruction of vermin. If not one head of game were shot
chief points to be referred to are three: first, that the common cuckoo,
circumstance has struck me much; namely, that nearly all the breeders of
CIRCUMSTANCES FAVOURABLE FOR THE PRODUCTION OF NEW FORMS THROUGH NATURAL
circumstances have been favourable to them during two or three following
cirripede was a Chthamalus, a very common, large, and ubiquitous genus,
civilisation of the several co-descended races, and had thus given rise
classes, which inhabit the caves of Carniola and Kentucky, are blind. In
classification, but I may add that as, according to this view, extremely
classification by the test of infertility, as varieties, and Naudin has
 Classification, groups subordinate to groups--Natural system--Rules and
classification. We can understand why we value certain resemblances far
classification. We shall presently see why embryological characters are
classification would be universally preferred; and it has been attempted
classing varieties: thus the great agriculturist Marshall says the horns
cleared, and where there could be no choking from other plants, I marked
clearly see in the prodigious number of plants which in our gardens can
clear that organic beings must be exposed during several generations to
 climate and of the level of the land, and by occasional means--Dispersal
climate, etc. Each of the endless variations which we see in the plumage
climate seems at first sight to be quite independent of the struggle for
climates. Such considerations as these incline me to lay less weight on
climate, than we do in proceeding southward or in descending a mountain.
climate was not perfectly fitted for them, for the change of temperature
close and important manner to the differences between the productions of
closely allied crustaceans (as described in Dana's admirable work), some
closely allied forms. Temminck insists on the utility or even necessity
closely allied or representative species, found in the successive stages
closely between the stems of the heath, I found a multitude of seedlings
closely browsed by quadrupeds, be let to grow, the more vigorous plants
closely consecutive formations are closely allied; for they are closely
closely consecutive formations, being closely related, though ranked as
closely resembling the Italian greyhound, the bloodhound, the bull-dog,
closely similar embryonic stages, we may feel assured that they are all
close together that all cannot live. When I ascertained that these young
clover abounded, it might be a great advantage to the hive-bee to have a
clusters, like varieties round species; and they present other analogies
Coccidae;" the term parthenogenesis implying that the mature females of
coelospermous in the central flowers--that the elder De Candolle founded
cohering into caudicles; and the steps can likewise be followed by which
colour, but extends to form, and even to the manner in which the insects
coloured varieties of the same species. Moreover, he asserts that, when
colour from the nature of the food, thickness of the skin and hair from
colts of race and heavy cart-horses, I find that this is by no means the
combinations made for convenience. This may not be a cheering prospect;
combs and nests; and Colonel Newman, who has long attended to the habits
comes to be a mere useless abstraction, implying and assuming a separate
comes to the conclusion that the laws of resemblance of the child to its
come to such a case of extraordinary adaptation as that lately described
command. Of his many important statements I will here give only a single
commenced between forms widely dissimilar in colour. But, starting with
common expression, from one ancestor, is only 1 in 2048; and yet, as we
commonly be found unoccupied or ill-occupied by other organisms. In this
commonness), oftenest give rise to varieties sufficiently well-marked to
common opinion of naturalists, that beings which stand low in the scale
common origin; and as the movable lip of the cell serves as a protection
common parent. The common parent will have had in its whole organisation
common parent. We may err in this respect in regard to single points of
communicate with the circulatory lacunae of the sack and body, and which
community of descent become fewer in number and less in force. But some
compared with the average duration of specific forms; that migration has
compared with those on equal continental areas: Alph. de Candolle admits
comparison of course relates only to the members of the same group. One
comparison with the leaves and flowers of the same set of varieties. See
compelled to believe that many structures beautifully adapted to all the
competition with each other. Consequently, each new variety or species,
competitors, will have been exposed during long periods of time to more
complemental males; and in the latter the development has assuredly been
complete act of creation, but only an occasional scene, taken almost at
completely as to breed a bird as coarse as a common tumbler pigeon from
completely destroys, as has been shown by Gartner, the influence of the
complex action of natural selection, entailing extinction and divergence
complex eye could be formed by natural selection, though insuperable by
complexity, each good for its possessor, then under changing conditions
Compositae, the male florets, which of course cannot be fecundated, have
Compositae the seeds of the outer and inner florets differ, without any
comprehension, of the pressure of one part on another, etc., and finally
conceivable degree of perfection through natural selection. In the cases
conceivable that the young of any animal was ever saved from destruction
conception of the Deity to believe that He created a few original forms
conception of the length of geological periods," but in estimating them
concerned, I can see no similarity between tridactyle pedicellariae and
concerned only with the diversities of instinct and of the other mental
concluded that the average duration of each formation is twice or thrice
conclude that a fifth stamen once existed, for a rudiment of it is found
conclusions have lately been much misrepresented, and it has been stated
conclusion when we look, for instance, at the logger-headed duck, which
concur in reproduction? As it is impossible here to enter on details, I
condescended to the tricks of the stage? Mr. Bates has, no doubt, hit on
condition are often of much value in classification. No one will dispute
condition of certain members of insect communities; the difficulty lies
condition of certain members of the community, have proved advantageous;
conditions, and by variations which seem to us in our ignorance to arise
conditions, has given rise to so great a difference in number. Even the
 conditions--Importance of barriers--Affinity of the productions of the
conditions of life, as far as we know, have remained absolutely uniform.
conditions of life a structure, before useful, becomes less useful, its
conditions of life, then the difficulty of believing that a perfect and
conditions, the total number of the inhabitants will be small; and this
conditions; yet they are incomparably more closely related to each other
condition. The ovigerous frena of certain cirripedes, which have ceased
confessedly ignorant; nor do we know how ignorant we are. We do not know
confined locality, may be called individual differences. No one supposes
confined to characters almost monstrous in their nature, and which have
confines of the range of each new species will have been checked: after
conformable with the theory; for the species of the same genus, and the
connecting links in our geological formations. But against the belief in
connection, recurring in widely separated geological formations; and the
conscientiously expressing his conviction; for thus only can the load of
consecutive formations are far more closely related to each other, than
consequence of this belief Mr. Weale sent me in a letter a small packet
Consequently if it were to undergo a considerable amount of modification
Consequently, if the theory be true, it is indisputable that before the
consequently some naturalists maintain that molluscs were formerly more
consequently, will exist in lesser numbers from inhabiting a narrow and
considerable body of evidence, which I have elsewhere given, that slight
considerable numbers, and being highly variable, would naturally afford
considerations always in mind--never to forget that every single organic
considerations I think we need not greatly marvel at the endemic species
considered, and the others will hereafter be considered. They seem to me
considered as a rudimentary digit, and in some species the whole wing is
considered. The distinction probably has been slurred over, owing to the
considering reciprocal crosses, in which the male of one species cannot
Considering that these several means of transport, and that other means,
considers it as "demonstrably insufficient" to account for the phenomena
consider the sting of the bee as perfect, which, when used against many
constitute a fundamental distinction between varieties and species when
constitution and structure; but that the effects have often been largely
constitutions, including of course the reproductive systems, having been
constitution, structure, and habits of each creature, favouring the good
continent. In South America, a similar relationship is manifest, even to
continents were everywhere tenanted under the equator by a considerable
continually being produced by spontaneous generation. Science has not as
continually preferred by the females, and not for the delight of man. So
continually recurring with varying success; and yet in the long-run the
continued preservation of the individuals best fitted for the two sites,
continued process; though they will, during each successive age, have to
continue to throw, on former changes of climate and of the level of the
continuous land, and the Cape Verde Islands from Africa; such colonists
continuous land from western Europe through Siberia, to eastern America.
continuously accumulating during a long period, sufficient for the slow
contradistinction to their adaptive resemblances, are due to inheritance
contrivances, and sometimes capable of neatly adapted movements through
contrivances in nature, this same reason tells us, though we may easily
converted by small changes into a species like the Egyptian goose--this
converted into terrestrial carnivorous animals of considerable size, and
convinced that the various larval and pupal stages of insects have thus
Cordillera, from latitude 13 to 30 degrees south, at about the height of
corn and rape-seed, etc., in our fields, because the seeds are in great
corporeal structures for the welfare of each species, under its present
correct; but naturalists differ much in determining what characters are
corresponding ages, can modify the egg, seed, or young as easily as the
corresponding ages will tend to reproduce the organ in its reduced state
corresponding differences in their skulls. The carrier, more especially
corresponding with a blank interval in the other--and if in both regions
could be given; for instance in plants, the very curious contrivance of
could be given in regard to terrestrial animals. In marine productions,
could by any means defend themselves from these small enemies, would be
could, it is probable, be formed by carefully watching which individual
could never be recognised unless actual measurements or careful drawings
could not even feed themselves, and many perished of hunger. Huber then
could not have been affected through natural selection, unless the young
could not possibly exist, is one of the most striking cases known of the
counting grasses and carices) flourished in the plantations, which could
countries are almost as much isolated from each other as is possible. On
countries. Of this volume, only here and there a short chapter has been
countries, were taken from a state of nature, and could be made to breed
countries, where there has been but little methodical selection. Animals
country; and let us further suppose that the community lived through the
country partly surrounded by barriers, into which new and better adapted
country struggled successfully with the indigenes, and have there become
country the larger titmouse (Parus major) may be seen climbing branches,
courses of the arteries near the branchial slits are related to similar
"crackers" (i.e. Virginia squatters) added, "we select the black members
crawled away. Baron Aucapitaine has since tried similar experiments. He
crawls out by the passage, the pollen-mass necessarily comes first into
created for some special purpose rarely or never appear in any being; as
creation of each separate species, will have to admit that a sufficient
creation, that in reciprocal crosses the male element of one form should
crossed, but in which BOTH parents have lost some character which their
crossed inter se. If, on the other hand, a hybrid is crossed with either
crossed, which forms so remarkable a contrast with the almost universal
crosses, and in their inheritance of characters from both parent-forms.
crosses between the similarly coloured flowers, than between those which
crosses. Mr. Salter has recently given the results of an examination of
crosses; or the increased sterility in those hybrids which occasionally
Crustacea and Mollusca are adapted to live on the land; and seeing that
cultivated than under their natural conditions, it is not probable that
culture. As a single bud out of many thousands produced year after year
curious than the presence of teeth in foetal whales, which when grown up
curious; they always make the first rough wall from ten to twenty times
cut-away cement, and adding fresh cement on the summit of the ridge. We
cutting shape of the molar teeth. For the teeth really differ much: thus
cycle. The belief in the essential identity of the process of alternate
damp climate affects the growth of the hair, and that with the hair the
darkness. Next follow those that are constructed for twilight; and, last
daughters, as soon as they are born, or to perish herself in the combat;
deaf; but it has been lately stated by Mr. Tait that this is confined to
decide; but we know that certain periodical movements, for instance the
declared the doctrine false; but the old saying of Vox populi, vox Dei,
declares. Natural selection, also, leads to divergence of character; for
deep between the islands, and gales of wind are extraordinarily rare; so
definite action of changed conditions of life, of so-called spontaneous
definite length of life, so have species a definite duration. No one can
definite. They may be considered as definite when all or nearly all the
definitions by which each group could be distinguished, still a natural
definitions by which the several members of the several groups could be
degraded habits of life. Lastly, the wonderful law of the long endurance
degree inherited by retrievers; and a tendency to run round, instead of
degree more distinct and permanent, as steps toward more strongly marked
degree of sterility does not strictly follow systematic affinity, but is
degree, then the facts, which the record does give, strongly support the
degree with the surrounding physical conditions. As we have seen in the
delicate and more easily broken shells might be selected, the thickness
denied, it may be well to make some remarks on this subject, and to give
depends. If we forget for an instant that each species tends to increase
depends on their being correlated with many other characters of more or
deposited during the same exact periods--a formation in one region often
deposit. It is an excellent lesson to reflect on the ascertained amount
deposits; and that not a cave or true lacustrine bed is known belonging
deposits over immense territories in Russia and in North America, do not
derivative theory is the most natural one, "and the most accordant with
derived from almost any change in their habits of life. Again, both with
 descendants from a common parent--Explains the Grouping of all organic
descendants. I am surprised that no one has advanced this demonstrative
descendants of two organisms, which had originally differed in a marked
descendants. This cannot for an instant be admitted. These huge animals
descendants--which on our view must be a very slow process, requiring a
descended, each within its own class or group, from common parents, and
descended from common parents, when crossed, and likewise the fertility
descended from distinct species, which would probably have been sterile
descent, for in one of two groups the developmental stages may have been
descent from any single pair, but to continued care in the selecting and
descent with modification through variation and natural selection, I do
deserts, etc., are not as impassable, or likely to have endured so long,
deserts, the struggle for life is almost exclusively with the elements.
desired manner. He thus adapts animals and plants for his own benefit or
destroyed. In living bodies, variation will cause the slight alteration,
destroyed, many must be produced or the species will become extinct. It
destroyed, or with which it comes into competition; and as these species
destruction of the old and young and that nearly all the young have been
destruction of those which could not browse so high, would have sufficed
destructive agencies, which stood in no relation to certain structures,
detail all the facts, with references, on which my conclusions have been
detection, would tend towards its preservation; and the more perfect the
determined through equally complex relations. It is incredible that the
determine, through the intervention first of mice and then of bees, the
developed and to secrete milk. So again in the udders of the genus Bos,
developed in many ways than the upper side, with the lateral fins often
developed in one species or in a few species in comparison with the same
developed in some one sea, have spread widely. Nor have we any right to
developed into trees, etc., seem to me to accord better with the belief
developed than those of the centre; and this seems often connected with
developed would be the most securely reared. The first step towards the
developed--yet of those which do survive, the best adapted individuals,
development, or periodical action, or mutual relations of the different
development so often resemble ancient and extinct forms belonging to the
Devonshire pony, and a small dun Welsh pony has been carefully described
diagram the process is represented up to the ten-thousandth generation,
diagram to have produced variety a2, which will, owing to the principle
did subsequently Dr. Hooker, even in stronger terms. I shall reserve for
differed from each other. So it is with the plants and insects on small
differed to a certain extent, and in accordance with the principle that
difference, in any recognisable character, is sufficient to prevent two
differences are of quite subordinate value in classification; yet no one
differences between species which induce sterility in first crosses and
differences between the extinct three-toed Hipparion and the horse arose
differences between the young and the mature, and between the mature and
differences in almost every part of their structure, and this cannot be
differences in the embryo--on the number and position of the cotyledons,
differences which has given rise to all the more important modifications
difference there is in the buoyancy of green and seasoned timber; and it
different and serve for widely different purposes in the adult state. So
different animals of the same class with their several instincts. I have
different branches, under the microscope, and on all, without exception,
different breeds of dogs are crossed. Thus it is known that a cross with
different climates and conditions. Consider the prodigious vicissitudes
different climate, there might have been free migration for the northern
different constitutional powers of resisting cold. Mr. Thwaites informs
different districts, might have varied and given rise to distinct races.
different forms. Nevertheless, they do not pretend that they can define,
different from the other five species, and may constitute a sub-genus or
different geological substages, let their differences be ever so slight.
differentiation, or where the manufactory of new specific forms has been
different islands, for it would have to compete with a different set of
differently modified, though only in a small degree, in islands situated
different. Nevertheless, their genealogical ARRANGEMENT remains strictly
different quarters of the world. I do not believe, as we shall presently
different section of the same order, differ greatly from each other. In
different species of hares and mice--the complex folds of enamel in the
different species of the same group, the more subject it is to anomalies
different stages of the same formation, would, by many palaeontologists,
different stations, from breeding at slightly different seasons, or from
differ greatly, being due to the different degrees of modification which
differing widely from the descendants of (A). These two groups of genera
differ much in structure in the different species. In their most perfect
differs much in degree, up to absolute and utter sterility; just in the
difficulties will have occurred to him. Some of them are so serious that
difficult to breed nearly perfect birds, many departing widely from the
difficult to get a cow to give much milk and to fatten readily. The same
difficult to make cells of wax of the true form, though this is effected
difficulty; for natural selection, or the survival of the fittest, does
difficulty. In very many cases, however, one form is ranked as a variety
difficulty lies in the working ants differing widely from both the males
difficulty of the wide diffusion of the species of the same genus is in
difficulty, which I will not here enumerate, sometimes arise in deciding
digress by adding, that if the smaller workers had been the most useful
diligent search, cases of monstrosities resembling normal structures in
diorite, etc., were once necessarily covered up, how can we account for
direction, and has consequently more freely inundated the south. As the
directly intermediate between them, but rather between types of the two
directly intermediate in all its characters between two living forms or
dirt adhering to their feet or beaks? But I shall have to recur to this
disadvantages thence arising would not, in times of scarcity, more than
disappear, sooner than the forms which they originally linked together.
discovered in a geological formation, they appear as if suddenly created
discoveries of the last dozen years, it seems to me to be about as rash
discover the lines of descent by the most permanent characters, whatever
discussed with much ability by Mr. Walsh, who has grouped them under his
dispersal and subsequent modification. There is also reason to believe,
displayed by the different species of the same class in their homologous
disputed--then the instincts and structure of the young could be slowly
disputed this conclusion. We should not forget that only a small portion
disputed to which kingdom they should be referred. As Professor Asa Gray
disputes the entire fertility of Kolreuter's ten cases. But in these and
disregarded. When further improved by the same slow and gradual process,
dissimilar physical conditions, for the dissimilarity of the inhabitants
distance of 1,100 geographical miles, were examined by me, and they all
distant from each other, or with an interval of such a nature, that the
distant regions, under the most different climates, where not a fragment
distinct and valuable, and will then probably first receive a provincial
distinct families. The most common case, especially with respect to very
distinct genera, were known to be sometimes produced on the same plant,
distinct groups, such as fish and reptiles, seems to be that, supposing
distinct in each separate island; but when all from the several islands
distinct marine faunas. Although so few marine animals are common to the
distinct plants, which grow close together under the same conditions. As
distinct species are hidden under the same dress. The term species thus
distinct species; but these species are related to each other in a very
distinct species. But to make the case sure, he would raise plants from
distinct transverse bars on its legs, like those on the legs of a zebra.
distinguished from their more immediate parents and descendants. Yet the
distinguishing varieties of the same species, steadily tend to increase,
distinguish this or that branch, though at the actual fork the two unite
 Distribution of fresh-water productions--On the inhabitants of oceanic
distribution of terrestrial mammals was formerly different from what it
districts and times would have been much more favourable than others for
district which can be better occupied by the modification of some of its
disuse in weakening and diminishing organs, appear in many cases to have
divergence of character (in which, however, he apparently believes), and
diversified conditions; humid districts, arid deserts, lofty mountains,
diversity of leaves, pods, or tubers, or whatever part is valued, in the
do at present, they must have been still more completely separated from
doctrine of Malthus applied with manifold force to the whole animal and
does not follow that natural selection would be able to act on them and
dogs do not readily unite with European dogs, the explanation which will
dogs of South America, all are quite fertile together; but analogy makes
domestic animals, this conclusion is probably quite correct, if applied
domestic animals was carefully attended to in ancient times, and is now
domesticated animals and cultivated plants have been subjected, have had
domesticated, seems to have a singularly inflexible organisation, though
domestication, for the mother-hen has almost lost by disuse the power of
domestication, it may truly be said that the whole organisation becomes
domestic breeds. That many breeds produced by man have to a large extent
Domestic instincts are sometimes spoken of as actions which have become
domestic productions, and, in a lesser degree, in those under nature, be
domestic varieties of the same species differ from each other in almost
dominant forms, and there will be nothing immutable in the distribution
do not spread widely and supplant their parent-form until they have been
do on certain distinct continents, which we have reason to believe were
do on the old doctrine of creation, might even have been anticipated in
 do single species--On extinction--On simultaneous changes in the forms
doubted: the granitic region of Parime is described by Humboldt as being
doubtful forms as varieties or species. This likewise necessarily occurs
doubtful forms, naturalists are compelled to come to a determination by
do we know of the mutual relations of the innumerable inhabitants of the
down the intervals between existing genera. Cuvier ranked the Ruminants
drawing any such inference, when we see that the skin on the head of the
Dr. Hooker, Australian forms are rapidly sowing themselves and becoming
Dr. Hooker has recently shown that in the southeast corner of Australia,
D than to the other species; and species (I) more to G, H, K, L, than to
duck in an aquarium, where many ova of fresh-water shells were hatching;
due to inheritance; for an ancient progenitor may have acquired through
duration of time, according to our ideas of time, more forcibly than the
during different years. It can thus be shown that neither sterility nor
during floods, without any change of level. The wide differences of the
during rest, there would seem to be a charge in every respect like that
during some former generation, this tendency, for all that we can see to
during the eocene period; but now we know, on the authority of Professor
during the long course of ages much migration from one part of the world
During the months of June and July, on three successive years, I watched
during the process of secretion. A large store of honey is indispensable
during the successive generations, will have come to differ largely, but
dynasty, about 3000 B.C., as was pointed out to me by Professor Lepsius;
each been represented by a dozen species, instead of as at present by a
each breed. The common goose has not given rise to any marked varieties;
each continent, also, we see the same fact; for on the opposite sides of
each geological period undoubtedly is intermediate in character, between
each main division of the animal and vegetable kingdoms. Although few of
each other, and at first to form such unstable modifications that it is
each other in a double layer, and to build up and excavate the wax along
each other in all respects. Thus the difficulty of an organ, apparently
each other, I use for convenience sake the general term of Struggle for
each other, namely, in the union of individuals of the same variety, or
each should not commonly include a graduated series of links between the
each species is an independent property, and will be taken advantage of
each species will be enabled to increase by as much as they become more
each successive period between the extinct and still older species, why
each was developed in the same manner as with the less perfectly gliding
early death of the embryo is a very frequent cause of sterility in first
early period. But the case of the short-faced tumbler, which when twelve
early stages of development and then perish like the embryos produced by
earth may be descended from some one primordial form. But this inference
ease on the ground. Disuse, on the other hand, will account for the less
eastern islands of the Pacific with another and totally distinct fauna.
Echinoneus, the shell is described by M. Perrier as bearing two kinds of
economy of any one organic being to say what slight modifications would
effected during development. Such changes, however, reach their acme in
effected only by slow degrees; yet Sir J. Lubbock has shown a degree of
effects are displayed. The cause may have acted, and I believe often has
effectually I could easily show by many striking facts. I will give only
efforts of the highest human intellects; and we naturally infer that the
eggs in an open nest, manifest a decided preference for nests containing
eggs of poultry, and in the colour of the down of their chickens; in the
either from disuse or through natural selection, it will generally be at
either on the square summit of the broad penultimate segment, or against
elaborate care, and show off in the best manner, their gorgeous plumage;
elder Huber, but I am convinced of their accuracy; and if I had space, I
element) from innumerable progenitors, all of which have had their forms
element; in nearly the same manner as the increased length of the horns
elements in the act of reproduction, yet that there is a rude degree of
elliptic courses round their planets "for the sake of symmetry," because
embryo and the adult, that we are tempted to look at this difference as
embryo by an accumulation of epidermic cells, lying in a sack-like fold
eminently liable to the inroads of closely allied forms existing on both
eminently susceptible the reproductive system is to very slight changes
encountered by naturalists in their classifications--the value set upon
endowed quality. As the capacity of one plant to be grafted or budded on
ends of the branches, and this contrivance, no doubt, is of the highest
endures. There is reason to believe that the extinction of a whole group
enduring the most different climates by man himself and by his domestic
England; and the mongrels were black, brown and mottled. I also crossed
enlarged in 1844 into a sketch of the conclusions, which then seemed to
enlarge or to reduce the wings, would depend on whether a greater number
enormous geographical changes within the period of existing species. It
enormous period in nearly their present state. But to suppose that most
enough; but when these mongrels are crossed one with another for several
entertained, and which I formerly entertained--namely, that each species
entire and absolute difference in their inhabitants! The inhabitants of
enunciating general propositions and of placing together the forms most
ephemerous insect (Chloeon) during its development, moults, as shown by
epoch; and that certain land and fresh-water shells have remained nearly
equally curious. Bees visit these flowers, like those of the Coryanthes,
equatorial lowlands. The inhabitants of these hot lowlands would at the
equatorial South America, in Tierra del Fuego, at the Cape of Good Hope,
err on both sides, that some other contrivances are less perfect. Can we
especially from no pleasure having been felt in the display of distinct
essentially related to the principle of life; this principle, according
established. The whole subject, however, treated as it necessarily here
etc., but that each of these kingdoms possesses several peculiar breeds
etc., the more permanent varieties are generally found, as far as I can
European and North American lowlands, would again be found in the arctic
even a million years; it cannot add up and perceive the full effects of
even had some zebra-like stripes on the sides of its face. With respect
even more important for classification than that of the adult. In two or
even more than commonly perfect fertility, in a first cross between two
even the genera are quite distinct. As the amount of modification which
event." The Eozoon belongs to the most lowly organised of all classes of
even when the other hybrids raised from seed from the same capsule have
Even with animals which unite for each birth, and which do not propagate
even with the pollen of the pure parents, a single fertile seed: but in
ever lay fertile eggs. Many exotic plants have pollen utterly worthless,
ever made by man, namely, the law of the attraction of gravity, was also
every one of the domestic breeds, taking thoroughly well-bred birds, all
every product of the land and of the water bears the unmistakable stamp
every slope. Messrs. Ramsay and Whitaker have shown, and the observation
everywhere formed by the intersection of various formations. This being
evidence being assigned. The vague and in some respects false analogies,
evidence in great fossilised trees, still standing upright as they grew,
evidence in support of the statement, that ordinary specific characters
exaggerated pause of an animal preparing to spring on its prey. When the
examination and sketch for me of a dun Belgian cart-horse with a double
excellent observer, Mr. Hudson, sometimes to live promiscuously together
except in caves; yet those which inhabit the several caves of Europe and
exceptions, we may conclude that the structure of every living creature
except on the belief that they have subsequently been completely denuded
excess, it rarely flows, at least in excess, to another part; thus it is
exclaim that these several causes are amply sufficient to neutralise the
(excluding those long cultivated) which have not had their reproductive
exclusion of light. But it cannot be supposed that the peculiar speckled
excrement; and several of these seeds retained the power of germination.
excrete matter in excess, or matter injurious to the system; but can we
exercising them more, and possibly even the form of the pelvis; and then
exist before that stage. In all cases positive palaeontological evidence
existed eleven wild species of sheep peculiar to Great Britain! When we
existed in lesser numbers than the forms which they connect, then we can
existence--are generally the most constant, we attach especial value to
existence depends on them; and it may metaphorically be said to struggle
existence of groups would have been of simple significance, if one group
existing crocodile is associated with many lost mammals and reptiles in
existing in the mind of any one at all acquainted with the subject that
existing Marsupial, but indirectly to all or nearly all Marsupials, from
exist in larger numbers, from inhabiting larger areas, will have a great
expanded flower, and are thus carried away. Dr. Cruger sent me a flower
experiment; for systematic affinity includes resemblances of all kinds.
explained, it is incredible that individuals identically the same should
explained, the larger genera also tend to break up into smaller genera.
explains a multitude of facts in the distribution of the same and of the
explains, I believe, some singular facts in nature such as that of very
explain the incipient, infinitesimal beginnings of structures which are
explain the primary cause of hybrids being so generally sterile. He will
exported to almost every quarter of the world. The improvement is by no
exposed; but with respect to the more important and adaptive characters,
exposed to uniform conditions of life. It should also be especially kept
exposes organic beings to new conditions of life and then nature acts on
exquisitely adapted for certain purposes, tells us with equal plainness
extensive that no one would ever have imagined that cattle would have so
extent, and seeing what perfectly cylindrical burrows many insects make
extent; and then she unites the points of intersection by perfectly flat
extent, becoming at the same time enveloped in thick membrane, so as to
exterminated; and the common rock-pigeon, which has the same habits with
exterminated in a correspondingly rapid manner; and the forms which thus
exterminated its original parent-form and all the transitional varieties
exterminated many native productions. He who admits the doctrine of the
exterminated, unless they also become modified and improved in structure
external appearances, actually classed an homopterous insect as a moth.
externally edged at the base with white. The wings have two black bars.
external resemblance; but such resemblances will not reveal--will rather
extinct and living species in groups subordinate to groups. Of the many
extinct at intermediate points. But the wide distribution of fresh-water
extinct beings can be classed with all recent beings, naturally follows
extinct high-reaching ruminant, which had the longest necks, legs, etc.,
extinction of old forms and the production of new and improved forms are
extraordinarily it may be developed, if it be common to a whole group of
extraordinarily severe mortality from epidemics with man. The action of
extraordinary amount of modification since the genus arose; and thus we
extraordinary combination of circumstances, appears in the parent--say,
extraordinary instinct of plastering up and imprisoning the females in a
extraordinary manner in any one species, compared with the other species
extraordinary type, namely with the bones of the second and third digits
extreme difficulty in understanding how the same species could possibly
extremely common. The chief advantages thus gained seem to be protection
extremely slow process; and the progenitors must have lived long before
eye, and a probosciformed mouth, with which they feed largely, for they
eyes, while resting on one side at the bottom. We may also attribute to
facility with which trees can be grafted on each other as incidental on
fact cannot be given than the statement by Von Baer that "the embryos of
fact of the extraordinary cases of Hippeastrum, Passiflora, etc., which
factors, the nature of the organism, which is much the most important of
facts given in this chapter do not seem to me opposed to the belief that
facts show. I removed all the ants from a group of about a dozen aphides
fact that New Zealand should have a closer resemblance in its crustacea
fact would have been highly remarkable; but it would not have formed an
failed, after consultation with one of the highest authorities, namely,
fair. We have evidence that the barren island of Ascension aboriginally
Falkland Islands and the mainland of South America. This is a wonderful
false. No one regards the external similarity of a mouse to a shrew, of
familiar with the difference between the ray and central florets of, for
families have not been found beneath a certain stage, that they did not
family to which it belonged. There is, however, some difficulty on this
F, and I) a species has transmitted modified descendants to the present
far as it is known, invariably lays its eggs in the nests of strangers;
far as Mr. Hudson has ascertained, complete a nest for themselves. They
far commoner case, two or three species in two or three alone of the six
far, higher in the scale, and their structure has generally become more
far northwards, would not in some cases be inherited for at least a few
far the hard, rocky beds had once extended into the open ocean. The same
fauna (of Barrande) may by some be considered as a comparatively modern
favourable, as previously explained, for the formation of new varieties
favourable conditions, is developed. With the barb-pigeon, for instance,
favourable means of dispersal explain this fact. I have before mentioned
favourable variations, it can produce no great or sudden modifications;
feathered feet and skin betwixt the outer toes, or between the presence
feel more sensible than I do of the necessity of hereafter publishing in
feel no surprise at sickness, but, when the sick man dies, to wonder and
feel surprise why we cannot account for the extinction of any particular
female forms and a male; and that an hermaphrodite plant should produce
females, have been observed thus to differ in a slight degree. When the
females or workers among insects, and in the immature and larval states
females while paired with the males. As soon as the female bee deposits
fertile females of the slave-species (F. fusca) are found only in their
fertilised; and in the majority of the fertilised eggs, the embryos had
fertilised. But such is not the case. They are all infertile, in various
fertilised by C. revolutum produced a plant, which I never saw to occur
fertilised by insects, and the seeds disseminated by birds. How it comes
fertilised. Now at last we see the full use of every part of the flower,
fertility affords any certain distinction between species and varieties.
fertility; and certain species in a group will produce unusually fertile
fertility of a hybrid may be independent of its external resemblance to
fertility of hybrids is not related to the degree in which they resemble
FERTILITY OF VARIETIES WHEN CROSSED, AND OF THEIR MONGREL OFFSPRING, NOT
few beings which lived long before the first bed of the Cambrian system
fewer and fewer seeds, to species which never produce a single seed, but
few favourable variations; consequently, the process of giving birth to
few flowers, and are weak, miserable dwarfs; exactly similar cases occur
Few men have attended with due care to any one strain for more than half
few new varieties or species will be formed; and it is during these very
few or no offspring. Sexual selection is, therefore, less rigorous than
few species identically the same in the northern and southern temperate
few words on what I have called sexual selection. This form of selection
Finally, I believe that many lowly organised forms now exist throughout
Finally, varieties cannot be distinguished from species--except, first,
Finally, with respect to the comparative value of the various groups of
finches, but, as not one of these breeds freely in confinement, we have
find a character nearly uniform, and common to a great number of forms,
find that so high an authority as Professor Flower has come to this same
finest graduated steps. It should also be constantly borne in mind that
finish off the angles of a cell till a large part both of that cell and
fin of the porpoise, and leg of the horse--the same number of vertebrae
first appears in the parent, it tends to reappear at a corresponding age
first appears, it tends to reappear in the offspring at a corresponding
first been used as the father and then as the mother, though they rarely
first called attention to this subject, and he has been ably followed by
first crosses and of hybrids, graduates from zero to perfect fertility.
First crosses between forms known to be varieties, or sufficiently alike
First, let it be remembered that we have innumerable instances, both in
first of one aphis and then of another; and each, as soon as it felt the
first preserved, it would generally be lost by subsequent intercrossing
first stage towards their extinction. Mountains are islands on the land;
first tendency to point was once displayed, methodical selection and the
fish and other marine animals, inhabiting the Mediterranean and the seas
fishes, and many other peculiarities, to their habits of life. We should
fishing-eagles, storks, and pelicans; these birds, after an interval of
fish on the opposite sides of most mountain-ranges, which are continuous
fitted for the inhabitants of the north, these would take the places of
fitted in the adult state for habits as different as is possible. Larvae
flatness of their bodies, and a permanent effect is thus produced on the
flat surfaces are united into a pyramid; and this pyramid, as Huber has
flexible, so that it readily yields to muscular action. It is also known
flight exclusively, so far as we know, to escape being devoured by other
floated across wide spaces of the sea, whether or not they were injured
flourishing and little persecuted kind, has a better chance of escaping
flower and then the stigma of another; but it must not be supposed that
flower or on one whole plant, and pistils alone in another flower or on
flowers; how unlike the flowers of the heartsease are, and how alike the
flowers, if humble-bees were to become rare in any country, it might be
flowers of orchids for himself will not deny the existence of the above
fluid, in some degree or manner the most nutritious, so as to partake of
fly, while the adults have lost this power. As the larger ground-feeding
foliaceous excrescences were really moss. Insects are preyed on by birds
follow as a necessary contingency. In the second place, it is almost as
follow from the insertion of a minute drop of poison by a gall-producing
following cases, which I will briefly abstract. The evidence is at least
follows, as I have attempted to show in the fourth chapter, through the
follows from their having been gradually accustomed to frequent changes
follows from the principle of natural selection. On the other hand, the
follows from this unconscious process of selection, notwithstanding that
 follow the same general rules in their appearance and disappearance as
foot of a partridge, and in the earth there was a pebble as large as the
for action, and is as immeasurably superior to man's feeble efforts, as
For Alpine species, excepting in as far as the same species have become
for a surprising number of eggs lie strewed over the plains, so that in
foregoing paragraphs, and elsewhere, several sentences which imply that
for himself, which of these Phytophagic forms ought to be called species
for instance a Ribston-pippin or Codlin-apple, could ever have proceeded
for instance, Landois has shown that the wings of insects are developed
For instance, Professor Newton sent me the leg of a red-legged partridge
for instance, the genera a1, a5, a10, f8, m3, m6, m9, were disinterred,
for instance, the sexual characters are afforded mainly by the anterior
for instance, the unequal fertility of hybrids produced from reciprocal
for instance, to a bird which obtained its food by having a much-curved
for instance, whether the Australian marsupials, which are divided into
for it is impossible to make the present domestic breeds by the crossing
for life between the inhabitants of the same pond, however few in kind,
for many hours several nests in Surrey and Sussex, and never saw a slave
formation. It is indeed manifest that multitudes of species are related
formation of the eye, with all its marvellous yet not absolutely perfect
formations of any one great region, as those of Europe, are considered;
formations probably serves as a fair measure of the relative, though not
Formations rich in fossils of many kinds, and of thickness sufficient to
formations with recent or tertiary remains can anywhere be found, though
formation, we find that the embedded fossils, though universally ranked
form; but this, if it be true, is certainly only a difference in degree.
formed, and great valleys excavated, by the agencies which we still see
formed at a remote period, since which all the many members of the class
formed; but when such organs are closely examined, essential differences
formed for the exclusive good of another species, it would annihilate my
formed, the species of the less vigorous groups, from their inferiority
former extension of the land. But I do not believe that it will ever be
formerly connected. But in making these and the following remarks, I am
formerly made seven or eight supposed species of pigeons to breed freely
formerly ranged continuously over immense areas, and then having become
former warm period. This case, however, is rendered in some degree less
form. Mr. Mivart believes that species change through "an internal force
form of the head, and on the position of the eyes. Judging from analogy,
form, or in some degree modified, apparently depends in main part on the
for most of the higher animals, but by no means so for many of the lower
forms; and so on backwards, always converging to the common ancestor of
forms, as applied to extinct animals; and in the writings of Agassiz, of
forms, as local forms, as geographical races or sub-species, and as true
forms beginning to appear at the height of about five thousand feet. On
forms can be linked together by individuals taken out of the same nest:
forms could not freely enter, we should then have places in the economy
forms. Falconer has given a striking instance of a similar fact, for an
forms have not a single character in common, yet, if these extreme forms
forms in the genus happen to have been thus destroyed, the genus itself
forms of life, and leads to what I have called divergence of character.
forms on the mountains of Europe. They might have survived, even if the
forms, which have been exposed to slightly different conditions of life,
for the bird's own advantage, the process of modification would be very
For the common progenitor of a whole family, now broken up by extinction
for the many quite distinct species inhabiting the same widely separated
for the presence of rudimentary organs, by supposing that they serve to
for the variations towards diminished size would no longer be checked by
for they cannot compete with our native plants nor resist destruction by
for undoubtedly this is for the good of the community; and maternal love
for wallowing in putridity; and so it may be, or it may possibly be due
for we have seen that they eagerly and instantly seized the pupae of F.
for we often observe great differences in the natural tendencies of our
for when the forms are illegitimately united, they yield few or no seed,
for working--for instance, on a slip of wood, placed directly under the
fossil bones made by MM. Lund and Clausen in the caves of Brazil. I was
fossiliferous formation, thick enough, when upraised, to resist a large
fossiliferous rocks. Most of the arguments which have convinced me that
fossils, connect to a certain extent orders at present widely separated
found elsewhere striking instances of which have been given by Dr. A.A.
found in abundance on shady rocks far from caves, the loss of vision in
found it difficult, when looking at any two species, to avoid picturing
found large fragments of granite and other rocks, which do not occur in
found, they must in the course of successive generations have travelled
four in size, which had been exposed for many years to exactly the same
fourteen nests of F. sanguinea, and found a few slaves in all. Males and
frame of mind, as any one may well be excused for doubting the existence
freely under domestication; yet on the hypothesis of the multiple origin
frequented by two or three distinct insectivorous birds. Here we see how
frequently that of the Rhinanthideae as of the Antirrhinideae, to which
fresh-water fish often range widely, and as if capriciously; for in two
Fritz Muller has made the remarkable discovery that certain shrimp-like
from a district where one Leptalis imitates an Ithomia, another mocking
from beneath this line, then only two of the families (those on the left
from birds of prey; and hawks are guided by eyesight to their prey,--so
from considering the entire phenomenon in any other light than something
from Dr. Hooker, it has added only two or three families of small size.
from each other, and more considerably from their common parent (A). We
from each other, by excavating at the same rate, and by endeavouring to
from forming by selection numerous domestic races, why should it prevail
from indolent habit, will have had the best chance of surviving from not
from not being very easily reared and a large stock not kept; in geese,
from our frequent inability to predict whether or not an imported plant
from structure to structure? On the theory of natural selection, we can
From the fact of the above characters being unimportant for the welfare
from the facts just given, there can hardly be a doubt that some of the
from the mere fact of the parts in question differing or varying greatly
from the occurrence of the face-stripes on this hybrid from the ass and
From these several considerations and from the many special facts which
from the victorious birds. So under nature with the nascent giraffe, the
fruit; and as all of these sank in a few days, they could not have been
Fuego, forming no inconsiderable part of its scanty flora, are common to
full number of pods. How, then, comes it that such a vast number of the
fully believe, though I dare not assert so positively, that the workers
fully persuaded that this double parallelism is by no means an accident
further change but become extinct without leaving modified descendants;
further improved through natural selection and gain further advantages.
further reduced in size until the merest vestige is left; and how can it
fusca from another nest, and put them down on a bare spot near the place
fusca); sometimes as many as three of these ants clinging to the legs of
fusca, whereas they were much terrified when they came across the pupae,
Galapagos Archipelago, situated under the equator, lies at a distance of
Galapagos Islands reptiles, and in New Zealand gigantic wingless birds,
Gartner, arrived at diametrically opposite conclusions in regard to some
Gartner further admits that hybrids between very closely allied species
Gartner further states that when any two species, although most closely
Gartner was enabled to rear some hybrids, carefully guarding them from a
genera, a14, q14, p14, will form a small family; b14 and f14, a closely
general idea of the value of the differences between them. This is what
generally be most severe between them; it will be almost equally severe
generally be to us for our classifications. The acquisition of a useless
generally between the fauna of Europe and of North America." On my view
generally eliminate this tendency; so that the domesticated descendants
generally forced to go back to recover the habitual train of thought: so
generally go on increasing in number and diverging in character. In the
generally go on multiplying in number as well as diverging in character:
generally have very wide ranges and are much diffused, but this seems to
generally in their matured structure, can be detected. The end gained is
generally quite distinct; but in some cases, as we shall hereafter see,
generated in the larger areas and more efficient workshops of the north.
generation, in opposition to the constantly repeated admonition of every
generations. After twelve generations, the proportion of blood, to use a
generations? And in this case I presume that the form would be called a
generations? If such do occur, can we doubt (remembering that many more
generations. The justice of these remarks cannot, I think, be disputed.
generations. When a character which has been lost in a breed, reappears
genera. We shall also have two very distinct genera descended from (I),
genus are found--that is, where there has been much former variation and
genus, but that the genus gives the characters, seem to imply that some
genus, but the genus gives the character; for this seems founded on the
geographical and climatical changes which have certainly occurred within
Geographical distribution has often been used, though perhaps not quite
Geographical Distribution; yet of these species a very large proportion
geological periods, the earth may have been almost as well peopled with
geological succession of organic beings accord best with the common view
geologist, if his attention had been confined exclusively to these large
geologists and palaeontologists are much shaken in their former belief.
Gervais expresses, and which cannot be placed in any existing order. The
giraffe, which serves as a fly-flapper, and, on the other hand, an organ
give a fuller abstract of Mr. Agassiz's interesting observations on the
give another instance. Pedunculated cirripedes have two minute folds of
give here only the briefest abstract of the more important facts. Change
given a far higher estimate. I have never seen an instance of nutritious
given of the varying importance for classification of the same important
given showing how quickly new breeds of cattle, sheep and other animals,
gives in his table about a score of cases of plants which he castrated,
gives only 112--a difference of 139 doubtful forms! Among animals which
giving a fixed character to the organ, in however extraordinary a manner
glacial epoch, and note how little the specific forms of the inhabitants
glacial periods, several geologists are convinced, from direct evidence,
glacial period, would have been of some avail against those who believe
glands. If all pedunculated cirripedes had become extinct, and they have
glands over the whole surface of a marsupial sack secreted a nutritious
globe, will not attempt to account for the close resemblance of distinct
gnawing away the convex side; and I suspect that the bees in such cases
goes on increasing, the organic conditions of life must become more and
good or injury of another; though it may well produce parts, organs, and
goose, in which case they would have been used both for seizing objects
governed by several curious and complex laws. It is generally different,
governed by their systematic affinity. This is clearly shown by hybrids
gradations can be specified, each of plain service to the plant. In most
gradations, do we not everywhere see innumerable transitional forms? Why
gradations, whereas species were formerly thus connected. Hence, without
grades of organisation within the same great group; for instance, in the
gradually kill the less vigorous, though fully grown plants; thus out of
graduated steps these organs have been developed in each separate group
graduate into each other. Therefore it need not be doubted that the two
grafted together, in other cases species of the same genus will not take
grafting from a hybrid between Rhod. ponticum and catawbiense, and that
grandfather or grandmother or more remote ancestor; why a peculiarity is
granted for their migration, the difficulties are far from insuperable;
great Crustacean groups. So again, it is probable, from what we know of
greater degree, to the males alone. A much more important rule, which I
greater difficulty in understanding how young mammals have instinctively
great error to suppose that the bees cannot build up a rough wall of wax
greatest number of new varieties and species. They will thus play a more
greatest number of varieties, and varieties, as we shall hereafter see,
greatest possible economy of labour and wax; that individual swarm which
great; if the principal living and extinct races of the domestic pigeon
great in external characters, and relatively so slight in internal parts
great." It is a significant fact that even in man, according to the high
great length of time to the action of sea water; nor could they be long
greatly multiplied. It cannot be said, on the ordinary view of creation,
great monsters as the Mastodon and the more ancient Dinosaurians having
great moraines at a low level on the Atlas range in North Africa. Along
great piles of superimposed strata, and watch the rivulets bringing down
great region with the native American productions, and would have had to
great valley by a single diluvial wave, so will natural selection banish
great variability is due to our domestic productions having been raised
greensand; and still more recently, that strange bird, the Archeopteryx,
grew; the plants were of many kinds, and were altogether 537 in number;
grooved pebbles. Along this whole space of the Cordillera true glaciers
group acquired a long proboscis? With respect to South Africa, which was
group of species, is continuous, and the exceptions, which are not rare,
groups; and every naturalist will be able to call such cases before his
groups; and their constancy chiefly depends on any slight deviations not
groups differing but little from each other, and feebly representing, as
groups, in which the same organ, as we have every reason to suppose, has
 groups--Morphology, between members of the same class, between parts of
groups of species become extinct accords well with the theory of natural
groups of species gradually disappear, one after another, first from one
Groups of species, that is, genera and families, follow the same general
groups. The more aberrant any form is, the greater must be the number of
groups, the objection is probably valid. But in a natural classification
group will sometimes resist great changes of conditions with unimpaired
grow the more habitually they rest on one side, owing to the increasing
growth of the tree, many a limb and branch has decayed and dropped off;
Gunther has recently shown that about thirty per cent of the fishes are
Gunther, who has seen a mouse thus suspend itself. If the harvest mouse
habit and general appearance, and having strongly marked differences in
habits and structure not in agreement. What can be plainer than that the
had been exclusively fitted to inhabit the land, and another the water;
had naturally possessed a proboscis, it might have been argued that this
had no historical or indirect evidence regarding their origin, it would
had only fourteen tail-feathers somewhat expanded, like the present Java
had their organs more specialised for different functions. This fact is
hair on the breast of the wild turkey-cock cannot be of any use, and it
hall of the above dimensions. Several eminent breeders, during a single
hand, the fact that instincts are not always absolutely perfect and are
hard earth adhering to it, and weighing six and a half ounces. The earth
hardest beaks, for all with weak beaks would inevitably perish: or, more
hardly a single inhabitant of the southern hemisphere has become wild in
hardly be able to say whether the present or the pleistocene inhabitants
hardly be quite unimportant. We shall, also, presently see that the tail
hardly last to a distant geological age, was deposited during a downward
has a short and conical beak, with a line of reversed feathers down the
has been already said on the probable wide intervals of time between our
has been independently created--is erroneous. I am fully convinced that
has been suggested that the drooping is due to disuse of the muscles of
has been taken advantage of and increased through natural selection. It
has been unconsciously used; and thus only can I understand the several
has elsewhere undergone. Therefore a man should examine for himself the
has lately been asserted that two such distinct species as the hare and
has lately maintained that this island, as well as New Caledonia, should
has not become colonised by the Porto Santo species: nevertheless, both
has not been wholly obliterated, either by successive variations having
has not seen, as I am informed by him, any native dog in Spain like our
has often been interrupted, and as long blank intervals have intervened
has shown, another organ near the head, not known to be electrical, but
has varied. But whenever we have the means of instituting a comparison,
has well remarked, in his great and admirable work, that floras gain by
hatched; and as the latter at this age is in a most helpless condition,
have affected wide spaces. Consequently, formations rich in fossils and
have afforded us plain evidence of the mutation of species, if they had
have arisen? Mr. Herbert Spencer would probably answer that, as soon as
have attempted to show how important a part the last Glacial period has
have a uniform character: and the breed may be said to be degenerating.
have been acquired through natural selection. In many cases complex and
have been ascertained with certainty of hybrids from two quite distinct
have been better for the bad swimmers if they had not been able to swim
have been closely allied to the indigenes; for these are commonly looked
have been considerably modified; and a third edition would require still
have been experimented on have been produced under domestication; and as
have been formed by transitional gradations of some kind. Numerous cases
have been formed over wide spaces during periods of subsidence, but only
have been imported from America since its discovery. In such cases, and
have been inferred that they had lived during one of the later tertiary
have been made by Mr. H.C. Watson on European species of plants brought
have been observed on the eastern side of the continent, as far south as
have been recorded in botanical works. Hence it is the most flourishing,
have been rendered utterly impotent on a second form, while at the same
have been subjected to severe competition. When converted by subsidence
have been thus affected, of which fact several instances could be given.
have called leaf-climbers, and to those provided with tendrils. In these
have chosen the extreme species (A), and the nearly extreme species (I),
have even carried brushwood, bones, and the nest of a land-bird, it can
have given in another work a long list of "sporting plants;" as they are
have happened that a new species belonging to some one group has seized
have its seeds more and more widely disseminated by the wind, I can see
have learned to pick up grains of food. In such cases the most probable
have marvelled more than I have done at the extinction of species. When
have no ovigerous frena, the eggs lying loose at the bottom of the sack,
have no varieties directly intermediate between the fantail and pouter;
have now been discussed. One, namely, the distinctness of specific forms
have profited the progenitors of the hive-bee? I think the answer is not
have ranged widely within the same country, and as the sea is apparently
have seen that man by selection can certainly produce great results, and
have suspected how poor was the record in the best preserved geological
have the best chance of producing favourable variations within any given
have the best chance of surviving and of leaving offspring. Some of its
have to return. I may add, that, according to Mr. Pierce, there are two
have undergone far more metamorphic action than strata which have always
having as certainly descended from the same progenitor, as have the two
having been accumulated by natural and sexual selection, and thus having
having been sufficient since our planet was consolidated for the assumed
having long competed with each other in their old home, were to migrate
having once existed as halting-places, of which not a wreck now remains,
having performed at the same time the same function, the one having been
having the advantageous modification, all the neuters ultimately came to
head, for it is necessary to suppose in some cases that ancient members
head, in the plants which are dominant, that is, which are commonest and
heads: First, why, if species have descended from other species by fine
heads, the use of which is quite unknown: in the Mexican Myrmecocystus,
health, and is often accompanied by excess of size or great luxuriance.
hear the agencies which we see still at work, spoken of as trifling and
heat and cold, on mountain and lowland, on deserts and marshes, most of
he has seen the young of this species following old birds of a distinct
helpless are the masters, that when Huber shut up thirty of them without
hemisphere rendered warmer; and then the southern temperate forms would
Hence I look at individual differences, though of small interest to the
Hence the reproductive system of this one variety must have been in some
Hence we can see that when a plant or animal is placed in a new country,
Hence we may confidently assert that all plants and animals are tending
he points to aid his master, than the white butterfly knows why she lays
her, as is implied by the fact of their selection. Man keeps the natives
Herbert's great horticultural skill, and by his having hot-houses at his
Hereafter we shall be compelled to acknowledge that the only distinction
Here, as on other occasions, I lie under a heavy disadvantage, for, out
her eggs on the surface of the honey stored in the cells, the larvae of
Here we see that cattle absolutely determine the existence of the Scotch
hermaphrodites having the ordinary structure, or into what I have called
He who believes that each being has been created as we now see it, must
He who believes that some ancient form was transformed suddenly through
He who is acquainted with the distribution of existing species over the
hexagonal; but I have not space here to enter on this subject. Nor does
hexagonal walls. These walls, as Professor Miller has kindly ascertained
higher law; as it includes, through the inheritance of former variations
highest degree that their common progenitor should have been adapted for
highest fish; others look at the teleosteans as the highest. The ganoids
high importance has frequently been retained (as the tail of an aquatic
highly attractive to insects, they would, unintentionally on their part,
highly developed than at present; but a stronger case can be made out on
highly important, and have treated in my "Variation under Domestication"
highly improved branches in the lines of descent, will, it is probable,
highly peculiar and isolated flora. It may be suspected that before this
Hilaire has forcibly remarked that certain malconformations frequently,
his main divisions in the order on such characters. Hence modifications
his supposed hybridised seed, and he would find that the seedlings were
historian, "His Majesty, by crossing the breeds, which method was never
history of each species, and of the conditions which at the present day
history of "Natura non facit saltum." We meet with this admission in the
history. The metamorphoses of insects, with which every one is familiar,
history we possess the last volume alone, relating only to two or three
hive-bees. I do not know whether this statement is accurate; nor whether
hole in a tree, with only a small hole left in the plaster through which
holes and sucking the nectar at the bases of certain flowers, which with
homologous. He proposes to call the structures which resemble each other
Homologous parts, as has been remarked by some authors, tend to cohere;
hooked seed might be carried to an island by other means; and the plant
hooked seeds; yet few relations are more manifest than that hooks serve
Hooker and Asa Gray have well remarked, by man; he can neither originate
Hooker has shown that in the Galapagos Islands the proportional numbers
Hooker on widely separated mountains in this island tell the same story
horns are correlated. Mountain breeds always differ from lowland breeds;
horns of our sheep and cattle when nearly adult; so in a state of nature
horse genus. Rollin asserts that the common mule from the ass and horse
horse's life, and in what degree they severally acted. If the conditions
horse still existing as a rare species, we might have felt certain, from
How a nerve comes to be sensitive to light, hardly concerns us more than
how different the leaves of the cabbage are, and how extremely alike the
how diversified are the means of occasional transport, I have discussed
however, in the successive generations of mongrels is, perhaps, greater
however, probable that the two sorts of flowers borne by the same plant
however slight a degree to the surrounding physical conditions, will, in
How inexplicable are the cases of serial homologies on the ordinary view
how life itself originated; but I may remark that, as some of the lowest
how species of different classes do not necessarily change together, or
How, then, can we explain these several facts in embryology--namely, the
how the several members of each class are connected together by the most
how troublesome it is to get seed from a few wheat or other such plants
Huber expresses it, often comes into play, even with animals low in the
Huber's statement, that the very first cell is excavated out of a little
Hudson is a strong disbeliever in evolution, but he appears to have been
humble-bee if a slight modification of her instincts led her to make her
hybrid Rhododendrons, which produce no pollen, for he will find on their
hybrids from the common and Chinese geese (A. cygnoides), species which
 hybrids--Sterility various in degree, not universal, affected by close
Hymenopterous insects are terrestrial, excepting the genus Proctotrupes,
I am aware that Colonel Hamilton Smith, who has written on this subject,
I am well aware that this doctrine of natural selection, exemplified in
(I), and the eight descendants from (A), will have to be ranked as very
I believe that this is the case, and that community of descent--the one
identical form ever reappears. The strongest apparent exception to this
identically the same; for both would almost certainly inherit different
identical species are still common to both. Wherever many closely allied
I examined had been effectually fertilised by the bees, which had flown
If about a dozen genera of birds were to become extinct, who would have
if an insect, undergoing transformations like those of the Sitaris, were
If, for instance, a bird of some kind could procure its food more easily
if man goes on selecting, and thus augmenting, any peculiarity, he will
if one ear flops forward and downward, its weight drags forward all the
if rendered slightly sterile when crossed with some other variety, would
If then there be some degree of truth in these remarks, we have no right
if the number of species in any country becomes indefinitely increased,
If the plants inhabiting a country as described in any Flora, be divided
if they have been for a long period completely sundered from each other;
if they serve, at least in part, as a means of defence. Mr. Agassiz, to
if we look to past times, and compare the species which have just passed
if we reflect on the vast diversity of the plants and animals which have
if we travel over the vast American continent, from the central parts of
If we turn to nature to test the truth of these remarks, and look at any
ignorant; we cannot even attribute them, as in the last class of cases,
ignorant with respect to the conditions which determine the numbers and
ignore all general arguments, and refuse to sum up in their minds slight
illustration, but which, I hope, in most cases will suffice. No one can
ILLUSTRATIONS OF THE ACTION OF NATURAL SELECTION, OR THE SURVIVAL OF THE
I may give another instance, which, from having passed under my own eyes
I may here recall a remark formerly made, namely, that it might require
imbricate or valvular aestivation. Any one of these characters singly is
imitator living remote from the form which it imitates. The mockers are
immediately surrounding sea; or, conversely, that some are now abundant
immense amount of inherited variation; for who will believe that animals
immense period. It is inexplicable on the theory of creation why a part
immense prices were given for pigeons; "nay, they are come to this pass,
immersion of twenty-eight days; and as 18/94 distinct species with ripe
imperfectly developed, the case is somewhat different. I have more than
imperfect; that only a small portion of the globe has been geologically
implied by such metaphorical expressions; and they are almost necessary
implies a great displacement of lower forms, as a decided advance in the
implies a long continued previous period of less advanced civilisation,
importance, as they yield with the utmost safety a large stock of seed,
importance for the young cuckoo, as is probably the case, to receive as
importance--the wide opposition in value between analogical or adaptive
importance to the greater number of mammals, birds, or reptiles, whether
important, for they prove that the capacity in any two species to cross
important part, happens to be nearly identical; no one puts the Swedish
important parts of structure, which he could collect on good authority,
important part, so that when one part has been modified other parts have
important. Something, but how much we do not know, may be attributed to
important step towards the formation of a true, picture-forming eye; for
important: the crops of birds do not secrete gastric juice, and do not,
improbability of our being enabled to connect species by numerous, fine,
improbability of such a tendency being transmitted through a vast number
improved and intermediate varieties; and thus species are rendered to a
improved, they would slowly spread and supplant their parent-forms. When
improved, will be able to spread over the open and continuous area, and
improvement. The main cause, however, of innumerable intermediate links
improve the breed, and they formerly did so, as is attested by passages
I much regret that want of space prevents my having the satisfaction of
I must request the reader to turn to the diagram in the fourth chapter.
in about a quarter of an hour, shortly after all the little yellow ants
in a case of its natural fecundation." So that here we have perfect, or
inactivity of parts, during the progress of the reduction of the pollen
in a foreign land; why one species ranges twice or thrice as far, and is
in a future chapter, in an extremely imperfect and intermittent record.
in a greater degree; but this alone would never account for so habitual
in a narrow and intermediate zone. For forms existing in larger numbers
in an extraordinary degree or manner are more variable than other parts
in Anglesea of 2,300 feet; and he informs me that he fully believes that
in an innate and necessary law of development, but is powerless against
In another and more general manner, new species become superior to their
in another work he says, the genera of the Connaraceae "differ in having
in answer that the voice, which is certainly of high importance to many
in a wild state. In many cases we do not know what the aboriginal stock
In both cases the sterility occurs in various degrees; in both, the male
in certain cases, with species having a peculiar constitution, sterility
in certain parts of Spain and of the United States this animal has been
in certain parts of the United States, about nine out of ten mules have
In certain whole groups of plants the ovules stand erect, and in others
in character are not the oldest or the most recent; nor are those which
incipient tendency to grasp could preserve the lives of the individuals
in close sequence. Scarcely any fact struck me more when examining many
included, from one between brown and black to a close approach to cream
included within a genus, or the number of the genera within a family, be
included zooid, could hardly have disappeared at once. In many cases the
includes the hind-legs, we perhaps see traces of an apparatus originally
including several species; and the whole of the genera along this upper
including the whole glacial epoch) were compared with those now existing
in comparison with these organs in other countries, is probably another
in consequence vary. In several cases, however, insects found living on
In considering transitions of organs, it is so important to bear in mind
increased use and disuse of parts, which I have always maintained to be
increase immensely in numbers, were it not for other competing species;
Increase so high as to lead to a Struggle for Life, and as a consequence
increasing (the country not undergoing any change in conditions) only by
incredible; but it is the result of an astonishing number of experiments
incredible that, from some such low and intermediate form, both animals
incredible. With plants having separated sexes, and with those in which,
indeed is shown by that old, but somewhat exaggerated, canon in natural
indefinitely increased, geology plainly tells us; and we shall presently
indefinite number of specific forms. As far as mere inorganic conditions
independently created, with all its parts as we now see them, I can see
Independently of the question of fertility, in all other respects there
in determining the degree of affinity of this strange creature to birds.
Indians in a war-dance, for the possession of the females; male salmons
India, on the heights of Ceylon, and on the volcanic cones of Java, many
indicated, have probably interfered with the acquisition through natural
indigenes, we must believe, that if all the animals and plants of Great
individual and to the species, of endeavouring to look upward with both
individual, and who was himself a very good judge of animals, speaks of
individual differences in his domesticated productions. These individual
individuals, and more widely diffused. But if the conferva or parasitic
individuals are born than can possibly survive) that individuals having
individuals be capable of there supporting themselves. A set of animals,
individuals must always (with the exception of the curious and not well
individuals of many kinds; and may we not believe that a living optical
individuals of the same species, and all the species of the same genus,
Individuals of the same species often present, as is known to every one,
individuals of the same species, though the males and females and larvae
individuals of the same species, which differ to a certain extent, gives
individuals, which have already ceased to yield seeds; so that this acme
individuals, which have already triumphed over many competitors in their
individuals which produced more and more pollen, and had larger anthers,
individuals which were the highest browsers and were able during dearths
individual under its conditions of life, it may reasonably be asked, how
in due proportion, otherwise the weaker kinds will steadily decrease in
in each country would oftener present varieties, than the species of the
in every possible way by his large stores of knowledge and his excellent
inference be presumptuous? Have we any right to assume that the Creator
infer from most of the innumerable species throughout nature presenting
inferior quality. I have seen great surprise expressed in horticultural
infertility of species and the fertility of varieties when intercrossed;
in flocks, and sometimes to pair. They either build a nest of their own
influential: a narrow isthmus now separates two marine faunas; submerge
informs me that a Dyticus has been caught with an Ancylus (a fresh-water
inhabitants. And such new places will depend on slow changes of climate,
inhabitants can be raised only to the rank of doubtful species. So it is
inhabitants might be better fitted to their new places under the altered
 inhabitants of any small area and to naturalisation--Action of Natural
inhabitants of islands and the nearest mainland, is sometimes displayed
inhabitants of the Old and New Worlds lived further southwards than they
inhabitants of the world could be put into competition with the existing
inhabited by bats and seals, but by no terrestrial mammals; yet as some
inhabited the almost continuous circumpolar land; and that these plants
inhabiting one region are different from those of another region, though
inhabiting the seas on the eastern and western shores of North America,
inheritance from a common progenitor. Therefore, we must suppose either
inherited and have not varied, to natural selection having more or less
inherited at a corresponding period, we can understand the leading facts
inherited for long periods. As long as the conditions of life remain the
inherited from a common progenitor, tend to become extinct together, and
in his excellent treatise on the horse, has given a figure of a similar
in hybrids. In the case of first crosses, the greater or less difficulty
in La Plata, New Zealand, and to a lesser degree in Australia, and have
in large numbers in Africa, and as some of the largest antelopes in the
in many cases how to rank them--yet certainly differ far less from each
in many other cases, Gartner is obliged carefully to count the seeds, in
in many others, is apparently wholly due to symmetry of growth. Flowers
inner and outer flowers. It might have been thought that the development
inner flowers in some Compositous and Umbelliferous plants. Everyone is
in number. But the real importance of a large number of eggs or seeds is
innumerable complex co-adaptations of structure, which we see throughout
innumerable instances are known to every naturalist, of species keeping
innumerable periods in the earth's history certain elemental atoms have
in other parts of the organisation which have remained for a much longer
In plants the same gradual process of improvement through the occasional
In regard to plants, there is another means of observing the accumulated
in regard to the plants of that large island. Hence, we see that certain
In regard to the sterility of hybrids in successive generations; though
In regard to the sterility of hybrids, in which the sexual elements are
in removing a little duck-weed from one aquarium to another, that I have
insect--between insects, snails, and other animals with birds and beasts
Insectivora. An extremely wide flank-membrane stretches from the corners
insects and of the wind with plants, by which an occasional cross could
insects flitting about, and with worms crawling through the damp earth,
insects green, and bark-feeders mottled-grey; the alpine ptarmigan white
insect, shows us what singular modifications might result in the case of
insects that pollen was regularly carried from flower to flower, another
insisted on by Dr. Carpenter, progressed in organisation since even the
in size, colour, shape, and hairiness, and yet the flowers present very
in some cases has sufficed; hardly any animal is more difficult to tame
in some degree plastic. But the variability, which we almost universally
in some detail. Changes of level in the land must also have been highly
in some other respects; and as in each of the three forms there are two
in so mysterious a manner, and are likewise linked to the extinct beings
In South America, Dr. Hooker has shown that besides many closely allied
instance, by Agassiz, Pictet, and Sedgwick, as a fatal objection to the
instance, in Lobelia fulgens, there is a really beautiful and elaborate
instance: in the last edition of Dr. Asa Gray's "Manual of the Flora of
instance, of two long-styled forms, which results in sterility; while it
instances are given in Isidore Geoffroy St. Hilaire's great work on this
instances could be given of various shades of disposition and taste, and
instances occur in nature. Can a more striking instance of adaptation be
instance, that several species appear somewhat earlier in the palaeozoic
instance, the canary-bird has been crossed with nine distinct species of
instance, the comb in the Dorking fowl) or the whole breed will cease to
instance, upheaved and formed at the distance of a few hundreds of miles
instincts already possessed by the Melipona, and in themselves not very
instincts and by inherited organs or tools, while man works by acquired
instincts as perfect as those of the cuckoo, for it never lays more than
instincts. But I believe that the effects of habit are in many cases of
instinct with habit. This comparison gives, I think, an accurate notion
insuperable difficulty, unless it could likewise have been shown that at
intently watching each slight alteration in the transparent layers; and
intercrossing of distinct individuals of the same species. When distinct
interesting; for supposing that all the species provided with avicularia
interior of Africa who have not associated with Europeans. Some of these
intermediate between them ever existed, but between each and an unknown
intermediate conditions of life, why do we not now find closely-linking
intermediate gradations, partly because the process of natural selection
intermediate links any two forms, he treats the one as a variety of the
intermediate only by a long and circuitous course through other extinct
intermediate torrid regions. In the admirable "Introduction to the Flora
intermediate varieties? This difficulty for a long time quite confounded
intermediate zones, would be liable to be supplanted by the allied forms
internal condition, as are the flowers and leaves in certain positions,
interrupted. Nor will the closest inspection of a formation give us any
intervals in the natural system, and thus to unite distinct families or
In the case of a large tree covered with innumerable flowers, it may be
In the case of every species, many different checks, acting at different
In the case of methodical selection, a breeder selects for some definite
In the case of the European cuckoo, the offspring of the foster-parents
in the case of the Molothrus bonariensis, has not as yet been perfected;
in the closest manner to other species that still exist, or have lately
In the diagram I have assumed that a second species (I) has produced, by
in the earliest states exceedingly like one another, both as a whole and
in the economy of nature, and likewise to fit the two sexes of the same
in the father and child, we cannot tell whether it may not be due to the
In the first place, I have collected so large a body of facts, and made
In the first place we should be extremely cautious in inferring, because
In the foregoing cases, we see the same end gained and the same function
In the frigate-bird, the deeply scooped membrane between the toes shows
In the genus Hippeastrum, in Corydalis as shown by Professor Hildebrand,
in the great majority of cases is an early one. If an animal can in any
in the manner which we everywhere behold--namely, varieties of the same
in the mode of development of their parts; so much so, in fact, that we
in the one without an immediate corresponding change in the other would
in the plumed seed which is wafted by the gentlest breeze; in short, we
in the proper position--that is, along the plane of intersection between
in the relative lengths of all their parts may be seen in many works of
in the same individual, and not of the same parts or organs in different
In the same manner as in grafting trees, the capacity in one species or
in the scale, which do not propagate sexually, nor conjugate, and which
in these numbers, and the comparison in some other respects is not quite
in the shape of the pelvis causes the remarkable diversity in the shape
In the skeletons of the several breeds, the development of the bones of
in the temperate parts of both hemispheres, and on the mountains of the
in the third volume of the Journal of that Society. Sir C. Lyell and Dr.
in the well-sifted London catalogue of Plants (4th edition) sixty-three
in the wild parent species, in pouters, fantails, runts, barbs, dragons,
In this case, natural selection would tend to add to the stature of the
in this case the several formations in the two regions could be arranged
intimately connected together. The old notion of all the inhabitants of
into each other, as does the widely-different structure of their jaws. I
into each other. Instances, also, could be given of this having occurred
into each other. Now bees, as may be clearly seen by examining the edge
into groups. But with organic beings the case is different, and the view
into layers of different densities and thicknesses, placed at different
into one; but more commonly bringing them only a little closer together.
into one like the common duck--and, lastly, into one like the shoveller,
into operation by an increase in the eccentricity of the earth's orbit.
into slightly hotter or colder, damper or drier districts. In this case
into them only when they are charged with sand or pebbles; for there is
introduced a single slave (F. fusca), and she instantly set to work, fed
introduction by the Spaniards into South America, has run wild over the
intrude for a period in the midst of an older formation, and then allow
inutility, are extremely common, or even general, throughout nature. It
invade the equatorial lowlands. The northern forms which had before been
invariably fertile when intercrossed. But it is impossible to resist the
invertebrate animals, if judged by the most decisive of all trials--the
invertebrate classes. But mammals and fish hardly come into competition
involucra on the florets, or to their mutual pressure, and the shape of
in which species the baleen is only nine inches long; so that if we were
in which they differ from allied genera, are called generic characters;
I request the reader to turn to the diagram illustrating the action, as
irritability or elasticity. From such structures we may advance till we
is a highly useful prehensile organ to some of the species; and its use
is almost useless. It is, however, an error to suppose that there would
is, also, some probability in the view propounded by Andrew Knight, that
is apparently the same in Orchis and Asclepias, genera almost as remote
is, as I have myself observed, with some dimorphic plants. It certainly
is constantly suffering enormous destruction at some period of its life,
is doubtful whether it can be ornamental in the eyes of the female bird;
I see no reason to limit the process of modification, as now explained,
is equally or more important, we shall see how great is the power of man
is extremely common for distinct species belonging to the same genus to
I shall have to recur; but it may be here remarked that most animals and
I shall here confine myself to plants. In botanical works, this or that
is hardly a tribe so barbarous as not to have domesticated at least the
I should premise that I use this term in a large and metaphorical sense,
is, however, probable, from reasons which I have assigned in my memoir,
is, if the genera of animals are as distinct from each other as are the
island in the torrid zones. Hence adaptation to any special climate may
islands; and we see an instance of this, even in England, in the greater
islands are likewise opposed to the belief of their former continuity of
islands are sufficiently ancient, as shown by the stupendous degradation
islands, between the Galapagos and Cape Verde Archipelagos: but what an
Islands consist of a variety so well marked, that it was formerly ranked
islands have been stocked by occasional means of transport--a seed, for
islands. I freely admit the former existence of many islands, now buried
islands. In the following remarks I shall not confine myself to the mere
islands; thus there are three closely allied species of mocking-thrush,
is larger on the exposed Desertas than in Madeira itself; and especially
is likewise sometimes the case with those which may strictly be said to
is manifest from several species, such as soles, flounders, etc., being
is meant by this system? Some authors look at it merely as a scheme for
is modified, so will be other parts, through certain dimly seen causes,
is no difficulty in supposing that such links formerly existed, and that
is no more reason to think that species have been specially endowed with
is not all nature in confusion, instead of the species being, as we see
is nothing in the external conditions of life to cause the reappearance
is nothing on the surface of the land to show such prodigious movements;
is notorious that breeders of cattle, horses and various fancy animals,
is nourished and protected by its parent, whether most of its characters
is now as tender as ever it was! The case, also, of the kidney-bean has
is obvious in the structure of the teeth and talons of the tiger; and in
is, of course, open to any one to deny that the eye in either case could
isolated region, are in all probability descended from the same parents.
is probably a case of reversion to the long-lost, aboriginal instinct of
is stated, for instance, that certain South American indigenous domestic
is still more important, especially for the production of species which
is the fact, insisted on by all palaeontologists, that fossils from two
is the general rule that the area inhabited by a single species, or by a
I suspect, also, that some of the cases of compensation which have been
is visited by humble-bees alone; so that whole fields of the red clover
is well known to furriers that animals of the same species have thicker
it also in the birds of the caves of Brazil. Mr. Woodward has shown that
it; and when the bucket is half-full, the water overflows by a spout on
it could not be used by the fish while lying in its habitual position on
it ever ceases, for new varieties are still occasionally produced by our
it exhibits no modification in structure in accordance with its abnormal
it has certainly been more attended to of late years, and many treatises
It has often been asked, if natural selection be so potent, why has not
It has often been assumed that man has chosen for domestication animals
I then put into the hive, instead of a thick, rectangular piece of wax,
Ithomia abounds in gaudy swarms, another butterfly, namely, a Leptalis,
It is also a most favourable circumstance for the production of distinct
It is also natural that the dominant, varying and far-spreading species,
It is a remarkable fact, that the secondary differences between the two
It is commonly assumed, perhaps from monstrosities affecting the embryo
it is explained how genera originate under nature, it will be seen that
It is generally acknowledged that all organic beings have been formed on
It is immaterial for us whether a multitude of doubtful forms be called
It is no real objection to the truth of the statement that the fauna of
it is not possible to come to any definite conclusion, whether they are
It is no valid objection that science as yet throws no light on the far
it is probable that strictly contemporaneous formations have often been
It is scarcely possible that the above slight movements, due to a touch
It is, therefore, of the highest importance to gain a clear insight into
it is with the music of birds. We may infer from all this that a nearly
it may at least be asserted that the record cannot be proved to be much
It may be worth notice that when Wagner's remarkable discovery was first
It may be worth while to illustrate some of the foregoing remarks. With
It may metaphorically be said that natural selection is daily and hourly
it, might be modified to any extent by natural selection; for instance,
it must here be alluded to from being intimately connected with natural
it not powerfully suggestive of true relationship, of inheritance from a
it occupied by somewhat different species in the different islands, and
it, or let it formerly have been submerged, and the two faunas will now
its allies, in several of its most important characteristics, and yet be
its attempted arrangement, with the grades of acquired difference marked
it seems to me that nothing is thus added to our knowledge. Expressions
it seems to stand in some close relation to species having been exposed
itself the conditions of life are changed. If it could be shown that our
its new home, we should have to modify it in a different way to what we
its possessor, as is certainly the case; if further, the eye ever varies
its spheres at some given distance from each other, and had made them of
it thus makes some approach to ordinary hoofed quadrupeds, to which the
it will almost universally be found recorded. These varieties, moreover,
it would be necessary that they should first have acquired the power of
it would simply be ranked as a third and distinct species, unless at the
I will devote this chapter to the consideration of various miscellaneous
I will not attempt any definition of instinct. It would be easy to show
I will not here enter on minute details on this subject, but will merely
I will now give a few examples to illustrate the foregoing remarks, and
jaws and limbs, varying together, for the lower jaw is believed by some
Jurassic and Triassic forms are now commonly admitted to be teleostean;
keeping of equal thickness for a space, and ultimately thins out in the
kind of classification; but it is explained through inheritance and the
kind of unconscious selection going on. We see the value set on animals
kinds of animals which live on the beach between high and low water mark
kinds of enemies, cannot be withdrawn, owing to the backward serratures,
kingdom. I believe that animals are descended from at most only four or
Kirby has remarked (and I have observed the same fact) that the anterior
known in the world, as the Ornithorhynchus and Lepidosiren, which, like
know not exactly what the checks are even in a single instance. Nor will
Kolreuter. We shall presently see its importance; but I must here treat
labour, he emphatically remarks: "They are mistaken, who repeat that the
labourious series of experiments that if all the individuals of the same
land, it might have been thought that fresh-water productions would not
land-shells have often been thus transported; the feet of birds offer a
Lankester has recently discussed this subject, and he concludes, as far
large amount of hereditary modification is at least possible; and, what
large amount of modification during the long and blank intervals between
large areas; and what is more important, that the new forms produced on
largely gnawed away on both sides. The manner in which the bees build is
large number of eggs is of some importance to those species which depend
larger from correlation with the beak, or from any other unknown cause,
large rivers, we find different productions; though as mountain chains,
larger proportional number of dominant species. But so many causes tend
larvae of ichneumonidae feeding within the live bodies of caterpillars,
larvae of most insects pass through a worm-like stage, whether they are
larvae of other insects within the same order, according to their habits
last the base of the cliff is undermined, huge fragments fall down, and
lately inhabited several oceanic islands, tenanted by no beasts of prey,
lately insisted on by Dr. Falconer, namely, that the period during which
latent tendency in each generation to produce blue plumage. The abstract
later geological epochs, so that, looking to later times, we may believe
latitudes, for instance, in South America, the inhabitants of the plains
latter chapters of this volume, seemed to throw some light on the origin
lava-streams, due to their formerly liquid state, showed at a glance how
laying a large number of eggs, but, as with the cuckoo, at intervals of
lead us onward to the enormous plates of baleen in the Greenland whale.
leaf, and that it varied slightly in many ways, then all the variations
learned to suck the breast, than in understanding how unhatched chickens
leaves, dead twigs, bits of lichen, flowers, spines, excrement of birds,
leaves; how much the fruit of the different kinds of gooseberries differ
leave us in no doubt where it should be ranked. Hence, also, it has been
leaving such degraded beings better fitted for their new walks of life.
left behind them the sloth, armadillo, and anteater, as their degenerate
left untouched by the other hoofed quadrupeds of the country, would have
legs in the other--have actually been converted into skulls or jaws. Yet
legs like a zebra, or striped on the shoulders like an ass. In the horse
less common forms, for these will be more slowly modified and improved.
lessen the number of the navel-frequenting flies--then cattle and horses
lesser area; and practically, as far as I can make out, this rule holds
less importance. The value indeed of an aggregate of characters is very
less improved varieties in the same neighbourhood; when much improved it
less modified, leading to their mutual infertility, we do not know; but
less rigid than ordinary selection, and to variations in the same parts
let other competing rodents or new beasts of prey immigrate, or old ones
letters in a word, still retained in the spelling, but become useless in
Let us now briefly consider the steps by which domestic races have been
Let us now look to the mutual affinities of extinct and living species.
level, of the force of elevation. But may not the areas of preponderant
level, which must have intervened during these enormously long periods.
liability to wide dispersal would follow from this capacity as an almost
liable to mistakes; that no instinct can be shown to have been produced
liable to vary in the degree of their development and in other respects.
life have changed very slowly, enormous periods of time having been thus
life in our geological formations supports at first sight the belief in
life, it is clear that each must be well adapted to its place in nature.
life. Mere size, on the contrary, would in some cases determine, as has
light greyhound-like form, which pursues deer, and the other more bulky,
light on the origin of rudimentary organs in a state of nature, further
like a kestrel, and at other times standing stationary on the margin of
likely to yield offspring, which, though in some slight degree modified,
like that of a finch; and the common tumbler has the singular inherited
like that of the English carrier, or that of the short-faced tumbler, or
likewise admit that all the organic beings which have ever lived on this
likewise compatible with some forms having retrograded in organisation,
likewise of the oddest tricks, associated with certain frames of mind or
limb still serves as an organ of locomotion. We next find one corner of
limestone caverns under a nearly similar climate; so that, in accordance
limited in their ranges by the competition of other organic beings quite
limits of the same species by the improper union of certain forms, while
line is composed of one and the same formation, while our sea-cliffs are
line of argument seems to have had great weight in leading Fritz Muller
line of the Cordillera, it at one time appeared to me that we could not
lines; and stripes or spots can be plainly distinguished in the whelp of
lines of descent diverging from the parent form (A) will form an order;
Lingula, etc., do not differ much from living species; and it cannot on
linked together by generation. We can clearly see why the remains of an
links, and the extreme links of the chain closely resemble the two forms
links in the long lines of descent, yet admit that many of our domestic
Linum--plants which do not climb and are widely separated in the natural
list he has omitted many trifling varieties, but which nevertheless have
little groups of species are generally clustered like satellites around
little identity, between the productions of North America and Europe--a
little improved structures, fitted for simple conditions of life; it is
little in understanding how species arise in nature. How have all those
little liable to have their reproductive powers injuriously affected by
little points of horn on the palate; and it seems to be quite within the
living creatures, has lasted long enough. Sir W. Thompson concludes that
living shells may still be found in the midst of a multitude of extinct
locomotion the tail is in most aquatic animals, its general presence and
long ago extinct. The wing of the penguin is of high service, acting as
long; and when we remember over what vast spaces some naturalised plants
long catalogue of dry facts ought to be given; but these I shall reserve
long-enduring conditions, often of a peculiar nature, are necessary for
longer time for action. Nor do I believe that any great physical change,
long intervals of time, to appear as if they had changed simultaneously
long-lived, as we see in the case of the common mule. Hybrids, however,
long winter it leaves the frozen waters, and preys, like other polecats
look at climate and the physical conditions of life as the all-important
look at each species as a special act of creation, there is no apparent
look at the entire absence of the anterior tarsi in Ateuchus, and their
Look at the family of squirrels; here we have the finest gradation from
looked at as ancient sea-coasts, cannot have been thus formed, for each
look to some unknown plan of creation, we may hope to make sure but slow
lost all traces of its parentage in this case, its place in the natural
lower jaw or mandible. In one species observed by me, all the avicularia
lowest Cambrian stratum was deposited long periods elapsed, as long as,
lowlands. So it is with the inhabitants of lakes and marshes, excepting
lowlands under the equator, would have been driven to their former homes
lowlands, would naturally be forced to hunt different prey; and from the
lowness here means that the several parts of the organisation have been
m14, will be nearly related one to the other, but, from having diverged
Macleay and others. The resemblance in the shape of the body and in the
Madeira; and between the extinct and living brackish water-shells of the
made them wider and wider until they were converted into shallow basins,
made these few remarks on trees simply to call attention to the subject.
magpie, so wary in England, is tame in Norway, as is the hooded crow in
mainland. I hear from Mr. Tomes, who has specially studied this family,
mainland. We can clearly see why all the inhabitants of an archipelago,
maintain itself in a body and afterward spread, so that the individuals
major) alluded to in a previous chapter; this bird often holds the seeds
make its nest--I believe that the hive-bee has acquired, through natural
make their cells of the proper shape, by standing at the proper distance
making reciprocal crosses is extremely common in a lesser degree. He has
Malacca, and are thinly scattered on the one hand over India, and on the
Malay Archipelago, with its numerous large islands separated by wide and
male and female birds, in comparison with the plumage of the young, can
male flowers, and which is formed of mere cellular tissue, can thus act?
males the greatest number of offspring. Sexual selection will also give
male than in the female ass, so that the mule, which is an offspring of
male wrens (Troglodytes) of North America, build "cock-nests," to roost
Malm states that the newly-hatched young of perches, salmon, and several
mammals do occur on almost every island. New Zealand possesses two bats
mammals, will by no means explain the same construction in the skulls of
man, if he had not witnessed what takes place, could never have imagined
mankind, a genealogical arrangement of the races of man would afford the
manner, and homologous parts tend to cohere. Modifications in hard parts
manner; and this would obviously aid in the acquirement through natural
manner as beings in a state of nature, and if the seed or young were not
manner, but to three separate yet closely related acts of creation. Many
manner, or a pouter till he saw a pigeon with a crop of somewhat unusual
manner, should ever afterwards converge so closely as to lead to a near
manner. So again the two main divisions of cirripedes, the pedunculated
manner. Such an admission, however, ought not to be made without strong
man's productions; that they should be infinitely better adapted to the
many animals. The adult might also become fitted for sites or habits, in
many are peculiar or endemic forms. We clearly see why species belonging
many beings which live around us. Who can explain why one species ranges
many cases victory depends not so much on general vigour, but on having
many fresh-water productions are low in the scale of nature, and we have
many hours, either rejected the seeds in pellets or passed them in their
many inherited changes, through which the species has passed during its
many naturalists to rank them as distinct species; but what distance, it
Many of the cases of strongly marked varieties or doubtful species well
many of the species have enormous ranges. It is not meant that all, but
MANY OF THE SPECIES INCLUDED WITHIN THE LARGER GENERA RESEMBLE VARIETIES
Many other facts are, as it seems to me, explicable on this theory. How
many others could be given, habits have changed without a corresponding
many plants which have not become climbers. This is the case: I observed
many slight variations, accumulated during an almost infinite number of
many starts, the surface of the land has been so completely planed down
many ways important for us, more especially as the sterility of species
many were five feet four inches high, and many sixteen feet high; but we
many writers. In each case various causes, besides the general ones just
marine birds only two are peculiar; and it is obvious that marine birds
marine faunas on the opposite sides of almost every continent--the close
marked manner with illegitimate plants. Lastly, many hybrids are profuse
marked varieties and subspecies and species. On separate continents, and
masses of rock which have been removed over many extensive areas, and on
materials for the discrimination of the species, or could have worked on
matter so precious as phosphate of lime? When a man's fingers have been
mature stages, under such new and greatly changed habits of life, would
may, as I have attempted to show, be accounted for by former migrations
may be amended either by an alteration of curvature, or an alteration of
may be called an incidental result, for the nerves and muscles have not
may be given. I have felt these difficulties far too heavily during many
may be implicitly trusted; negative evidence is worthless, as experience
may instance Rubus, Rosa, and Hieracium among plants, several genera of
may look in vain through the whole great family of Columbidae for a beak
me 182 British plants, which are generally considered as varieties, but
meaning of that old canon in natural history, "Natura non facit saltum."
meaning of the wonderful fact, which has struck every traveller, namely,
means by which the electricity is excited--and lastly, in being supplied
means generally due to crossing different breeds; all the best breeders
me greatly doubt, whether the several aboriginal species would at first
Melipona; for in this case a large part of the bounding surface of each
member of one of these persecuted and rare groups were to assume a dress
member of the Pleuronectidae, rests on its left side at the bottom, and
member of the same genus. Even different varieties of the pear take with
members of the same class. Most physiologists believe that the bones of
mention still more ancient formations. But the most important result for
me probable: from that period to the present day I have steadily pursued
merely varieties may hereafter be thought worthy of specific names; and
metaphorical and will have a plain signification. When we no longer look
metaphorically, they are reduced, like most weak creatures, to trickery
metaphorical sense: they are far from meaning that during a long course
me that he has observed similar facts in Ceylon; analogous observations
methodically, did greatly modify, even during their lifetimes, the forms
methodical practice for scarcely more than three-quarters of a century;
might, also, be retained for one alone of its former functions. Organs,
might have been passed over as a strange coincidence. But, if we proceed
might occasionally be thus caused. Thus, as I believe, we can understand
might remain for a long period unchanged, whilst within the same period,
migrate, and no closely consecutive record of their modifications could
migration across the intervening lowlands, now become too warm for their
migration and isolation are necessary elements for the formation of new
millet, canary, hemp, clover, and beet germinated after having been from
million beings as of one; but Maupertuis' philosophical axiom "of least
million years. This seems an astonishing result, and some considerations
miniature, seated on a neck and capable of movement, as is likewise the
minute circular pits in it; and as they deepened these little pits, they
minute organic beings, which must have lived in great numbers. Thus the
Mivart, such as the sudden development of the wings of birds or bats, or
modification must be slow, and will generally affect only a few species
modifications; but if the unknown cause were to act almost uniformly for
modifications, each better and better fitted, for so trifling an object
modifications of structure independently of natural selection. But as my
modifications of structure in some degree permanent; and this assuredly
modifications of the kind required. If we look to rather wider intervals
modification, species (A) and all the earlier varieties will have become
modifications; the relation of organism to organism in the struggle for
modification to be more numerous or greater in amount, to convert these
modified and perfected so as to perform all the work, being aided during
modified for a new function: the wing of the Apteryx, on the other hand,
modified swim-bladders betray their aquatic origin, may perhaps be thus
modify the instinct--always supposing each modification to be of use to
moment pretend that any explanation could be offered of many instances.
mongrel offspring, has been asserted by so many authors to be universal,
monstrosity I presume is meant some considerable deviation of structure,
monstrous plants, we often get direct evidence of the possibility of one
more advantageous to this species, to capture workers than to procreate
more different from their parents to any conceivable extent. Differences
more important circumstance) with different sets of organic beings. But
more important. Thus, a man who intends keeping pointers naturally tries
more instance of the abrupt appearance of a great group of species. But
more numerous; but Mr. Smith informs me that he has watched the nests at
Moreover, at whatever period of life either disuse or selection reduces
Moreover, Gartner expressly states that the hybrids from long cultivated
Moreover, the species of the larger genera are related to each other, in
more perfect, the main objections to the theory of natural selection are
more, than its wild parents. The great and inherited development of the
more than one breed of the same species. Pigeons can be mated for life,
more than the male. In both, the tendency goes to a certain extent with
more vigorous, dominant and widest-spreading temperate forms invaded the
most closely in all important characters: namely in their sense organs,
most different orders: nature follows what may be called a simultaneous
most difficult to say where perfect fertility ends and sterility begins.
most distinct of the original eleven species. The new species, moreover,
most perfect organs; it cannot be pretended that we know all the varied
most probable hypothesis to account for the reappearance of very ancient
Mountains, in the United States of America, are all the same with those
mountains or on the plains improving their breeds more quickly than the
mountain summits, of granite, metamorphic schists, old fossiliferous and
mouth, length of nostril and of eyelid, size of feet and length of leg,
mouths of insects, we have only to suppose that their common progenitor
movement have changed in the lapse of ages? At a period long antecedent
movements appear to be of no service to the plants in question; anyhow,
Mr. Busk, however, does not know of any gradations now existing between
Mr. E.V. Harcourt, many European and African birds are blown to Madeira;
Mr. Gould was formerly inclined to believe that the act of ejection was
Mr. Hudson says it is probable that they are occasionally parasitic, for
Mr. Mivart has taken up this case, and remarks that a sudden spontaneous
Mr. Mivart remarks: "Did no special provision exist, the young one must
Mr. Waterhouse and others have remarked, our carnivorous, ruminant, and
Mr. Waterhouse has remarked that when a member belonging to one group of
much better manner, for he placed the seeds in a box in the actual sea,
much diversified that Muller formerly made three main classes with seven
much elongated necks or other means for browsing on the higher branches
much food as possible soon after birth, I can see no special difficulty
much longer period. So that as 64/87 kinds of seeds germinated after an
much restricted ranges. For instance, Mr. H.C. Watson has marked for me
much struck how entirely vague and arbitrary is the distinction between
Muller, that both in star-fishes and sea-urchins the pedicellariae must
multifarious means for gaining the same end. The answer no doubt is, as
multitude of flowers have their anthers and stigmas fully exposed to the
must be considered of very trifling physiological importance, but which
must habitually be crossed. So it is with the reciprocally dimorphic and
must have been heated under great pressure, have always seemed to me to
must have been inherited, not at a corresponding, but at an earlier age.
must have proceeded from a single source, prevail throughout the world.
must in addition suppose that the larger workmen had heads four instead
must, I think, look further than to mere variability. We can not suppose
my imagination it is far more satisfactory to look at such instincts as
My reasons for doubting whether natural species have changed as abruptly
My work is now (1859) nearly finished; but as it will take me many more
namely, by the increase of a tendency to slight and irregular revolving
namely, that Madeira and the adjoining islet of Porto Santo possess many
namely, those of the hive-bee and of many ants, could not possibly have
names can be given to the homologous bones in widely different animals.
nations. All this clearly shows, as Heer has remarked, that they had at
natives) inhabiting an island situated above 300 miles from a continent
natives would have had to be modified in order to gain an advantage over
natural, as it would connect together all languages, extinct and recent,
natural circumstances. In an extremely small area, especially if freely
Natural instincts are lost under domestication: a remarkable instance of
naturalisation, proportionally with the number of the native genera and
naturalised in a given country; then, and not until then, we may justly
naturalised in America and Australia; and some of the aboriginal plants
naturalised in any part of the northern hemisphere, though hides, wool,
naturalised productions from another land. Nor ought we to marvel if all
naturalised through man's agency, have spread with astonishing rapidity
naturalist, looking at the inhabitants of these volcanic islands in the
naturalists, and which consequently have all the external characteristic
naturalists believe in the separate creation of each species; and I have
natural lifetime produces several eggs or seeds, must suffer destruction
naturally selected. And here the importance of the principle of benefit
Natural selection acts exclusively by the preservation and accumulation
natural selection, as many instances as possible ought to be given; but
natural selection. Bronn adduces the length of the ears and tails in the
natural selection cannot do, is to modify the structure of one species,
Natural selection cannot possibly produce any modification in a species
 Natural Selection--Divergence of Character, related to the diversity of
natural selection. For natural selection acts by either now adapting the
natural selection. I state this because it has been erroneously asserted
natural selection preserving all the slight individual variations in the
natural selection. The principle of the economy of growth, explained in
Natural Selection, we shall hereafter see, is a power incessantly ready
natural selection, whereas in the work just referred to I have collected
natural selection will always act according to the nature of the places
natural selection will be enabled to act on and modify organic beings at
natural selection will generally act very slowly, only at long intervals
Natural selection will modify the structure of the young in relation to
natural species, they throw very little light on our subject. Excluding
nature; and an American naturalist, Mr. Lockwood, believes from what he
nature are not capable of distinct vision, and serve only to distinguish
nature ever change so quickly as domestic animals under the guidance of
nature occasionally become sterile; and if such insects had been social,
 nature of extinct intermediate varieties; on their number--On the lapse
 nature--Struggle for life most severe between individuals and varieties
nature. The larger and more dominant groups within each class thus tend
nature the same general end is gained by an almost infinite diversity of
nauplius-form, though many appear as zoeas; nevertheless Muller assigns
near each other in his garden; and although these plants have separated
nearest allies of that species, i.e. the species of the same genus, will
nearly allied forms, and these alone bear on the question. If monstrous
nearly mature, when it was compelled to use its full powers to gain its
nearly the same physical conditions. Thus, the south-east and south-west
nearly the same physiological value, its classificatory value is widely
near the sea-shore, have their leaves in some degree fleshy, though not
necessarily exposed to similar conditions, seem eminently liable to vary
necessary consequence. We can here consider only a few cases; of these,
necessary on the view advanced by Forbes and admitted by his followers.
necessary to read several of the many treatises devoted to this subject,
neighbouring island, but not from one distant continent to another. The
neither the appearance nor disappearance of the many species embedded in
neither useful nor injurious would not be affected by natural selection,
nerves, and resting merely on sarcodic tissue. Eyes of the above simple
nerve, surrounded by pigment-cells and covered by translucent skin, but
nest, both widely different from each other and from their parents, has
nests. An action, which we ourselves require experience to enable us to
neuter-insects out of Europe have been carefully examined. Mr. F. Smith
never lived, but had been created in stone so as to mock the shells now
never visited, at least in my garden, by insects, it never sets a seed,
newer Pliocene period, the majority of the inhabitants of the world were
new principle has to be invoked, it must be one of retrogression rather
new species will be of a curious and circuitous nature. Being descended
new state of the instrument to be multiplied by the million; each to be
Niatas perish, if not fed by their owners. Before coming to Mr. Mivart's
nine Leguminosae were tried, and, with one exception, they resisted the
No complex instinct can possibly be produced through natural selection,
no doubt that use in our domestic animals has strengthened and enlarged
no greater difficulty in this being effected through natural selection,
No one objects to agriculturists speaking of the potent effects of man's
Nor can I see any force in Mr. Mivart's difficulty with respect to "the
nor have the several stages of the same formation throughout Europe been
North America the black bear was seen by Hearne swimming for hours with
northern parts, where the land almost joins, and where, under a slightly
not actually transmit to its offspring its newly-acquired character, it
not a particularly distinct species, obstinately failed to fertilise, or
not, as far as is known (and it would be very difficult to prove this),
not as specially endowed or created instincts, but as small consequences
not been discovered in the intertropical parts of Africa. Dr. Hooker has
not been neatly performed. The bees must have worked at very nearly the
not early period, explain, as I believe, all the above specified leading
note in cases of difficulty, as when two pieces of comb met at an angle,
not, for instance, probable that sediment was deposited during the whole
not have been sketched out with all their parts in proper proportion, as
Nothing can be more hopeless than to attempt to explain this similarity
notice that it is of no importance to a very young animal, as long as it
not necessarily include progressive development--it only takes advantage
not of great importance for our line of argument; for by the experiment
not of the slightest use or importance to most species. But it will have
not one of fifty-four specimens belonging to four other species of Helix
not only separating but in apparently forming the several zoological and
not possible to represent in a series, on a flat surface, the affinities
not sift the water, but uses its beak exclusively for tearing or cutting
not strictly correct; but if we include all those of past times, whether
not that these countries, so rich in species, do not by a strange chance
not thus have been carried. The weather had been cold and boisterous and
not to be considered as rudimentary. They may be in a nascent condition,
not to the same, but to distinct species. By the time that an animal had
not true. No one would ever have thought of teaching, or probably could
now continuous must often have existed within recent times in a far less
Now do these complex and singular rules indicate that species have been
now grown into great branches, yet survive and bear the other branches;
now is. North America formerly partook strongly of the present character
Now, let us apply these two principles to species in a state of nature.
now somewhere exist, or may formerly have existed; and here a wide door
Now when the latter arise from the summit of a spine they form, in fact,
number of protected heads produced not a single seed. Humble bees alone
number of slight variations and individual differences occurring in our
number of temperate forms. At this period the equatorial climate at the
 number--On the lapse of time as estimated by years--On the poorness of
number, with natural selection always ready to adapt the slowly varying
numerically the relative frequency of the variations. He specifies above
Numerous cases could be given of striking resemblances in quite distinct
numerous gradations, as fine as existing varieties, connecting together
Numerous instances could be given of characters derived from parts which
nurserymen always prefer saving seed from a large body of plants, as the
object, and if the individuals be allowed freely to intercross, his work
objections: now let us turn to the special facts and arguments in favour
obligations to Dr. Hooker, who, for the last fifteen years, has aided me
obscured, of the progenitor, either in its adult or larval state, of all
observed erratic boulders on these islands, and he answered that he had
observed, except in Europe and North America, and for no instinct being
obvious when we treat of selection. Fourthly, pigeons have been watched
occasionally, and likewise with animals which unite for each birth, but
occasionally assume some of the characters proper to the species of that
occasionally to lay their eggs in other birds' nests. Now let us suppose
occur, natural selection can do nothing. Under the term of "variations,"
occurred to me that floods would often wash into the sea dried plants or
occurrence of the same terrestrial species on islands and on the nearest
occur to everyone, and probably the true one, is that they are descended
oceanic islands; for man has unintentionally stocked them far more fully
oceanic island (with the exception of New Zealand, if this can be called
ocean. We may safely assume that under such circumstances their rate of
of a bird; in the structure of the beetle which dives through the water;
of activity may come on earlier or later in life; but whenever it comes
of a former cold period. From facts communicated to me by the Rev. W.B.
of allied species appear, though this appearance is often false, to have
of all, those destined for total darkness, and whose formation is quite
of a marine fauna, which, during the Pliocene or even a somewhat earlier
of a multitude of new inhabitants into an adjoining sea, or by the final
of another, not because the intermediate links have actually been found,
of any difference in their structure or constitution, excepting in their
of any one class; but when we have a distinct object in view, and do not
of apparently sudden transitions, through the abortion of one of the two
of a queen-wasp) making hexagonal cells, if she were to work alternately
of a spine, is unmistakable. It is generally admitted that the ordinary
of a sticky secretion, to retain the eggs until they are hatched within
of both sexes and of all ages under one species, although they may have
of China, to be very cautious in transporting animals from one district
of climate must have had a powerful influence on migration. A region now
of combat; they were eagerly seized and carried off by the tyrants, who
of crossing. The slight variability of hybrids in the first generation,
of descent, primordial organs of any kind--vertebrae in the one case and
of descent. The expression of conditions of existence, so often insisted
of difference considered necessary to give to any two forms the rank of
of differences in the same part or organ, due to differences in relative
of differences of inherited structure which are correlated with certain
of dispersal, have migrated across the wide and broken interspaces. The
of distinct individuals, but not through natural selection; for as these
of distinct species, or with the physical conditions of life. It is the
of divergent modification supposed to be represented in the diagram. And
of each creature in relation to its organic and inorganic conditions of
of each great kingdom, such as the Vertebrata, Articulata, etc., we have
of each stratum. We can best gain some idea of past time by knowing the
of embryological characters and of rudimentary organs in classification
of Europe and North America. This same view has since been maintained by
office is to search for aphides. This difference in the usual habits of
officinalis Dr. Masters has observed instances of both marginal and free
of fish now have a confined range; the teleostean fishes might formerly
offspring and progenitor do not come into competition, both may continue
 offspring not universal--Hybrids and mongrels compared independently of
offspring occasionally show for many generations a tendency to revert in
offspring than the inferior ones; so that in this case there would be a
of generations. In a breed which has been crossed only once the tendency
of generations, is not greater than that of quite useless or rudimentary
of Good Hope and in Australia, which support such an astonishing number
of greyhounds; and a cross with a greyhound has given to a whole family
of hardly any importance in classification; why characters derived from
of impregnation, causing the embryo to be imperfectly developed, rather
of infinitesimal beginnings can ever build up a sufficiently appreciable
of its nearest congeners. Hence we can understand, bearing in mind that
of it. They usually sit on their own eggs and rear their own young; but
of Japan--these two areas being now completely separated by the breadth
of life a high organisation would be of no service--possibly would be of
of life; for those individuals which had some one part or several parts
of life, should not variations useful to nature's living products often
of males. Nevertheless these cases are only exaggerations of the common
of manifest benefit to the plants in question. With respect to climbing
of many climates in the same country. He seldom exercises each selected
of many kinds which have run wild in several parts of the world; if the
of marine productions, in the northern and southern temperate zones, and
of natural selection be brought to bear, must have incessantly occurred
of nature are more variable than those which are higher. I presume that
of nature; so that similarly modified individuals would soon exist in a
of nature, vary much, could be shown by many facts. Several cases could
of nutriment from one part owing to the excess of growth in another and
of orchids, namely, their pollinia. A pollinium, when highly developed,
of our imaginary Glacial period, the arctic productions were as uniform
of our pigeons, it must be assumed that at least seven or eight species
of palaeontology plainly proclaim, as it seems to me, that species have
of parts; and in an unimportant manner, that is, in relation to adaptive
of plants common to Europe, in comparison with the species on the other
of prey--all striving to increase, all feeding on each other, or on the
of reduction; for we cannot suppose that a minute papilla, for instance,
of requisite food. Before man inhabited India or Africa, some cause must
of reversion from the number of the markings, which are correlated with
of revolving, and have thus become twiners, they must have independently
of separate acts of creation the whole case remains unintelligible. This
of several cells, or became attached to any supporting surface, his law
of smaller size. But the eyes offer the most remarkable peculiarity; for
of some early member of the group. On the other hand, of all Marsupials,
of some few members. If we admire the truly wonderful power of scent by
of South America. Even throughout the extensive and shallow seas within
of species is generally a slower process than their production: if their
of specific distinction; secondly, because we may conclude that there is
of sterility, when the germen alone is effected, cannot have been gained
of strata rich in fossils beneath the Cambrian system is very great. It
of structure, viewed by systematists as of high value, may be wholly due
of surviving and procreating their kind? On the other hand, we may feel
often be disturbed; and this will create new places, ready to be filled
often enters the water and dives about by the use not of its legs but of
often exceedingly small. I have endeavoured to test this numerically by
often lay so many eggs--from fifteen to twenty--in the same foster-nest,
of the above view, that the adult Trachypterus arcticus, which is not a
of the actual distribution of closely allied or representative species,
of the adder, and in the ovipositor of the ichneumon, by which its eggs
of the basal rhombic plates; the motive power of the process of natural
of the cells just begun, sweeping spheres or cylinders, and building up
of the Chalk. It is not that the same species are met with; for in some
of the common progenitor, or of its early descendants, became variable;
of the different orders are very different from what they are elsewhere.
of the fact. Nor is it consistent with itself: thus the boa-constrictor
of the first cell. I was able practically to show this fact, by covering
of the frame of mind under which an instinctive action is performed, but
of the ground-dwelling, insect or root-eating, bandicoots--and those of
of the individuals which happen to have been chosen for the experiment.
of their structure, yet are certainly highly abnormal in other parts; we
of the jaw, the manner in which an insect's wing is folded, whether the
of the kidneys. Others believe that the shape of the pelvis in the human
of the known geological formations in Europe, have oftenest given rise,
of the living species. It must not be forgotten that, on our theory, all
of the male. Certain animals belonging to several classes are now known
of the many now existing low forms have not in the least advanced since
of the members to loss through disuse or natural selection. So that, if
of the most obvious real cases is, that variations of structure arising
of the other individuals, yet the chances would be strongly against its
of the same genus) have been formed, many varieties or incipient species
of the same great formation? He may disbelieve in the immense intervals
of the same size, is very frequently and necessarily the case, the three
 of the same species: often severe between species of the same genus--The
of the sea. During the alternate periods of elevation and of stationary
of these bats are peculiar species, they must have long inhabited their
of the skin; and the vitreous body is formed from embryonic subcutaneous
of the Swedish turnip and ruta-baga, plants which several botanists rank
of the yew between its feet on a branch, and hammers with its beak till
of this conclusion in the vast difference in the results of crossing the
of this nature, Mr. Bates concludes that the Leptalis first varies; and
of this order wander more than those of any other; and are occasionally
of this practice in certain groups of birds; and it has been followed by
of three times as big as those of the smaller men, and jaws nearly five
of time, from the continued selection of swifter horses in the one case,
of time in the new and isolated district, and having to compete with new
of time. This doctrine has been emphatically admitted by many geologists
of two distinct and differently coloured breeds; and in this case there
of two kinds--the one open, of the ordinary structure, the other closed
of well-nourished offspring, than would the individuals which secreted a
of whole classes from each other--for instance, of birds from all other
of wolf, when young and without any training, as soon as it scented its
of young mammals have been advanced as a beautiful adaptation for aiding
oil-gland is quite aborted. Several other less distinct breeds might be
old cocoons to hold honey, sometimes adding to them short tubes of wax,
on a fluctuating amount of food, for it allows them rapidly to increase
on ancient and gigantic moraines. Southward of the Asiatic continent, on
once found in Illinois a young cuckoo, together with a young jay in the
once infer their community of descent, and we put them all into the same
on changing in character during nearly their whole lives. With mammals,
one area and formation; that widely ranging species are those which have
on early transitional forms, and taking birds as an illustration, cannot
one as an example, namely, that "every ovule in a pod of Crinum capense
one, as likewise illustrating one step in the separation of the sexes of
one case from the conditions of life having been disturbed, in the other
one day's hunting I picked up no less than twenty lost and wasted eggs.
one egg in a foster-nest, so that the young bird is securely reared. Mr.
one for a widely different purpose, namely respiration. The swim-bladder
one individual with another of the same species, or with the individuals
one knows how the horns of stags become more and more branched, and the
one might have thought that it was a hybrid zebra; and Mr. W.C. Martin,
one of the causes of ordinary variability; namely, that the reproductive
One of the most remarkable features in our domesticated races is that we
one other instance: for this subject of the same end being gained by the
one part is largely developed, perhaps it tends to draw nourishment from
one remarkable exception to this rule, for the young of the short-faced
one side. The basal part of the labellum stands over the bucket, and is
ones, of differences in structure which can be of no special use, I may
one whole side, and is thus enabled to catch hold of an object, but the
on insects on the ground; that upland geese, which rarely or never swim,
only about one-fifth of the proper number of seed, and that they behaved
only as remnants in a metamorphosed condition, or lie still buried under
only from my own observations, but from those of the accurate Azara, in
only say that so it is; that it has pleased the Creator to construct all
only to modify the character of his flock, but to change it altogether.
on, much variability in the parts undergoing modification may always be
on physical changes, which generally take place very slowly, and on the
on so regularly as is represented in the diagram, though in itself made
ON THE AFFINITIES OF EXTINCT SPECIES TO EACH OTHER, AND TO LIVING FORMS.
On the belief that this is a law of nature, we can, I think, understand
on the confines of its range, where it exists in lessened numbers, will,
on the head of a vulture is generally considered as a direct adaptation
On the Himalaya, and on the isolated mountain ranges of the peninsula of
ON THE LAPSE OF TIME, AS INFERRED FROM THE RATE OF DEPOSITION AND EXTENT
on the lines of intersection between the basins, so that each hexagonal
On the one side, there is good reason to believe that slight changes in
On the ordinary view of each species having been independently created,
On the ordinary view of each species having been independently created,
ON THE ORIGIN AND TRANSITION OF ORGANIC BEINGS WITH PECULIAR HABITS AND
on the other hand, stand on a deeply submerged bank, nearly one thousand
on the presence of other already defined organic forms, than on climate,
 On the slow and successive appearance of new species--On their different
ON THE SUDDEN APPEARANCE OF GROUPS OF ALLIED SPECIES IN THE LOWEST KNOWN
on the summits of distant mountain ranges, and at distant points in the
on the theory of independent creation. This view of the relation of the
On the theory of natural selection, we can, to a certain extent, answer
On the view here given of the important part which selection by man has
on the wings, white loins, a bar at the end of the tail, with the outer
On this same view of descent with modification, most of the great facts
on this subject, soon convinced me that there were many difficulties, as
on to say that he gives the rank of species to the forms that differ by
on trees. But besides C. livia, with its geographical sub-species, only
open area like a continent, has been most favourable for the production
opposite to those at which I have arrived. A fair result can be obtained
or, as I consider them, incipient species. And this, perhaps, might have
or beautiful males, according to their standard of beauty, might produce
or borne on an immovable support, are placed on the summit of a flexible
or by the species having become extinct in the intermediate tracts. Both
orders. In the Australian mammals, we see the process of diversification
orders, with the genera and species decreasing in numbers as is the case
order to excrete horny matter, as that the rudimentary nails on the fin
order to show that there is any degree of sterility. He always compares
order, yet the first is nearly as aquatic as the coot, and the second is
or even higher group, are descended from common parents; and therefore,
or even the earth from the nest, of F. flava, and quickly ran away; but
or fancies. We can, I think, further understand the frequently abnormal
organic bond, throughout space and time, over the same areas of land and
organisation and affinities might have been expected. This is certainly
organisation of the world. We thus see how hopelessly difficult it is to
organisation or on certain parts alone and in directly by affecting the
organisation. This resemblance is often expressed by the term "unity of
organisms; a plant, for instance, would find the ground best-fitted for
organisms in which nerves cannot be detected, are capable of perceiving
organisms, recent and extinct, are included under a few great orders and
organ might be modified for some other and quite distinct purpose, or be
Organs in a rudimentary condition plainly show that an early progenitor
organs is comparatively simple; and we can understand to a large extent
ORGANS OF LITTLE APPARENT IMPORTANCE, AS AFFECTED BY NATURAL SELECTION.
organs when rendered useless under changed habits or conditions of life;
or have been destroyed, being replaced by the equatorial forms returning
original capping of the granitic series. Turning to a well-known region,
originally formed by the aid of natural selection, when rendered useless
originally happened to resemble in some degree a dead twig or a decayed
original species (A) and (I), have all become, except (F), extinct, and
or internal parasites, etc.--as seems often to be the case, then natural
or into one; and that, whilst this planet has gone circling on according
or more than four hundred million years ago, but probably not less than
or mutual affinities, both when mature and in an embryonic condition. In
or of feeding their own larvae. When the old nest is found inconvenient,
or rabbit fancier, who was not fully convinced that each main breed was
or seize on one belonging to some other bird, occasionally throwing out
or slightly more perfect than the other inhabitants of the same country
or softened with lard. Andrew Knight observed that his bees, instead of
or that their hybrids, should be perfectly fertile. Again, with respect
or use can have done little or nothing, as far as we can judge, towards
or wholly, through man's agency. I may repeat what I published in 1845,
oscillations of level, as well as the subsequent subaerial degradation.
oscillations of level, I am strongly inclined to extend the above view,
ostrich. In this family several hen birds unite and lay first a few eggs
other allied huge monsters, which formerly lived in South America, have
other and from the adult; as well as the so-called alternate generations
other animals. A trace of the law of embryonic resemblance occasionally
other change of form or character. When the oldest and truest breeds of
other crustaceans, are aquatic in their habits, it is improbable in the
other forms, to be capable of definition; and if definable, whether the
other! How simply are these facts explained on the view of an occasional
other inhabitant of the same country, it will seize on the place of that
other inhabitants with which the varying species come into competition.
other in structure. If we extend the use of this element of descent--the
other in the characters derived from these important organs, than do the
other, in the same way as before; but the ridge of wax was so thin, that
other Rodents; and therefore it will not be specially related to any one
others, and so onwards, can be recognised as unequivocally belonging to
others, as each takes advantage of the weaker bodily structure of other
others. Lastly, an embryo may be developed, and then perish at an early
other species of the genus. To admit this view is, as it seems to me, to
others, that subaerial degradation is a much more important agency than
other, to the height or depth of thousands of feet; for since the crust
otherwise than as a very plain expression of that analogy which subsists
otherwise; thus the inherited peculiarities in the horns of cattle could
ought to be extremely cautious in saying that any organ or instinct, or
our domestic horse (whether or not it be descended from one or more wild
our domestic productions and in those in a state of nature, of all sorts
our geological formations many links between the species which now exist
Our ignorance of the laws of variation is profound. Not in one case out
our knowledge, imperfect though it be, of variation under domestication,
out, and the exterior surface will then digest and the stomach respire.
out of the excrement of small birds, and these seemed perfect, and some
out of the incarnate clover, but not out of the common red clover, which
out of their involuntary bath. The passage is narrow, and is roofed over
over equal areas in Southwestern Australia or at the Cape of Good Hope,
overflow. Dr. Cruger saw a "continual procession" of bees thus crawling
overlying carboniferous and underlying Silurian systems. But each fauna
over one face of the slip--in this case the bees can lay the foundations
over the world in infinite numbers: they are all strictly littoral, with
owe their constitutional differences to habit. The case of the Jerusalem
owing to the less severe competition to which the scanty inhabitants of
own living; and the effects thus produced will have been transmitted to
own proper communities, and have never been observed in the nests of F.
palaeontologists, that organisation on the whole has progressed. Extinct
palaeontologists would answer in the affirmative; and it seems that this
Paraguay, the parasitic insects would probably increase; and this would
parallelism in the results of grafting and of crossing distinct species.
parallelism of the palaeozoic forms of life in various parts of Europe,
parasitic crustaceans. To refer once again to cirripedes: the larvae in
parent (A) more numerous than most of the other inhabitants of the same
parents are the same, whether the two parents differ little or much from
parents; for in this case it would be indispensable for their existence
parent-species at first produced perfectly fertile hybrids, or that the
parents, yet absolutely sterile; so that it could never have transmitted
parent the same constitution and tendency to variation, when acted on by
part has undergone, since the several species branched off from a common
particular country. Hence the inhabitants of one country, generally the
particularly concerns us is, that those points in our domestic animals,
particularly difficult to compare their relative degrees of variability.
particularly useful to them, for any special purpose, would be carefully
particular manner, so as often to become striped like the other species
particular period of growth, will determine whether or not a plant will
part in many closely allied species. Thus, the wing of the bat is a most
part in modifying species, as if all the forms of life were necessarily
partly be explained through the action of sexual selection on variations
partly by man selecting and accumulating, during successive generations,
partly due to their reproductive systems having been specially affected,
parts are few, I may mention that, according to De Candolle, the flowers
parts of any species, this will chiefly or solely have affected it when
parts of England, and its habits have been attended to by Mr. F. Smith,
parts of the world, all geologists believe that barbarian men existed at
parts of the world, we find that they differ considerably in the several
parts, whether more or less modified, unless their common origin became
part to be largely developed in a corresponding degree. And conversely,
part. Wandering savages or the inhabitants of open plains rarely possess
passes through a cold period the temperature of the southern hemisphere
past, we may safely infer that not one living species will transmit its
patiently accumulating and reflecting on all sorts of facts which could
pattern of an organ might become so much obscured as to be finally lost,
peculiar mental habits and actions, which at first appeared from what we
peculiar to Charles Island is at least as well fitted for its home as is
penetrated into the earth from the geographically limited faunas of the
perfected at a former period, have been transmitted to existing species
perfected sub-groups, from branching out and seizing on many new places
perfected whilst aided by the other, must often have largely facilitated
 perfection--Modes of transition--Cases of difficulty--Natura non facit
perfection, or dominating power, than the southern forms. And thus, when
perfection or highness. We have also seen that, as the specialisation of
perfectly compatible with numerous beings still retaining simple and but
perfectly defined species have been formed on strictly continuous areas;
perfectly developed, as may sometimes be seen in the common snap-dragon.
performed in a primary and gradual manner. Many insects, and especially
performed two functions, for one function alone, and thus by insensible
performed without experience by the young, and in nearly the same manner
perhaps attached to seaweed or floating timber, or to the feet of wading
perhaps by natural selection. In South America, a burrowing rodent, the
perhaps fancied that, after all, they had been victorious in their late
perhaps more than they differ from each other. Hence, in all such cases,
perhaps render it probable that some unknown bond in all cases connects
period. Geology would lead us to believe that most continents have been
period in the earth's history will be intermediate in general character
period it takes to modify a species; but to the subject of time we must
period nearly constant. And this, I am convinced, is the case. That the
periods; for these will account, in accordance with the same principles,
periods of existence--do not accord in arrangement. The species extreme
period than at another, as the breed rises or falls in fashion--perhaps
period the Dutch were as eager about pigeons as were the old Romans. The
period unaltered, whilst its descendants had undergone a vast amount of
permanent variety. But characters exclusively due to analogous variation
perpetual snow formerly covered the central axis, and fed glaciers which
person be interrupted in a song, or in repeating anything by rote, he is
petrel lays but one egg, yet it is believed to be the most numerous bird
Petrels, the upper mandible alone is furnished with lamellae, which are
P. Huber found it was with a caterpillar, which makes a very complicated
physical conditions as closely similar as the same species ever require,
physical conditions; indeed it seems that islands are peculiarly fitted
physiological importance may remain the same. Something of the same kind
picture of the ancient forms of life. Embryology will often reveal to us
pincers, and the other has antennae much more abundantly furnished with
placed 100 land-shells, belonging to ten species, in a box pierced with
placed in either class. But in ascending the series from simple twiners
placed under suitable conditions of life. But a hybrid partakes of only
place of safety. Hence, it is clear that the slaves feel quite at home.
places, when they spread out into new countries. In their new homes they
plant is often stated to be ill adapted for wide dissemination; but the
plants and animals, there is the clearest evidence that a cross between
plants; and with animals, one variety certainly often has this prepotent
plants are fertilised through insect agency, can we consider as equally
plants are more subject to reversion than hybrids from species in their
plants had been flexible, and if under the conditions to which they are
plants; if we compare this moderate number with the species which swarm
plants is much more closely related to Australia, the nearest mainland,
plants of northern Scandinavia; those of the United States to Labrador;
plants or branches with the fruit; and this, as we have seen, would have
plants. Some holly-trees bear only male flowers, which have four stamens
plants there are three forms likewise differing in the lengths of their
plants there is a vast destruction of seeds, but from some observations
plants we have conclusive evidence that the sterility of crossed species
plants were to produce one kind alone, a great change would be effected
plants will, I think, admit that all the many gradations in function and
plates or laminae, which stand close together transversely to the longer
pleasure. He may do this methodically, or he may do it unconsciously by
pliocene, the pleistocene and strictly modern beds of Europe, North and
point, had not some one dog naturally shown a tendency in this line; and
points of the world. No geologist feels any difficulty in Great Britain
poisoned by certain plants; so that even colour would be thus subjected
polity not perfectly occupied, all the individuals varying in the right
pollen from another individual will explain the above state of exposure
pollen is formed for the sole purpose of fertilisation, its destruction
pollen-masses, and the grains are merely tied together by fine threads;
pollen-masses; and this forms the first or nascent trace of a caudicle.
pollen-masses with viscid discs, come under this same head of analogical
polymorphic forms, Mr. Babington gives 251 species, whereas Mr. Bentham
polymorphic species, in which the variability seems to be of a peculiar
polyzoary to tremble. When the jaws are touched with a needle they seize
pond; this mud when dry weighed only 6 and 3/4 ounces; I kept it covered
poorer fluid; and thus the cutaneous glands, which are the homologues of
portion of the world has been geologically explored. Only organic beings
portions of a strictly continuous area, intermediate varieties will, it
position--namely, at the close of the Introduction--the following words:
positively asserted that all the grains do not pass into the gizzard for
possessed less than half-a-dozen flowering plants; yet many species have
possessed many vertebrae; the unknown progenitor of the Articulata, many
possess the aboriginal stocks of any useful plants, but that the native
possible, if all our fantail-pigeons were destroyed, that fanciers might
possible that slight modifications of instinct might be profitable to a
possibly have any bearing on it. After five years' work I allowed myself
potent has been the effect of the introduction of a single tree, nothing
pouters, and fantails now are, should yield offspring perfectly fertile,
power and capacity by gradation. Much light will be thrown on the origin
power of increasing in numbers, we should have to give it some advantage
powers, having been originally breathed by the Creator into a few forms
precise answer to such questions, considering our ignorance of the past
preponderance of temperate forms. So again in the mountainous island of
preponderant migration from the north to the south is due to the greater
presence proved useful to the species which had seized them--if it were
presence to inheritance from a common ancestor; and its absence in some
present a number of varieties, that is, of incipient species, beyond the
present day, we see that very many European productions cover the ground
 Present distribution cannot be accounted for by differences in physical
presented if we enquire how it is that certain flavours and odours give
present extent, accidentally resembled a member of another and protected
present homes. Therefore Sir C. Lyell asks, and assigns certain reasons
presenting certain very abnormal characters, as compared with all other
present the greatest number of spontaneous varieties and sub-varieties.
present time; for during these warmer periods the northern parts of the
present varieties, so that, with shells and other marine animals, it is
preservation of the most useful or beautiful animals, with no intention
preserved; for they will have roamed over the whole country in search of
preserved or rejected each little deviation of form so carefully as when
preserved to a distant age. A little reflection will explain why, along
pressure, an early developed part affecting one subsequently developed,
prevailing currents, this anomaly disappears. New Zealand in its endemic
prevents the bees from flying away, and forces them to crawl out through
prey at this or some other period of the year, when they were compelled
prey, lies generally between beings remote in the scale of nature. This
prey, stand motionless like a statue, and then slowly crawl forward with
principle of inheritance. Schiodte believes, in opposition to some other
principle of natural selection, when I do not admit that such wonderful
principle that, when man is selecting at the same time two varieties, it
principle we can understand how it is that specific characters are more
prism was built upon the scalloped edge of a smooth basin, instead of on
probability, have become mingled with ancient Alpine species, which must
probable that every twiner which possessed leaves with long foot-stalks
probable that, if the whole genus of humble-bees became extinct or very
probable that those which had the widest range, far exceeding the limits
proceed (as I have learned from information and specimens sent to me by
proceeding from (A) were removed, excepting that from a1 to a10. In the
process, from the survival of a few descendants, lingering in protected
process of formation. But he who will take the trouble to reflect on the
procreate new and dominant species. As all the living forms of life are
produce a structure which apparently would be beneficial to the species.
produced in Australia; or that Edentata and other American types should
produce groups of modified descendants. But it by no means follows that,
produce hybrids resembling in their stripes, not their own parents, but
produce seeds. I cannot here give the details which I have collected and
producing offspring closely similar in all respects to the parent-form.
producing two or three varieties, and some failing to produce any. Thus
productions have been produced by a single variation from the aboriginal
productions inhabiting separated districts. To compare small things with
productions of the temperate regions of the New and Old Worlds, we find
productions of the United States are more closely related to those which
progenitor; for had this been the case they would have closely resembled
progenitor, for it can rarely have happened that natural selection will
progenitor possessed, the tendency, whether strong or weak, to reproduce
progenitors. Although new and important modifications may not arise from
progenitors! Cannot our critics conceive that a biennial plant or one of
progeny. It may well be asked how it is possible to reconcile this case
progress, as each man tries to procure, without intending to improve the
progress, until the hand of time has marked the long lapse of ages, and
prominent, recurved teeth, like those of the Merganser (a member of the
promoted by natural selection alone. But how to obtain the beginning of
propagate their kind." So that here we have an excellent illustration of
proportional width of the gape of mouth, the proportional length of the
proportion of cases, as shown by Alph. de Candolle, to distinct genera.
proportion of endemic kinds (i.e. those found nowhere else in the world)
proved, gives rise to vigorous seedlings, which consequently would have
provided against it by giving to trees a strong tendency to bear flowers
provided will commonly have been supplanted by their successors with the
provinces into which Mr. Watson has divided Great Britain. Now, in this
pupae to rear as slaves. I then dug up a small parcel of the pupae of F.
pupil, but destitute of lens or other optical contrivance. With insects
quadrupeds. I have not as yet had time to follow up this subject in all
quadrupeds. We may believe that the progenitor of the ostrich genus had
quality, but will admit that it is incidental on differences in the laws
quarters, in both cases they are connected by the same bond of ordinary
queen-bee for her own fertile daughters; at ichneumonidae feeding within
question whether we really know how old the world is, and at what period
quite unimportant differences between the so-called hybrid offspring of
rabbits, some breeds of which differ much from each other, the evidence
rabbit, when they can be got to breed together, produce offspring, which
race-horses have come to surpass in fleetness and size the parent Arabs,
race-horse, the dromedary and camel, the various breeds of sheep fitted
races by crossing has been greatly exaggerated. Many cases are on record
radius x sqrt(2) or radius x 1.41421 (or at some lesser distance), from
raised seedlings from them, and again picked out the best seedlings and
raise plenty of seedlings. Another species of Lobelia, which is visited
rambling habits, can not be easily matched, and, although so much valued
ranged over both continents, and then have become extinct, excepting in
range of others, will tend to be sharply defined. Moreover, each species
ranges, some at least of the islands would have been formed, like other
ranging species, belonging to the larger genera within each class, which
ranked as species or varieties, with the evidence from fertility adduced
rather longer beak; and on the acknowledged principle that "fanciers do
rats, and another mice, and these tendencies are known to be inherited.
rays or branches aborted. The mammary glands of the Ornithorhynchus may
reached its maximum, we should have an arctic fauna and flora, covering
reach the ovarium. It has also been observed that when the pollen of one
real case of adaptation we may infer from the fact of the mon-parasitic
real difficulty, under changing conditions of life, in natural selection
real illustration: According to M. Verlot, some varieties of the double
reasonably suppose that the absence of colour in flat-fish on the side,
reasonably suspect that the process of deposition has been more or less
reason to believe that such beings become modified more slowly than the
reason to believe that the species of a genus have been produced within
reason to suspect that this occurs with some other plants. These slight
recapitulation of the facts given at the end of the ninth chapter, which
recently Hildebrand and others have shown, and as I can confirm, either
recent members of the same classes, we must admit that there is truth in
recent period, and of other changes which have probably occurred--if we
record of several successive and peculiar marine faunas will probably be
red masters, so that the contrast in their appearance is great. When the
red, the colour would be only a specific character, and no one would be
referred to), mounting up through many predecessors. As it is difficult
Reflecting on this case, it occurred to me that if the Melipona had made
regard to the origin of species and varieties, if he make due allowance
regions of the Old and New Worlds, and on many isolated mountain-summits
reject a real for an unreal, or at least for an unknown cause. It makes
related to each other, and clustered round certain forms--that is, round
related to each other, and should likewise be related, but less closely,
related to each other in the same degree in blood, has come to be widely
relation to the means of migration, one group of beings should have all
relatively to the adjoining parts, and their lesser relative size in the
relatively to the adjoining parts, than in the adult; so that the organ
remainder will stand much more distinct from each other. If the extreme
remained in nearly the same relative position, though subjected to great
remained the same, a still stronger tendency to vary in the same manner.
remarkable fact; more especially when we reflect how many species there
remarkable fact to see so many plants of the same species living on the
remarked by Mr. H.C. Watson) from their somewhat northern character, in
remarked, serve as a watch-tower. It is from this cause, as Sir S. Baker
remarked that multiple parts are extremely liable to vary in structure.
remarked, there is no greater anomaly in nature than a bird that cannot
remembered that when a pond or stream is first formed, for instance on a
remember how essential it is in a flock of white sheep to destroy a lamb
remote islands? On my view this question can easily be answered; for no
remotest geological periods to the present day will be more conveniently
removing what might be noxious to the delicate inhabitants of the cells
rendered beautiful for beauty's sake. But this has been effected through
rendered higher. Natural selection will not necessarily lead to absolute
Rengger have shown that this is caused by the greater number in Paraguay
repeated many times, until that prodigious amount of difference between
representation would have been still less natural; and it is notoriously
representative forms which are ranked by all naturalists as specifically
representative species. The first or variable forms vary much within the
represented by natural selection or the survival of the fittest, always
represented in the diagram by the letters standing at unequal distances.
represented in the diagram; for the groups will have been more numerous;
reproduction seems to be essentially similar. With all, as far as is at
reproductive systems. The diversity of the result in reciprocal crosses
reproductive system. With respect to the direct action, we must bear in
reptiles, which have only to escape from a broken egg, we may infer that
required by the theory; but to this latter subject I shall return in the
require some special explanation; and we may perhaps believe that we see
researches of Professor Rutimeyer. With respect to horses, from reasons
resemblance and dissimilarity between organic beings is attempted to be
resemblance does not depend on adaptation to similar habits of life, but
resemblances. But these cases are so wonderful that they were introduced
resemblances, though so intimately connected with the whole life of the
resemblance to a leaf, bamboo, or other object, for natural selection to
resemblance to the head and beak of a bird. The avicularia are believed
resembling varieties. These are strange relations on the view that each
respects into the closest competition with each other, the struggle will
result which ensued--namely, the production of the distinct strains. The
result would follow as if they bore flowers with separated sexes. I have
result would often be greatly retarded by free intercrossing. Many will
reversion in hybrids, and he experimented chiefly on cultivated plants.
Rhododendrons, and I am assured that many of them are perfectly fertile.
rhombs at the base of a just-commenced cell, which were slightly concave
right direction, and adheres by its viscid extremity to the back of the
rising islet, it will be unoccupied; and a single seed or egg will have
rock-pigeon. But if we deny this, we must make one of the two following
rock-pigeon in constitution, habits, voice, colouring, and in most parts
rolled 4,000 feet down the valleys. The same observer has recently found
rostrata, gradations, which may be observed in still-existing Cetaceans,
rostrata only about nine inches in length. The quality of the whalebone
round a growing comb, flexures may sometimes be observed, corresponding
round the comb; and they gnaw this away from the opposite sides, always
rudimentary parts, though of no service to the beings, are often of high
rule that the endemic productions of islands are related to those of the
running at the rate of sixty miles per diem); on this average, the seeds
safer to assume that the seeds of about 10/100 plants of a flora, after
said that I speak of natural selection as an active power or Deity; but
said to elect the base with which it in preference combines. It has been
sake of protection special objects, but only the surface which commonly
 saltum--Organs of small importance--Organs not in all cases absolutely
same areas, is at once explained; for the inhabitants of each quarter of
same cause having acted on both; but when among individuals, apparently
same class, naturalists are not unanimous which forms ought to be ranked
same country and fed on nearly the same food, deviations of structure so
same country the condor may be the more numerous of the two. The Fulmar
same distance from the centres of the adjoining spheres in the other and
same exact nature, and consequently the results obtained through natural
same family), serving for the widely different purpose of securing live
same functions. A good instance is afforded by the close resemblance of
same genus. But when we come to discuss the principle, as I call it, of
same group of crustaceans, Cypridina is furnished with a heart, while in
same orders, families, or genera, with those now living, yet are often,
same process or by disuse, and, on the other hand, the actual withdrawal
same region is, in fact, the same as that of the physiological division
same species at the present day; and these parent-species, now generally
same species generally require. No doubt small areas can be pointed out
same species have migrated from some one area, but that allied species,
same species living at distant points, without the apparent possibility
same species may exist and may differ in no respect whatever, either in
same species. Sir J. Lubbock has recently remarked, that several minute
same species. The naturalist includes as one species the various larval
same species to the most distant points, and removes many a difficulty;
same species under external conditions of life as different as can well
same spot, and evidently not in search of food; they approached and were
same spot. Consequently each newly-formed variety would generally be at
same sub-breed, as in that of the short-faced tumbler, it is notoriously
satisfactory a manner the present distribution of the Alpine and Arctic
say why one species and not another becomes naturalised by man's agency
say why one species has been victorious over another in the great battle
scale, so must the number of intermediate varieties, which have formerly
Scandinavia; nevertheless he finds a surprising amount of difference in
scarlet berries of the holly are beautiful objects--will be admitted by
scheme of nature." But this is not an explanation, merely a restatement
scope of natural selection to preserve all favourable variations, until
scrutinising, throughout the world, the slightest variations; rejecting
sea on the opposite sides of a continent, and the nature of the various
sea-water; but some taken out of the crop of a pigeon, which had floated
Secondly, areas now continuous must often have existed within the recent
secondly, on their continually bending to all points of the compass, one
sections, had not the absence of innumerable transitional links between
see a thin, straggling branch springing from a fork low down in a tree,
seed-capsule the degree of sterility is innately variable, so it is in a
seedlings next year produced two, and so on, then in twenty years there
seeds are annually devoured, and these could be modified through natural
seeds: I have tried several little experiments, but will here give only
seeds of the distinct species in any one genus in the same two families.
seeds of the yew on a branch, and thus breaking them like a nuthatch. In
seeds or animals transported to an island, even if far less well-stocked
seeds passing through the intestines of a bird; but hard seeds of fruit
see how the successive modifications of the anterior limbs of a supposed
seeing how well the Helix pomatia resisted with me the salt-water, that
see in the cave-animals of America, affinities to the other inhabitants
see in them adaptation, not indeed to the animal's or plant's own good,
seem generally to suffer most, but this is not invariably the case. With
seems probable that the adult stage of development would sooner or later
seems to me that we have abundant evidence of great oscillations in the
seem to me conclusively to show that this sterility is no more a special
see no especial difficulty in this having been effected through natural
see when we treat of the genetic principle of classification, this is by
see whether or not these laws indicate that species have been specially
see why it is that no line of demarcation can be drawn between species,
seize on many and widely diversified places in the polity of nature, and
selected as presenting the greatest amount of difficulty with respect to
selected, which produced more and more of the smaller workers, until all
selection almost inevitably causes much extinction of the less improved
selection; and in this case the individual differences given by nature,
selection; as it is, the colour is probably in chief part due to sexual
selection. A trailing palm in the Malay Archipelago climbs the loftiest
selection; but it may perhaps be argued, that, if a species was rendered
selection. But probably the most important element is that the animal or
selection by man, is avoided on the theory of gradual evolution, through
selection could not lead; for the comb of the hive-bee, as far as we can
selection, excepting on variations which are first given to him in some
selection, for some special purpose. Look at the race and dray-horse, or
selection. Furthermore, we may conclude that transitional states between
selection has been applied by man to some one character alone--of which
selection. No one until lately would have imagined that in dimorphic and
selection of mere external differences, and that they have not been long
selection of parts or organs, strikingly like each other, independently
 selection; organs of flight and of vision--Acclimatisation--Correlated
selection. Or only a third, fifth, or tenth part of the individuals may
selection, or the survival of the fittest? If man can by patience select
selection tends towards this end, inasmuch as the parts are thus enabled
selection, together with divergence of character, would tend to make an
selection, we may conclude from the analogy of ordinary variations, that
selection? What shall we say to the instinct which leads the bee to make
selection, which may be called unconscious, and which results from every
self-fertilisation, should be in so many cases mutually useless to each
self-fertilised hybrids producing a greater and greater number of seeds
"semi-metamorphic") and granite rocks exceed, in the proportion of 19 to
sensations. One might say that nature has taken delight in accumulating
sense, at distant parts of the world, has greatly struck those admirable
sense. I believe this objection to be valid, but that nature has largely
sensible degree. The obvious explanation is that the conditions of life
separated by deep arms of the sea, in most cases wider than the British
separately been rendered sufficiently distinct to rank as representative
separate points, why do we not find a single mammal common to Europe and
series, from those which simply twine round a support, to those which I
series of gradations--from a mass of pollen-grains merely tied together
service to it as a balancing organ in making its prodigious leaps, than
s'etend entre le pericarpe et le placenta." In the flowers of Saponaria
set for several days from the female to the male tree, the pollen could
sets of stamens, the three forms possess altogether six sets of stamens
settled in their new homes, each kind will have been kept by the others
seventh stage; hence they could hardly fail to be nearly intermediate in
several Atlantic currents is thirty-three miles per diem (some currents
several classes (and all our experience shows that their valuation is as
several distinct organic beings, by the effects of external conditions,
several of the inhabitants of the caves of the Old and New Worlds should
Several other singular rules could be given from Gartner: for instance,
several species of the same genus branched off from a common parent--are
several species, while they were furnished with eyes, may formerly have
several times noticed little cakes of earth attached to their feet. Many
Several years ago I was much struck by a remark to the above effect made
severe struggle for life at some age, season or year, and this certainly
sexes of the same species are generally displayed in the very same parts
sexual element of the other, but not in a reversed direction. It will be
Seychelles. But I have already remarked that it is doubtful whether New
shallow seas, probably represents the former state of Europe, while most
shape, as well as the breadth and length of the ramus of the lower jaw,
shells, at former periods of time. These facts are very perplexing, for
short-beaked pigeon on the same food; he does not exercise a long-backed
short-beaked tumbler-pigeons a greater number perish in the egg than are
short beaks have small feet, and those with long beaks large feet. Hence
short time give beauty and an elegant carriage to his bantams, according
should be compounded into one, without some disturbance occurring in the
should be modified and coadapted. Although every part of the body varies
should be understood that reference is made only to the forms which come
shoulder-stripes, like those on the dun Devonshire and Welsh ponies, and
should have all its species the same with those in an adjoining quarter
should have had to do in its native country; for we should have to give
should in the older formations make some slight approach to each other;
should often be inhabited by very different forms of life; for according
showed a trace of its wild parentage only in one way, by not coming in a
shown that this does sometimes happen--then the resemblance between what
shows, by calculating the known amount of sediment annually brought down
shrivelled wings under the soldered wing-covers of many beetles, should
Siberia was similarly affected. In the Lebanon, according to Dr. Hooker,
sickly, breeding freely under confinement; and when, on the other hand,
sides of the body, and in the successive segments of the same individual
sides of the ridge of vermilion wax, in order to have thus succeeded in
silk-worm are known to appear at the corresponding caterpillar or cocoon
similar cases of analogous variation have been observed by Naudin in the
similar conclusion. It is hopeless to attempt to convince any one of the
similar differences in the case of varieties would be no sure guide. It
similarity of pattern, it is obvious that the hind feet of these several
similarly acted on--of which fact numerous instances could be given with
similarly nourished? And in this case, the individuals which secreted a
similar taste for beautiful colours and for musical sounds runs through
simple conditions of life, and what could be better fitted for this end
simple granules to ordinary spines, to perfect tridactyle pedicellariae.
simple inheritance often gives the false appearance of correlation. One
simpler element. Most naturalists, however, use such language only in a
simple unicellular organisms came by growth or division to be compounded
simplified manner), we get eight species, marked by the letters between
simultaneously another set of workers of a different size and structure;
simultaneous, succession of the same forms of life throughout the world,
Since the discovery of flint tools in the superficial formations of many
since they branched off from a common progenitor in certain characters,
single bud with a new and sometimes widely different character from that
Sir J. Richardson, also, speaks of the reappearance on the shores of New
Sir J. Richardson has remarked, with the posterior part of their bodies
situations, as on the leaves of a large thistle. They never, however, as
sixth stage, so that much of its work was already done for it, far from
skull and vertebrae, jaws and legs, etc., as having been metamorphosed,
slaves, do no other work. They are incapable of making their own nests,
slaves, from those of the little and furious F. flava, which they rarely
slight degree by nature. No man would ever try to make a fantail till he
slight, in one's own possession. Nor must the value which would formerly
slightly curved and serrated along the outer margin, and all of them on
slightly longer or differently constructed proboscis. On the other hand,
slightly metamorphosed rock, which alone could have formed a part of the
slower with the terrestrial inhabitants of distinct continents than with
small body together, and would often breed together. If the new variety
smaller British islets, or on the shores of the Mediterranean. Hence the
smaller genera; for wherever many closely related species (i.e., species
smaller genera. Moreover, the species of the large genera which present
smaller genera on the other side, the former will be found to include a
smaller one, often yield to the inhabitants of another and generally the
small holders on the intermediate narrow, hilly tract; and consequently
small piece of ground, could live on it (supposing its nature not to be
smelling-hairs. Although in most of these cases, the two or three forms,
snowy regions of the Alps or Pyrenees, and in the extreme northern parts
so-called flying squirrels, for the sake of escaping from their enemies,
so could natural selection, but far more easily from having incomparably
so far as the later and more improved forms have conquered the older and
soft parts; it is believed by some authors that with birds the diversity
soil--that they would, to a large extent, or even wholly, revert to the
solely as flappers, like the logger headed duck (Micropterus of Eyton);
so like that of the existing horse, belonged to an extinct species. Had
so little tendency towards modifying the reproductive system in a manner
some continent. This view cuts the Gordian knot of the dispersal of the
Some few naturalists maintain that animals never present varieties; but
some importance to us, that peculiarities appearing in the males of our
some lesser number, they use it as of subordinate value. This principle
Some naturalists have maintained that all variations are connected with
some necessary manner correlated. Some other correlations are apparently
some of the crabs the foot-stalk for the eye remains, though the eye is
Some of these formations, which are represented in England by thin beds,
some of these polymorphic genera, variations which are of no service or
Some of these species are so distinct, that we cannot suppose that there
Some of these statements differ from those made by the justly celebrated
some one part, both when compared one with another, and more especially
some other Australian marsupials--should all be constructed on the same
Some semi-domestic breeds, and some truly wild breeds, have, besides the
something about the duration of past time, the monuments of which we see
something is, we can hardly ever tell. On the supposition of the fossil
sometimes be facilitated by the same species having different instincts
sometimes concur perfectly developed. Moreover, when birds belonging to
Sometimes it is only the earlier developmental stages which fail. Thus,
some unknown bond which connects the infertility of illegitimate unions
some way to the modified form, but often affecting by correlation other
somewhat larger number of the very common and much diffused or dominant
somewhat of the character of species--as is shown by the hopeless doubts
Some writers have objected to any extinct species, or group of species,
songsters, or their eggs, or their nestlings, are destroyed by birds and
soon as any part became visible. In some whole groups of animals and in
soon as the land was enclosed, it became thickly clothed with vigorously
so that here again we have undoubted evidence of change in the direction
so that the older members should differ less from each other in some of
South Africa or Australia, we see countries closely similar in all their
South America can only flap along the surface of the water, and has its
South America, that under more favourable conditions it would in a very
southernmost extremity, we have the clearest evidence of former glacial
southern United States. Why, it has been asked, if instinct be variable,
southwards as the climate became less warm, long before the commencement
southwards, by keeping to the cooler currents, while others might remain
So with natural species, if we look to forms very distinct, for instance
sown together, and the mixed seed be resown, some of the varieties which
space should be related to each other in groups, subordinate to groups,
spaniel and bull-dog, which we all know propagate their kind truly, were
Spatangus; and such cases are always interesting as affording the means
spawn of a frog under water. We have no more reason to believe in such a
speak confidently on this latter point, as Sir J. Lubbock made drawings
special creations, and which are still thus looked at by the majority of
specialised; and this may account for the common belief held by so many
special law. We shall see this more clearly when we treat of the present
specially adapted beaks; or how a few hours after leaving the shell they
specially related to each other; but this is far from the case. Nor does
species; and if some of these many species become modified and improved,
species and sub-species--that is, the forms which in the opinion of some
species are born than can possibly survive; and as, consequently, there
species at a not early age, and having been inherited at a corresponding
species at both ends, from being plainly allied to others, and these to
species. But no observer can determine for another, even if he can do so
species, but which are almost universally ranked by British botanists as
species, by the general succession of the forms of life. As species are
species cannot be defined. In genera having more than the average number
species; for during very long periods there will always have been a good
species, genera and families, with which this world is peopled, are all
species generally uniting with facility. But the correspondence between
species having migrated from a single birthplace; then, considering our
Species, however, probably change much more slowly, and within the same
species in closely consecutive formations, by the physical conditions of
species inhabiting the same widely sundered areas, belong to genera not
species. In the case of strongly marked races of some other domesticated
species, in which the male flowers included a rudiment of a pistil, with
species? It cannot be asserted that organic beings in a state of nature
species might have been formed which would have laid smaller and smaller
species most closely related, species of the same genus less closely and
species of all kinds, and therefore of competitors, decreases northward;
species of many genera, families, orders and classes, as at the present
species of Molothrus, the M. bonariensis, are much more highly developed
species of Nicotiana have been more largely crossed than the species of
species of the class are homologous. The whole subject is included under
species of the horse genus becoming, by simple variation, striped on the
species, or between the individuals of the same species, for the warmest
 Species--Origin of Domestic Varieties from one or more Species--Domestic
species or of their foster parents, which they find in the appropriated
species or sub-species or varieties; what rank, for instance, the two or
species, should be eminently liable to variation; but, on our view, this
species spreading widely throughout a continent and remaining the same.
species, that is, are not known strictly to fulfil the definition above
species. The question is difficult to answer, because the more distinct
species to each other, or to fit the males to struggle with other males
species was independently created, but are intelligible if each existed
species when crossed are sterile owing to differences confined to their
species, which have been subjected to slightly different conditions, or
species which have long been cultivated are often variable in the first
species; while others are undoubtedly distinct species. But why, it may
species, will now be fifteen in number. Owing to the divergent tendency
species would thus get crossed; and the act of crossing, as can be fully
specific characters have varied and come to differ since the period when
specimens occur. The lower, or resting-surface, resembles at first sight
sphinx-moth, the curious folded one of a bee or bug, and the great jaws
spinach, docks and nettles, which are all fertilised through the agency
spinal stripe in horses of the most distinct breeds, and of ALL colours;
spines serve as a protection; and if so, there can be no reason to doubt
splendid results from such poor materials; but the art has been simple,
spontaneous variability. But it is impossible to attribute to this cause
spontaneous variations of taste, led the bird to become more and more of
spot, then from another, and finally from the world. In some few cases,
spread; but we should remember that the species which become naturalised
spread; there will have been much extinction of the less improved forms,
squirrels; each grade of structure having been useful to its possessor.
stages of development, perfectly distinct from the primordial condition
staggered; but, to the best of my judgment, the greater number are only
stamen is not present in the ordinary flowers of this species; the style
stamens; the two having differently sized pollen-grains. With trimorphic
standard: for all physiologists admit that the specialisation of organs,
standard of perfection attained under nature. The endemic productions of
stated that fresh-water fish eat some kinds of seeds, though they reject
statements, without the facts in detail, can produce but a feeble effect
state of nature, where the trees would have to struggle with other trees
state of the male sex; for oxen of certain breeds have longer horns than
state of the same organ in distinct classes may incidentally throw light
state of the whole flower in the cauliflower. We often see rudiments of
states; and as most of these varieties are of recent origin, they cannot
states that good domestic breeds are highly valued by the negroes in the
state that I have collected cases of leg and shoulder stripes in horses
step lower in the series, namely to the individuals of the same species,
steps by which this first degree of sterility could be increased through
step towards such slight varieties as are barely thought worth recording
sterility being so uniform throughout the animal and vegetable kingdoms,
sterility of species, when first crossed, and of their hybrid offspring.
sting should so often cause the insect's own death: for if on the whole
stock. But this view may be safely rejected, for it is highly improbable
stocked with other races. In this respect enclosure of the land plays a
strain their lower eyes so as to look upward; and their skulls are thus
strata of the earth's crust including extinct remains. We shall, when we
strengthened by natural selection. For all spontaneous variations in the
stress ought not to be laid on the occasional wide diffusion of the same
strictly homologous with the branchiae of the other family; indeed, they
strike in the spurred leg, in nearly the same manner as does the brutal
striking a parallelism in the distribution of organic beings throughout
striking cases of imitation in the Lepidoptera of the Malay Archipelago
strikingly displayed in Bats, and in a lesser degree in the Felidae and
striking relation of nearly all the plants and animals of the Galapagos
stronger and more effective on this, the eyeless side of the head, than
strongly prepotent over illegitimate pollen, when both are placed on the
strongly pronounced as to deserve to be called monstrosities arise; but
struck by the manner in which successive groups of beings, specifically
structure, amounting to new generic differences, would be profitable to
structure as are specimens taken from the metropolis inhabited by each.
structure of each flower for its fertilisation by different insects. In
structure or in constitution, relatively to external conditions, and yet
 structures--Causes which interfere with the acquisition through natural
structures for the direct injury of other animals, as we see in the fang
structures in widely different animals. Thus pigs have occasionally been
structures. Species and groups of species which are called aberrant, and
structures, that within each kingdom all the members are descended from
structure, such as a monstrosity, would be a rare event; and that, if at
structure, such as we occasionally see in our domestic productions, more
structure which are variable. The period at which the perfect plumage is
struggle between natural selection on the one hand, and the tendency to
struggle: but it is not necessarily the best possible under all possible
struggle for life over other forms, there will be a constant tendency in
struggle for the production of new and modified descendants will mainly
sub-arctic and northern temperate productions of the Old and New Worlds
sub-families and families, which are furnished with hair-claspers. These
subfamily of sessile cirripedes, has been discovered by Mr. Woodward in
sub-groups will finally disappear. Looking to the future, we can predict
subject. Breeders believe that long limbs are almost always accompanied
subject would be, to look at the inheritance of every character whatever
submerge the area whence the sediment is derived, and thus diminish the
subsequently have been improved and taken advantage of by the plant, as
subsequently have not varied or come to differ in any degree, or only in
Subsequently to my experiments, M. Martens tried similar ones, but in a
subsequent modification and the multiplication of new forms. We can thus
subsidence of an island, the process of extinction may have been rapid.
sub-species; but as they are distinguished from each other by a greater
sub-species or geographical races) of a bluish colour, with certain bars
substances. Of diversified habits innumerable instances could be given:
succeed best under different climates. With cattle susceptibility to the
succeeded in giving to the species of the same group a greater amount of
succeeding period of time, closely allied though in some degree modified
successive chapters, may represent the forms of life, which are entombed
successive generations, more and more difference to the adult. Thus the
such abrupt changes, embryology enters a strong protest. It is notorious
such action. In the following cases the conditions seem to have produced
such as generally enter into specific definitions. De Candolle then goes
such as that famous one by Linnaeus, which we often meet with in a more
such as those for propelling the blood, or for aerating it, or those for
such differences are intelligible, and might even have been expected, on
such expressions as the "plan of creation," "unity of design," etc., and
such islands distinct species might have been separately formed without
such numerous and such extraordinarily shaped pieces of bone apparently
such questions are almost beyond investigation. It is, however, probable
such sunken islands are now marked by rings of coral or atolls standing
Such thick and extensive accumulations of sediment may be formed in two
suddenly. He thinks it difficult to believe that the wing of a bird "was
sufficiently stiff to support the bird in a vertical position on a post,
sufficiently thick and extensive to resist subsequent degradation, will
suggested that moths may fertilise the clovers; but I doubt whether they
suggests that this serves not to form an image, but only to concentrate
sun stood still and the world turned round, the common sense of mankind
supposed all to appear simultaneously, but often after long intervals of
supposed variety, if proved to be infertile in any degree, would almost
suppose that the seas of the world have always been so freely open from
suppose the amount of change between each horizontal line in our diagram
surfaces. By such modifications of instincts which in themselves are not
surprising by the species of this genus having the power of crossing by
surrounding conditions; and lastly, the fact of certain larvae standing
surrounding twigs and branches, in the same manner as species and groups
survival of the fittest, cares nothing for appearances, except in so far
survival. Supposing it to survive and to breed, and that half its young
survived to the present day, for they will have been supplanted by their
swarms in numbers, by so much will it tend to increase still further. We
swept out of the conjoined anthers of each flower, before the stigma of
swim-bladder into lungs, points which were discussed in the last chapter
swim-bladder. We can thus, as I infer from Professor Owen's interesting
systematic affinity and the facility of crossing is by no means strict.
systematic affinity, for whole groups of animals and plants are rendered
system--revolved plainly, though irregularly, and he states that he has
tails round that of their mother. Professor Henslow kept in confinement
taken the trouble to understand the subject. Thus a distinguished German
taken together, we may safely conclude that all our domestic breeds are
taking the case of a country undergoing some slight physical change, for
tarsi, or feet, of many male dung-feeding beetles are often broken off;
teeth in an efficient condition, but its palate is roughened, according
teeth of many animals, and a multitude of analogous cases. With respect
teleostean fishes, low down, according to Agassiz, in the Chalk period.
telescope. During two or three days they slowly careered round and round
temperate forms, almost under the equator, across the whole continent of
tempted to attribute the whole effect to its direct action. But this is
tenanted by a single mammal, some of the endemic plants have beautifully
tend from the first to be similar; the parts being at an early stage of
tending towards specialisation is within the scope of natural selection.
tendrils likewise possess. The gradations from leaf-climbers to tendril
tend to become converted into new and distinct species. Thus the larger
term of ANALOGICAL VARIATION has probably in these cases often come into
tertiary stratum; but now extinct species have been discovered in India,
than at present, although hundreds of thousands of game animals are now
than do the species of the small genera. Both these results follow when
than in the case of terrestrial colonists. We should also remember that
than of progression; and so it must be with many parasitic and degraded
than the young of the wild rabbit; scarcely any animal is tamer than the
than to any other region: and this is what might have been expected; but
that according to the high authority of Hofmeister, the young shoots and
that advanced by Mr. Wallace, who concludes that "every species has come
that all are not as perfect as they might have been in relation to their
that all Rodents, including the bizcacha, branched off from some ancient
that all the individuals of the same species are cast in the same actual
that a very trifling change, such as a little more or less water at some
That climate acts in main part indirectly by favouring other species we
that each organic being is either directly or indirectly related in the
that each organic being is striving to increase in a geometrical ratio;
that each species has been independently created. To my mind it accords
"that homologous units of any order become differentiated in proportion
that I believe this to be the case; it is more probably a reduced organ,
that in November, 1844, swarms of locusts visited the island of Madeira.
that it only then first immigrated into that area. It is well known, for
that it would be advantageous to a plant to produce stamens alone in one
that kind of unconscious selection which follows from each man trying to
that most fleeting of characters, have lately been exhibited as distinct
that natural selection may perfectly well succeed in largely developing
that new places in the polity of each island will have had to be filled
that of all others. Whether such variations or individual differences as
that of the hive-bee. We must suppose the Melipona to have the power of
that our rule is not confined to secondary sexual characters is clearly
that period of life when the being has to provide for its own wants, and
that pigeon would become through long-continued, partly unconscious and
that scarcely a single point is discussed in this volume on which facts
that several distinct mental actions are commonly embraced by this term;
that some of the species have very wide ranges in the genera which range
that species which have long been exposed to nearly uniform conditions,
that the above-specified breeds, though agreeing generally with the wild
that the AMOUNT of difference in the several branches or groups, though
that the ancient progenitor of our European cuckoo had the habits of the
that the chief part of the organisation of every living creature is due
that the element of time has been assumed by me to play an all-important
that the foregoing remarks go to the root of the matter: no explanation
that the forms of life, at least those inhabiting the sea, have changed
that the frequent extreme variability of any part which is developed in
that the greyhound and bull-dog, though so different, are really closely
that the increased size of the body would obviously require an increased
that the islands are far more effectually separated from each other than
that the juice or nectar was excreted from the inside of the flowers of
that the law is of universal application; but many good observers, more
that the points might have been converted through variation and natural
that the production of new forms has caused the extinction of about the
that there has not been time for the creation of mammals; many volcanic
that there was much migration from other parts of the world. As we have
that the rule has a wider extension, and that, when there is no apparent
that the seeds of 14/100 kinds of plants of any country might be floated
that these rudimentary or atrophied organs are imperfect and useless. In
that the similar bones in the arm of the monkey, in the fore leg of the
that the species included in the larger genera are more closely related
that the transitional forms would often long remain confined to some one
that they become differentiated by insensibly fine steps. Embryological
that the young flower-peduncles of the above Maurandia curved themselves
that they shall not be injurious: for if they were so, the species would
that they should be modified in the same manner as their parents. Again,
that this will have occurred only with plants which had already acquired
that we must not overrate the accuracy of organic change as a measure of
that when a cirripede is parasitic within another cirripede and is thus
the 550 species (but more are now known) inhabiting Madeira, are so far
the act of crossing with other varieties which had originated in a like
the adjoining parts; and every part of the structure which can be saved
The advantage of diversification of structure in the inhabitants of the
the age for reproduction were retarded, the character of the species, at
the air-breathing species; and he found it to differ in each in several
the air dissolved in the water, at the same time that they breathe free
the amount of difference between them, judging by analogy whether or not
The amount of food for each species, of course, gives the extreme limit
the ancient areas having remained nearly the same. Let it be remembered
the animals or plants has been suddenly and temporarily increased in any
the apparently quicker rate of change in terrestrial and in more highly
the apparent paradox, that the very same characters are analogical when
the archipelago. Hence we may safely infer that icebergs formerly landed
the arguments used by Forbes are to be trusted, it must be admitted that
the arm and forearm, or of the thigh and leg, transposed. Hence the same
the ass and zebra, the legs were much more plainly barred than the rest
the assumption that they are descended from a marsupial form), "this at
the average number of varieties. In large genera the species are apt to
the best chance of flourishing and surviving. The plants which produced
the borders of an utter desert, will competition cease. The land may be
the bottoms of the basins, if they had been excavated to the same depth
the breeds to diverge in character, both from each other and from their
the Cambrian formation; for in this case, there would not have been time
The case at present must remain inexplicable; and may be truly urged as
the case. It is obvious that unless the lower eye did thus travel round,
the case of leaf-climbers and tendril-bearers, it is this tendency which
the case of the revolving movements of twining plants. As a vast number
the case remained unique no answer could be given. But already Grimm has
The castes, moreover, do not generally graduate into each other, but are
the Catasetum, is widely different, though serving the same end; and is
the cat tribe, most of the species when adult are striped or spotted in
The causes which check the natural tendency of each species to increase
the cell, and I found that the rhombic plate had been completed, and had
the cells of the hive-bee and the simplicity of those of the humble-bee,
the centres of the six surrounding spheres in the same layer; and at the
the chapter on Classification. It would be almost superfluous to adduce
the Coccidae are capable of producing fertile eggs without the concourse
the common progenitor of groups, since become widely divergent. Extinct
the common turnip. According to the ordinary view of each species having
The complex and little known laws governing the production of varieties
the conditions of life did not insensibly graduate away from one part to
the conditions of life give vigour and fertility to all organic beings.
the conditions of life to which it is exposed, for each has to live by a
the consolidation of the crust can hardly have occurred less than twenty
The construction of the flower in another closely allied orchid, namely,
the contest soon decided: for instance, if several varieties of wheat be
the Cordillera of South America, nearly under the equator, glaciers once
the correlations between quite distinct parts are very curious; and many
The dependency of one organic being on another, as of a parasite on its
the development of a structure; and the requisite conditions may seldom
The development of the mammary glands would have been of no service, and
The difference in the length of the corolla in the two kinds of clover,
the discharge which attends upon the action of muscle and motor nerve."
the distant hill-tops: within the last ten years large spaces have been
the doctrine of natural selection or the survival of the fittest, which
the early stages of transition between any two forms, is small, for the
the eastern and western shores of South America are very distinct, with
the Eastern Islands to make its nest wholly of inspissated saliva. Some
the eastern Pacific islands, yet many fishes range from the Pacific into
the edges of the hexagonal walls of a single cell, or the extreme margin
the effects of subaerial degradation in the muddy rills which flow down
the effects, on the one hand, of a part being largely developed through
the eggs of silk moths which had not been fertilised, pass through their
The elder Geoffroy and Goethe propounded, at about the same time, their
the electric organs had been inherited from some one ancient progenitor,
The embryo in the course of development generally rises in organisation.
the embryos of these several forms; although in each form the fore-limb
The evidence that accidental mutilations can be inherited is at present
The existence of closely allied representative species in any two areas,
the eyes must be injurious to any animal, and as eyes are certainly not
The eyes of moles and of some burrowing rodents are rudimentary in size,
The fact, as we have seen, that all past and present organic beings can
The fact of the forms of life changing simultaneously in the above large
The fertility of varieties, that is of the forms known or believed to be
the fifth stage of descent. These five genera have also much in common,
the first and simplest stage, the terminal segment of a limb shuts down
the first dawn of life would be extremely rash; for every naturalist who
the first form; for this peculiar state of the reproductive system could
the flesh are considered by botanists as characters of the most trifling
the foliage at a considerable height (without climbing, for which hoofed
the former and less modified condition of the species. This view may be
the four wings of a butterfly, the two wings of a fly, and the two wings
the generally well defined distinctions between the innumerable organic
the geological nature of the islands, in their height or climate, or in
The giraffe, by its lofty stature, much elongated neck, fore legs, head
the Glacial period on the distribution of the same and of allied species
the great disadvantage of not being able to give them. I can only repeat
the great Von Baer believed to be "in fact more highly organised than a
the ground and thus get transported? It occurred to me that land-shells,
the growing edges of the cells all round. The work of construction seems
the Himalaya, at points 900 miles apart, glaciers have left the marks of
the horns are much less serviceable, because less constant. In classing
the horse, so that both the mule and the hinny resemble more closely the
the icy streams with which their valleys were lately filled. So greatly
The identity of many plants and animals, on mountain-summits, separated
the immutability of species, that geology yields no linking forms. This
the improved descendants of any one species to supplant and exterminate
the individuals of any one species or variety in a state of nature. And
the individuals of the same species? Why should some species cross with
the individuals which presented slight deviations of structure mutually
the inevitable result is, that the modified descendants proceeding from
the inhabitants of islands and those of the nearest mainland--the still
the inheritance of such variations, are indispensable for the action of
the insular forms have intercrossed. It should be borne in mind that the
the intermediate mountain ranges, are removed on the views above given.
The intervals between the horizontal lines in the diagram, may represent
the intervals between the several successive formations; whether Europe
their action than with the larger fins above." Perhaps the lesser number
their arrangement, could have been of any service, but now we know this
their conditions of life, will generally leave most progeny. But success
their great difference in closely allied species; that secondary sexual
their habits of life. On my theory, unity of type is explained by unity
their history. The key is man's power of accumulative selection: nature
their larvae and pupae to stimulate them to work, they did nothing; they
their likeness on their hybrid offspring; but these two powers do not at
their newly-acquired economical instincts to new swarms, which in their
their offspring, at a corresponding age. The embryo is thus left almost
their parent-species, is much less than that between the species of the
their proper places in the natural system, have often found rudimentary
their pure parents; and these hybrids are almost always utterly sterile,
their resemblance, may be found. Altogether no less than ten genera are
their sensitive tendrils, and by the emission of aerial rootlets; these
their structure which have varied within a moderately recent period, and
their structure with that of the rock-pigeon, C. livia, whether they had
their wings to gain their subsistence, have, as Mr. Wollaston suspects,
the jaws of the dog and Tasmanian wolf or Thylacinus--animals which are
the lapse of time, under changing conditions of life, if any part comes
the largest sense, being Growth with reproduction; Inheritance which is
the last chapter I shall give a brief recapitulation of the whole work,
the last forty or fifty years from Australia. The Neilgherrie Mountains
the laws governing their imperfect development. We have plenty of cases
the line of succession is broken at regular intervals by small numbered
the line will sometimes falsely appear to begin at its lower end, not in
the lion and the puma. We occasionally, though rarely, see something of
the living bodies of caterpillars; and at other such cases. The wonder,
the long lapse of geological time, whilst the island was being upheaved,
the lower animals might range into a cold climate and perish there every
the lower animals, that is, how the sense of beauty in its simplest form
the lower side begins to glide slowly round the head to the upper side;
the malacostraca, appear at first as larvae under the nauplius-form; and
the male bird, is also remarkable from the wonderful development of the
the males alone. How the sense of beauty in its simplest form--that is,
the males. Colour and constitutional peculiarities go together, of which
the mammary glands, would have been improved or rendered more effective.
the manufactory still in action, more especially as we have every reason
the marine inhabitants of the continuous sea. We might therefore expect
the maximum number of seeds produced by two species when first crossed,
the members of the great pigeon family: these feathers are kept expanded
the membranes of the eye. The relations of the muscles are as different
the mental powers, any more than I have with that of life itself. We are
the mere adhesion of grafted stocks and the union of the male and female
the modification has been comparatively recent and extraordinarily great
the more important; for nearly similar variations sometimes arise under,
the morning and evening; and, as Huber expressly states, their principal
the most ancient species have left modified descendants, yet, at remote
the most careful experimentalists have arrived at diametrically opposite
the most effective of all checks. I estimated (chiefly from the greatly
the most extreme forms, as the Italian greyhound, bloodhound, bull-dog,
the most important vital organs, are found to offer characters of quite
the most prolific area is fully stocked with specific forms: at the Cape
themselves differ in a manner very difficult to account for considering
themselves have their reproductive systems seriously affected, and their
them, so as to favour in any degree the transportal of the pollen, would
them with more zeal and sagacity. He first gives in detail all the many
the naked and extensive areas of such rocks in many parts of the world,
then an unequivocally vegetable existence." Therefore, on the principle
the native inhabitants are now so perfectly adapted to each other and to
then at the figures representing several million years, the two produce
The naturalist thus loses his best guide in determining whether to rank
 the Natural Selection of instincts--Neuter or sterile insects--Summary.
the natural system is genealogical in its arrangement, like a pedigree.
the nature of each variation depends on two factors, viz., the nature of
The nature of the bond is frequently quite obscure. M. Is. Geoffroy St.
the nature of the conditions apparently plays a quite subordinate part.
the nearly wingless condition of several birds, now inhabiting or which
the necessity of a large stock of the same species for its preservation,
the neuters or sterile females in insect communities: for these neuters
the Northern United States," 260 naturalised plants are enumerated, and
the nostrils to the mouth, the only character, according to Owen, which
then so imperfect is our view into long-past geological ages that we see
then, sooner or later, a gradual decrease. If the number of the species
then, that Nature's productions should be far "truer" in character than
then these same naturalists rank the slightest difference as of specific
the numberless transitional links which must formerly have connected the
the number of species which might be produced. We do not know that even
the numbers of the species belonging to the same genera, yet the species
the offspring at a corresponding nearly mature age. Thus the young will
the old clumps, I counted thirty-two little trees; and one of them, with
the older Fish, the older Cephalopods, and the eocene Mammals, with the
the older Pliocene period, a large number of the same plants and animals
the oldest known mammals, reptiles, and fishes strictly belong to their
the old inhabitants become modified the mutual relations of others will
the oolitic slates of Solenhofen. Hardly any recent discovery shows more
the opposite side, by considering the vast reduction of brachiopods, and
the opposite side of the equator, we know, from the excellent researches
the organisation has once begun to vary, it generally continues varying
The origin of most of our domestic animals will probably forever remain
theory, for such could not have been produced through natural selection.
theory have existed, but abrupt, though perhaps slight, changes of form.
theory. I may here premise, that I have nothing to do with the origin of
theory of descent with modification. As the subject is somewhat complex,
theory of descent with modification. New species have come on the stage
theory, the instinct of each species is good for itself, but has never,
the other. But if we compare these species where they intermingle, they
the other end of the series we have the cells of the hive-bee, placed in
the other hand, are either quite useless, such as teeth which never cut
the other hand, nurserymen, from keeping large stocks of the same plant,
the others, and this closely mocked another form of Ithomia. From facts
the Pacific and the eastern shores of Africa on almost exactly opposite
the parallelism between the difficulty of making a first cross, and the
the parent and of the parent in relation to the young. In social animals
the parent rock-pigeon were likewise destroyed, and under nature we have
the parent-species, or other allied hybrids, generally grow in the same
the part has to serve for some one special purpose. In the same way that
the periods during which they retained the same form. It is the dominant
the petals into a tube. Hard parts seem to affect the form of adjoining
the pile of rocks on either side of the crack having been smoothly swept
the planes of imaginary intersection between the basins on the opposite
the planets thus revolve round the sun? An eminent physiologist accounts
the plants that deviate from the proper standard. With animals this kind
The Pleuronectidae, or Flat-fish, are remarkable for their asymmetrical
the points in which all the species of a genus resemble each other, and
the pollen-tubes protrude, they do not penetrate the stigmatic surface.
the power of moving, gained for other and beneficial purposes. Whether,
the power of steady misrepresentation; but the history of science shows
the power of stinging be useful to the social community, it will fulfil
the practised eyes of an entomologist, it would often deceive predaceous
the present manner of distribution that they have spread from one island
the previous dynasty. In the time of the Romans, as we hear from Pliny,
the principle is acknowledged. In rude and barbarous periods of English
the principle of selection as "that which enables the agriculturist, not
the probability of conversion from one function to another, that I will
the process of further modification, by which two varieties are supposed
the pronunciation, but which serve as a clue for its derivation. On the
the proportion of three to two, having a mean thickness, from twenty-one
The real difficulty in our present subject is not, as it appears to me,
there are cases, as with certain parasitic crustaceans, in which several
There are other relations between the species of large genera and their
the reception of a peculiar kind of pleasure from certain colours, forms
therefore equals all the geological formations which have been examined
therefore not favourable to bees, nevertheless every female flower which
therefore, nothing improbable in supposing that some early Cetacean form
therefore these same characters would be more likely again to vary than
therefore we can see why they do not exist on strictly oceanic islands.
there is one in Merionethshire of 12,000 feet; yet in these cases there
There is one other point which is worth notice. Varieties generally have
There is some reason to believe that organisms high in the scale, change
There remains, however, this difficulty. After an organ has ceased being
there seem to me any great difficulty in a single insect (as in the case
the result of his great horticultural knowledge. Nothing is easier than
there was less beauty on the face of the earth than since he came on the
there were a few pollen-grains, and on some a profusion. As the wind had
the Roman classical writers. From passages in Genesis, it is clear that
the rule are so few that they may fairly be attributed to our not having
the same as if we were to see a set of workmen building a house, of whom
the same, but the means, though appearing superficially to be the same,
the same country the existing and the extinct will be closely allied by
the same genus are descended from a single parent-form, acclimatisation
the same genus have been formed, or where, if we may use the expression,
the same genus with the parent A, or those from I with parent I. But the
the same groups likewise occur. It is a rule of high generality that the
the same individual. He includes monsters and varieties, not from their
the same instincts. For instance, we can understand, on the principle of
the same Ithomia: so that in the same place, species of three genera of
the same kind in plants; thus the first leaves of the ulex or furze, and
the same law holds good with sea-shells, but, from the wide distribution
the same or of distinct species, which subsist on the same kind of food.
the same part or organ in the allied species, must have gone through an
the same pattern, and should include similar bones, in the same relative
the same place in the natural economy of the land. These representative
The same principle is seen in the naturalisation of plants through man's
The same principles apply to the distribution of terrestrial animals and
The same principles are followed by horticulturists; but the variations
the same rate from the opposite sides; for I have noticed half-completed
the same species. And it seems to me that nothing less than a long list
the same species could have passed from one point to the other. But the
the same specific character. This fact, together with that of the seeds
the same time it is furnished with a rattle for its own injury, namely,
the same to the inexorable principles of natural selection. If we admire
the scale, how is it that throughout the world a multitude of the lowest
these be kept under the same conditions of life, almost always leads to
these bones have been retained "to complete the scheme of nature," why,
These brief remarks apply to plants alone; but some few analogous facts
the secondary forms. So that by this fundamental test of victory in the
the second crop are somewhat smaller, and that these are visited by many
these connecting forms which are now rare were to become totally extinct
these doubtful and closely allied forms have permanently retained their
the seed and embryo, are of paramount importance! So again, in formerly
the seeds in the ray-florets of some Compositae countenances this idea;
the seeds, until a beak was formed, as well constructed for this purpose
the seeds, which were a little better adapted to be wafted by the wind,
the selection of improved forms by man. Many curious instances could be
these little plants adhering to their backs; and it has happened to me,
These remarks apply chiefly to littoral and sublittoral deposits. In the
These several facts accord well with our theory, which includes no fixed
these tints are of service to these birds and insects in preserving them
The several difficulties here discussed, namely, that, though we find in
the several formations being separated from each other by wide intervals
the shape in which it leaves the ovum, to the soles, which are entirely
the shores of a continent when first broken up into an archipelago), and
the shoveller-duck is furnished with lamellae of equal length with these
The six descendants from (I) will form two sub-genera or genera. But as
the skull are homologous--that is, correspond in number and in relative
the slightest differences of structure or constitution may well turn the
the so-called alternate generations of some of the lower animals. It is,
the south, than in a reversed direction. We see, however, a few southern
the species have gone on slowly changing during the accumulation of the
the species in common, which inhabited the New and Old Worlds, migrated
The species of all kinds which inhabit oceanic islands are few in number
the species of the same genus. On the other hand the struggle will often
the species--until an ant was formed as abjectly dependent on its slaves
the species which lived at the commencement and close of each formation,
the species with the densest heads which most frequently differ in their
the spout, and rub against the properly placed viscid pollen-masses and
the steps can be followed by which a fixed spine becomes articulated to
 the sterility of first crosses and of hybrids--Parallelism between the
The sterility of first crosses and of their hybrid progeny has not been
The store of nutriment laid up within the seeds of many plants seems at
the structure, in some degree obscured, of the prototypes of each great
the structure or habits of one species would often give it an advantage
the sub-Himalayan deposits. The Silurian Lingula differs but little from
the successive, slight, profitable modifications did not first arise in
the SUDDEN development of the snapping action would have been beneficial
the supply of sediment must for ages have been great, from the enormous
the survival of the communities with females which produced most neuters
the tendency to inheritance; that like produces like is his fundamental
The theory of natural selection is grounded on the belief that each new
the theory we ought to find. Look again at the later tertiary deposits,
the three families formed of eight genera (a14 to m14), on the uppermost
the three sub-species would hold exactly the same relation to each other
the time the basins had acquired the above stated width (i.e. about the
the true explanation. The mocked forms, which always abound in numbers,
the two, and the nature of the conditions. The direct action of changed
the two areas, and their separation by the whole Atlantic Ocean. We can
The ultimate result is that each creature tends to become more and more
the upper chalk; so that we now have abundant evidence of the existence
the uppermost line would be rendered less distinct from each other. If,
the variations given to him by nature, and thus accumulates them in any
the various forms of life first appeared; and this may well be disputed.
the vast lapse of time represented by the thinner formation. Many cases
the victory to one organic being over another. Nevertheless, so profound
the view here maintained, it is obvious that the Galapagos Islands would
the water; but between the the several members of the whale family, the
the wings of birds have passed; but what special difficulty is there in
the wolves inhabiting a mountainous district, and those frequenting the
the woodpecker and the mistletoe; and only a little less plainly in the
the workers were in this condition; we should then have had a species of
the world will obviously tend to leave in that quarter, during the next
they add, "If struck by this strange sequence, we turn our attention to
they are both placed on the upper side of the head. During early youth,
they are closely connected by intermediate links; nor will the commonly
they are conjectural, and their relative probability cannot be weighed,
They are indifferent whether the desired qualities are acquired earlier
they are not of the least use in the way of climbing, which is the point
they are suspended; and within the same ovarium of some few plants, one
they come into competition with each other, than between the species of
they have been called by some authors, representative species; and these
they have subsequently become specially acclimatised to their new homes,
they likewise perform strange antics before the females, which, standing
they must have descended from at least seven or eight aboriginal stocks;
they no doubt serve as tactile organs; hence the length of the ears can
the young or the larvae might be rendered by natural selection more and
they plainly display an American type of structure. We ascend the lofty
they project so much inward; yet this goose, as I am informed by Mr. E.
they stopped their excavations in due time; so that the basins, as soon
they were immediately considered as varieties; and now I have been able
they will have been liable to modification; and they have been modified;
they would be sure to fly to their natural fresh-water haunts. I do not
thicker than the excessively thin finished wall of the cell, which will
thickness, of which the formations are composed, we may infer that from
thigh-bone "articulated to a well-defined acetabulum in the pelvis," and
think may be trusted, is that, at whatever period of life a peculiarity
think no one will dispute that the ovigerous frena in the one family are
this amount of change may have suddenly arisen in a seedling. So it has
this, and in almost every other case, the enquiry may be pushed further
this cannot be considered as quite correct after the facts given on the
This canon, if we look to the present inhabitants alone of the world, is
this case will be treated of in the next chapter. The electric organs of
this cause alone the intermediate varieties will be liable to accidental
this conclusion. The case of America alone would almost suffice to prove
this condition! Several facts, namely, that beetles in many parts of the
this early age. The calf, for instance, has inherited teeth, which never
this effect, I cannot find even one which seems to me of any weight. It
this even in so trifling a fact as that the same poison often similarly
this fact; on asking some farmers in Virginia how it was that all their
this fly having acquired the power of a sexual reproduction. As long as
This group includes the large majority of existing species. But certain
this hybrid "seeds as freely as it is possible to imagine." Had hybrids,
this is effected, for instance, by glands at the base of the stipules in
this is known occasionally to happen, as I once saw, in a pure terrier:
this is often seen in monstrous plants: and nothing is more common than
This is one of the most important subjects in the whole round of natural
this is seen in those breeds of fowls which very rarely or never become
This is the case with the male Ibla, and in a truly extraordinary manner
this is true. This fact might have been theoretically expected, for, as
This is well shown in the drawings given by Owen of the leg bones of the
this, judging by the eye, seemed almost to be the case; but on actually
This juice, though small in quantity, is greedily sought by insects; but
This latter alternative, which was first propounded by Pallas, seems by
this nature are common, and are, as we shall hereafter see, inexplicable
this orchid) is thus carried to the flower of the female plant, where it
this or that structure been gained by certain species, to which it would
this other species being, according to our view, only a well-marked and
this point of view, no instance will ever be found of an important part
This remarkable instinct was first discovered in the Formica (Polyerges)
this rule. The amount of organic change, as Pictet has remarked, is not
this seems to me of especial importance, that two or three forms of the
This subject will be more fully discussed in our chapter on Geology; but
this surface consequently has been gradually lowered, with the lines of
this surprising, seeing how profoundly ignorant we are in regard to the
this system are indisputable. But many naturalists think that something
this tint, and which would not probably have all appeared together from
those characters which are mainly distinctive of each breed are in each
those created in America? There is nothing in the conditions of life, in
those many admirable varieties of the strawberry were raised which have
those naturalists who, knowing far less of the laws of inheritance than
those of the Cape de Verde Archipelago, and of the other African islands
those of the continental F. rufescens. The latter does not build its own
those of the mountains of Siberia to the arctic regions of that country.
those that are bad, preserving and adding up all that are good; silently
those two conscientious and admirable observers, Kolreuter and Gartner,
though distributed to the most remote points of the world, are descended
though in this case, as in that of the individuals of the same species,
though it is strengthened by experience, and by the sight of fear of the
though many and long as measured by years, have been short in comparison
though retaining perfect health. This does not occur, or only in a very
thousands of generations, and I see an animal striped like a zebra, but
thousands of miles beyond its confines; and analogy plainly leads to the
thousand years, so probably have none in any part of the world. But, as
thousand years, supposing that this seed were never destroyed and could
three forms, a10, f10, and m10, which, from having diverged in character
three serrated arms, neatly fitting together and placed on the summit of
three which form the pyramidal base of a single cell on one side of the
through an increase in their size and the obliteration of their adhesive
through changes in the direction of the ocean currents. So conversely it
through one form having some advantage over other forms in the struggle
Throughout an enormously large proportion of the ocean, the bright blue
throughout the world, is explicable on the theory of natural selection.
throughout the world on geographical distribution. And we have now seen
throughout whole islands in a period of less than ten years. Several of
through the advancing winter, which will suffer the most. When we travel
through the aid of selection, by man has given rise to many well-adapted
through the reduction of more numerous bones in the fin of some ancient
through this latter agency. It is a strange result which we thus arrive
thus acquired would almost necessarily have differed. On the hypothesis
thus a family of stags once existed with an antler only on one side; and
thus boldly made a great beginning, and shows us how classification will
Thus, community in embryonic structure reveals community of descent; but
Thus Graba estimates that about one-fifth of the guillemots in the Faroe
Thus I can understand how a flower and a bee might slowly become, either
thus increasing in the number of their species, or that no small genera
Thus it is, as I believe, that when the males and females of any animal
thus link together the living genera of three families, would be partly
thus only understand a fact with which I was much struck when examining
Thus we see that when organic beings are placed under new and unnatural
time the male element of this second form is enabled freely to fertilise
to 3,000 feet. Professor Ramsay has published an account of a downthrow
to act as hands, in another as paddles, in another as wings; but on the
to admit that sickness in the individual is the forerunner of death--to
toads, newts) are never found on any of the many islands with which the
to anything of the kind in the country. But, for our purpose, a form of
to a touch, by which means the foot-stalks of the leaves or flowers, or
to become the progenitor of a whole new class of insects, the course of
to be excessively small, these three forms may still be only well-marked
to be fertilised, by no less than eight other species of Nicotiana. Many
to be injurious, it will be modified; or if it be not so, the being will
to believe that in the course of time the effects have been greater than
to believe that the naturalised plants and animals have nearly or quite
to bring pollen from one flower to the other, it is equally preposterous
to conceive by what steps these wondrous organs have been produced. But
to conjecture how this could have been effected. Yet, as we have reason
to differ in some character from its parents, and the offspring of this
to dogmatize on the succession of organic forms throughout the world, as
to dry the stems and branches of ninety-four plants with ripe fruit, and
to each other that half the stamens in two of the forms stand on a level
to embed and preserve the remains before they had time to decay. On the
together, during its growth and development, that when slight variations
together in the same country. I will give only a single instance, which,
together the extreme states; and these are then degraded to the rank of
together with abundant food, on the whole organisation is probably still
together with nicely balanced forces, extremely slight modifications in
to give an explanation of this fact, which if true would be fatal to my
to his standard of beauty, I can see no good reason to doubt that female
to hold good when one variety and several mixed varieties of wheat have
to its possessor. If a fair balance be struck between the good and evil
to lose their acquired characters, while kept under the same conditions
to make up for much destruction at some period of life; and this period
to marvel greatly when the species ceases to exist, is much the same as
to me, by adaptation for similarly active movements through thickets and
to me only restating the fact in dignified language. He who believes in
to Mr. Herbert Spencer, being that life depends on, or consists in, the
to myself forms DIRECTLY intermediate between them. But this is a wholly
to our common woodpecker is plainly declared; yet, as I can assert, not
to partake little of the character of demonstration, and to have little
to produce other new and dominant species. Consequently the groups which
torpedo. It is generally admitted that there exists between these organs
to species closely related to each other. But to extend it so far as to
to suck nectar, but to gnaw off the ridges within the chamber above the
to the action of natural selection. Some observers are convinced that a
to the African mainland. It must be admitted that these facts receive no
to the direct action of putrid matter; but we should be very cautious in
To the effects of intercrossing in eliminating variations of all kinds,
to the fourteen-thousandth generation. We may suppose that only one (F)
to the horse and tapir, we have no reason to suppose that links directly
to their aboriginal stocks. Hence it has been argued that no deductions
to the land being already thickly clothed with other plants; so that the
to the length of time which has elapsed since the colonists entered one
to the present day; and that during these vast periods the world swarmed
To the question why we do not find rich fossiliferous deposits belonging
to the rule. For instance, the species of mastodons and elephants, when
to the same identical species, which have either full-sized and perfect
to the same undoubted species, and differ from each other in no respect
to those groups of animals which cannot cross wide spaces of the ocean,
to vary just when gardeners began to attend to this plant. No doubt the
toward augmentation of size, then we should be able to understand how an
to warn its prey. I would almost as soon believe that the cat curls the
to which each can increase; but very frequently it is not the obtaining
to which the parts have been specialised or differentiated; and natural
to work on and improve. When I made this prediction, I knew of only one
transformation must rather have been injurious." But he might have found
transient such impressions are, to remember that the greatest discovery
transitional forms. Let us take a simple case: in travelling from north
transmitted by inheritance to succeeding generations. It can be clearly
transmitted to almost all mammals, feathers to all birds, and scales to
transmitted to an earlier age. I can see no more difficulty in this than
transportation of seeds. I could give many facts showing how frequently
transported by man to many parts of the world, and now have a far wider
transported foxes, as now frequently happens in the arctic regions. Yet
transport: out of one small portion of earth thus COMPLETELY enclosed by
transverse bars on the legs are not rare in duns, mouse-duns, and in one
treated by several authors, and I hope in a future work to discuss it at
tree grows; that there should be diving thrushes and diving Hymenoptera,
trees belonging to all orders have their sexes more often separated than
tree will not take on another from differences in their rate of growth,
tried by Aucapitaine recovered. It is, however, not at all probable that
trifling a character may be--let it be the mere inflection of the angle
trilobites are descended from some one crustacean, which must have lived
trimorphic Lythrum salicaria, and that he determined to try by crossing
trimorphic plants the different lengths of the stamens and pistils, and
tropical climate, or conversely. So again, many succulent plants cannot
tropical parts of the Pacific, we encounter no impassable barriers, and
true, and yet may never be capable of proof. Seeing, for instance, that
truth, look at the plants which have their several organs much modified
trying to economise in every part of the organisation. If under changed
tuco-tuco, or Ctenomys, is even more subterranean in its habits than the
tumbler-pigeon) choosing and breeding from birds with longer and longer
tumbler pigeons, though some of the subvarieties differ in the important
tumble. We may believe that some one pigeon showed a slight tendency to
turkeys) from under her and conceal themselves in the surrounding grass
Turning now to the Australian species: though these birds generally lay
twenty heads of Dutch clover (Trifolium repens) yielded 2,290 seeds, but
twenty-one (or perhaps twenty-three) are peculiar; whereas of the eleven
twenty species grown on a little plot of mown turf (three feet by four)
twigs from the bushes on which they feed, offer an excellent instance of
twigs which flourished when the tree was a mere bush, only two or three,
two calyx-lobes with the other organs tetramerous, while the surrounding
two closely allied genera, namely Cypris and Cytherea, there is no such
two continents on the ordinary view of their independent creation. That
two eminently capable judges, namely Mr. Blyth and Captain Hutton, that
two great laws--Unity of Type, and the Conditions of Existence. By unity
two orders of mammals and fishes, are analogical. So is the resemblance
two or even three distinct female forms; and by Fritz Muller, of certain
two or more distinct breeds are crossed, none of which are blue or have
two species. But as these two groups have gone on diverging in character
two species, of two genera. Hence a swarm of locusts, such as that which
two species, the reproductive system, independently of the general state
two, which may be called illegitimate, are more or less infertile. With
type to take the place of one belonging to another type; but this seems
udders in cows and goats in countries where they are habitually milked,
ultimately slaughtered by their industrious and sterile sisters? It may
unaffected, and serves as a record of the past condition of the species.
unaltered likeness to a distinct futurity. And of the species now living
uncivilised man because they were useful, and because they bred readily
under a bell glass, no less than eighty-two plants sprung from it: these
under a more favourable climate for intermigration, will account for the
under an Arctic climate. The ruins of a house burnt by fire do not tell
under conditions of life not so uniform as, and somewhat different from,
under confinement, and not because they were subsequently found capable
under confinement, even when the male and female unite. How many animals
under confinement in its native country, whilst the domestic pig or dog
under different circumstances, or through occasional means of transport,
Under domestication monstrosities sometimes occur which resemble normal
under domestication should not have acted under nature. In the survival
under domestication, unless abrupt variations of this kind are specially
undergoing change through some innate law. Lapse of time is only so far
undergo modification to some extent. The extinction of old forms is the
under nature, and the greater variability of species having wide ranges
understand the excessively complex and radiating affinities by which all
understand the high importance of barriers, whether of land or water, in
understand. These agencies may be all grouped together, for the sake of
understand why, when a species has once disappeared, it never reappears.
under two distinct forms; one of these has strong and differently shaped
unequally related, forming sections and sub-genera, species of distinct
 unfavourable to the results of Natural Selection, namely, intercrossing,
uniform conditions, than have domestic varieties; and this may well make
unimproved or but little improved, and might remain for indefinite ages
uninhabited islands large birds are not more fearful than small; and the
unintelligible to me that it should be denied in the other. I am glad to
unintentionally stocked the one with fresh-water shells from the other.
United States. On this view we can understand the relationship with very
universally admitted, that in most cases the area inhabited by a species
universally be ranked as a species; from man attending only to external
universal, must be admitted by every one who will look at some venomous
universal rule; for here the characteristic differences must either have
Unless we admit transformations as prodigious as those advocated by Mr.
until we reach the extreme confines of life, in the Arctic regions or on
unusual occurrence of favourable circumstances, and the blank intervals
up in my study for six months, pulling up and counting each plant as it
upland geese with webbed feet which rarely go near the water; and no one
upper jaws of whales and ruminants, can often be detected in the embryo,
used for classing genera. I believe this explanation is partly, yet only
use in defining a group or in allocating any particular species. If they
utilised through natural selection, until they had become converted into
utterly extinct and leaving no modified progeny. Of the species which do
valley, which, there can hardly be a doubt, once formed a huge moraine;
variability; and in the foregoing cases the conditions the changed, and
variability. In the former case the nature of the organism is such that
variability in these main nerves in Coccus, which may almost be compared
variability is generally related to the conditions of life to which each
variability to each species, but when they meet with a somewhat greater
variability, whereas it implies only the preservation of such variations
variable, because they have recently varied and thus come to differ; but
variable forms, local forms, sub species and representative species can
variable than generic characters; and how the parts which are developed
variable than generic. To explain by a simple example what is meant: if
variable than the shape or colour of the body, etc.; whereas with sheep
variable than those parts of the organisation which have for a very long
variation are infinitely complex and diversified. It is well worth while
variation?" But the case is not here put fairly. It is admitted by most
variation, but they refuse to extend the same view to other and slightly
variation. Hence, in fact, the law of the Conditions of Existence is the
variation is supposed to have been accumulated to form it into a fairly
variation; perhaps of not more importance than the nature of the spark,
variations have played in modifying the mental qualities of our domestic
variations in some way advantageous, which consequently endure. Owing to
variations of this part would, it is highly probable, be taken advantage
variations (taking the word in the largest sense) which have supervened
variation, the nature of which we are unable to understand, undoubtedly
variation. Why should this be so? On the view that each species has been
varied habits of this genus, that a Mexican Colaptes has been described
varied in some manner, giving it twice as good a chance of life as that
varied in the irregularities on its surface, and in these having become
varieties, and found them absolutely sterile, we may doubt whether many
varieties are invariably preserved: a medium form may often long endure,
varieties are often at first local--both causes rendering the discovery
varieties between the allied species which lived at its commencement and
varieties; but who will pretend that in future ages so many fossil links
varieties for very long periods, as has been shown to be the case by Mr.
varieties had been neglected. As soon, however, as gardeners picked out
 varieties in being very closely, but unequally, related to each other,
varieties, I was led to anticipate that the species of the larger genera
varieties often suddenly produced and semi-monstrous in character, than
varieties of the bean or maize probably differ more in size than do the
varieties, though necessary as the foundation for the work, helps us but
varieties. We have, also, seen that the species, which are the commonest
varieties were as good and as distinct species as any in the world; but
varieties, when rendered very distinct from each other, take the rank of
varieties will, from reasons already assigned (namely from what we know
varieties will not spread into other and distant regions until they are
variety and so little real novelty? Why should all the parts and organs
variety be subjected during several generations to the same conditions,
Various birds, as has already been remarked, occasionally lay their eggs
various breeds have been sensibly changed in the course of two or three
various colours are crossed, we see a strong tendency for the blue tint
various hours during May, June and August, both in Surrey and Hampshire,
various parts in monsters; but I doubt whether any of these cases throw
varying; but under any other point of view many instances assuredly can
varying in the same manner; in the front and hind legs, and even in the
vary in the right direction and to the right degree. With the different
vegetable kingdoms; for in this case there can be no artificial increase
ventured to surmise that birds might have existed which used their wings
vertebrata. The retina is wholly different, with an actual inversion of
vertebrata, to the co-existence of mammals and fish--among mammalia, to
very first time that they are taken out; retrieving is certainly in some
very general, though not universal, difference in structure between the
very intricate subject, for naturalists have not defined to each other's
very long periods of time, immensely long as measured by years, too much
very process of natural selection constantly tends, as has been so often
very quick rate. Hence with animals of this nature, for instance birds,
very rare, close interbreeding will help to exterminate it; authors have
very strongly in the case of secondary sexual characters, when displayed
very trifling importance, may thus be acted on. When we see leaf-eating
very widely. Nor is it meant that the species in such genera have, on an
vibracula. These generally consist of long bristles, capable of movement
view it is probable that the various classes would have immigrated more
view of each organism with all its separate parts having been specially
view of each species having been produced in one area alone, and having
views. But such cases are certainly exceptional; the general rule being
view that species are only strongly marked and fixed varieties, we might
view that they consist of metamorphosed leaves, arranged in a spire. In
vigorously repulsed by an independent community of the slave species (F.
vigorous males to struggle for the females; he does not rigidly destroy
viscid matter, such as that secreted by the stigmas of ordinary flowers,
visited Madeira, might readily be the means of introducing several kinds
wants any of these qualities, he will assuredly fail. Few would readily
was first acquired, we do not know any more than how certain odours and
was originally instinctive in them, for I am informed by Captain Hutton
was provided with similar points of horn on the palate, but rather more
water, and then dashing into it like a kingfisher at a fish. In our own
water-breathing branchiae, even to the microscopical hooks by which they
water, independently of physical conditions. The naturalist must be dull
water. In two of these families, which were more especially examined by
water near the mouth of the Mississippi during some part of the glacial
water plants; fish are frequently devoured by birds, and thus the seeds
water. Their dispersal may, however, be mainly attributed to changes in
water, they could not endure our climate. Almost every year, one or two
ways, directly on the whole organisation or on certain parts alone, and
weapons. The males of carnivorous animals are already well armed; though
We are thus brought to the question which has been largely discussed by
we can clearly see that if we wish in imagination to give the plant the
We can understand how it is that dominant forms which spread widely and
we find no inexplicable instances of the same mammals inhabiting distant
we have a limiting check independent of the struggle for life. But even
we have also seen in the second chapter that the same principle applies
We have as yet only spoken incidentally of the disappearance of species
we have flying birds and mammals, flying insects of the most diversified
we have no right to expect often to find a generic amount of difference
We have seen in the last chapter that whole groups of species sometimes
We have seen that a species under new conditions of life may change its
We have seen that the sterility of hybrids which have their reproductive
we have the cells of the Mexican Melipona domestica, carefully described
We here see that there is no need to separate single pairs, as man does,
we know so little about the uses of these organs, and as we know nothing
well developed and project beneath the margin; so that the beak of this
well-established and distinct breeds. As the differences became greater,
well-known varieties can be named which have not been ranked as species
well-marked differences; whereas varieties, the supposed prototypes and
well-marked manner across the wide expanse of tropical South America, it
We may, I think, conclude that sediment must be accumulated in extremely
We may often falsely attribute to correlated variation structures which
We may safely infer that with marine animals of all kinds there has been
were dusky and mottled. I then crossed one of the mongrel barb-fantails
were first urged against Sir Charles Lyell's noble views on "the modern
were immutable productions was almost unavoidable as long as the history
were originally domesticated, and yet be unknown to ornithologists; and
were so thoroughly domesticated in ancient times by half-civilized man,
were then capable of germination. But I do not doubt that plants exposed
were to go on varying, and the varieties were continually selected which
we see individuals, though taken young from a state of nature perfectly
We see in many cases in the more recent tertiary formations that rarity
We see the same fact in the great difference between the inhabitants of
We see the same great law in the construction of the mouths of insects:
we see this even with migratory birds, which almost always return to the
we should be driven to, if we were ever to succeed in collecting all the
we should learn nothing, for the feet of lizards and mammals, the wings
We should remember that the skull at this early age is cartilaginous and
We thus see that, although there is a clear and great difference between
We will now discuss in a little more detail the struggle for existence.
We will return to Mr. Mivart's other objections. Insects often resemble
what can be more different than the immensely long spiral proboscis of a
whatever. Great diversity in the size of two plants, one being woody and
what geology tells us of the rate and manner at which the inhabitants of
what is called the Natural System, is utterly inexplicable on the theory
when an author remarks with surprise that some important organ or part,
When bees have a place on which they can stand in their proper positions
when crossed is so different in degree and graduates away so insensibly,
When discussing special cases, Mr. Mivart passes over the effects of the
whenever complicated experiments are in progress, so careful an observer
when first crossed, and that of their hybrid offspring, cannot have been
when hybernating and having a membranous diaphragm over the mouth of the
when their tentacula are protruded." The avicularia, like the vibracula,
when the same larva has during one stage to search for food, and during
When the views advanced by me in this volume, and by Mr. Wallace or when
when used either as the father or mother, and crossed with the Nicotiana
when well developed, of a tridactyle forceps--that is, of one formed of
when we look at the subject more closely, we find in the several fishes
When we see any part or organ developed in a remarkable degree or manner
where the supply of sediment was sufficient to keep the sea shallow and
wherever several bees had begun to excavate these basins near together,
Whether natural selection has really thus acted in adapting the various
whether still retaining the same specific form or subsequently modified,
whether the exceptions to continuity of range are so numerous, and of so
whether they were specifically distinct. He would find that they yielded
which an ancient form became adapted in its larval state to some special
which are exactly alike during an early embryonic period, become widely
which are not modified having immigrated in a body, so that their mutual
which cannot fly eighteen inches high without going head over heels. It
which determines the visits of the hive-bee, must be very trifling; for
which each complex instinct has been acquired--for these could be found
which exist. As some rude resemblance is necessary for the first start,
which feed largely on fruit, and others with elongated wings which chase
which forms only a part of one whole geological period; and likewise to
which have been slowly acquired through selection. A tendency to sudden
which have certainly existed. The parent form of any two or more species
which have slightly varied, give vigour and fertility to the offspring.
which have thus come to differ. Or to state the case in another manner:
which I am capable, that the view which most naturalists until recently
which I have collected, and which cannot possibly be here introduced. I
which implies great breaks or discontinuity in the series, appears to me
which I quite agree with him. He then adds: "If the transit was gradual,
which is met with in muscle and nerve during the rest, and the discharge
which it belongs, while the counterfeiters have changed their dress and
which man for some object selects, must of necessity first occur. Others
which may fancifully be called living fossils, will aid us in forming a
which may have been effected in the long course of time through nature's
which must be called important, whether viewed under a physiological or
which organs of locomotion or of the senses, etc., would be useless; and
which originally served to tie together the pollen-grains, can be traced
which serve merely as sails. As organs in this condition would formerly,
which sooner or later became constant through the nature of the organism
which they are constructed. With respect to the formation of wax, it is
which they had then reached. When advanced up to any given point, there
which this strange and odious instinct was acquired, if it were of great
which unite for each birth and wander much, and which do not breed at a
which wander little and can increase at a rapid rate, a new and improved
which we have seen is so potent in the hands of man, apply under nature?
which we see proof by looking to the inhabitants of any small spot, and
which would succeed in becoming naturalised in any land would generally
while South Africa abounds with them to an unparalleled degree. Why this
whole groups. For instance, whether or not there is an open passage from
whole the most abnormal in their teeth, but there are so many exceptions
whole world. Hence, we may look with some confidence to a secure future
who objects to an author speaking of the attraction of gravity as ruling
whose great kindness I am indebted for much information on the subject,
why domestic varieties have not become mutually infertile when crossed,
why, in many quarters of the world, hoofed quadrupeds have not acquired
why, on the other hand, new and peculiar species of bats, animals which
wide area, and then have become extinct in the intermediate tracts--the
wide gape of mouth. The short-faced tumbler has a beak in outline almost
widely and is very numerous, and why another allied species has a narrow
widely-different checks act on the same species in different districts.
widely different from all other mammals, but the tertiary Zeuglodon and
widely different from each other; whereas if two very distinct varieties
widely different places in the polity of nature: hence in the diagram I
widely sundered in the natural system. But this resemblance is confined
widely tend generally to spread VERY widely, consequently they will tend
wild species. From this fact we must conclude either that the aboriginal
will acknowledge that every organic being is constantly endeavouring to
will almost necessarily be confined to the earlier stages of the process
will be admitted that the production of races so different as short-horn
will be allied to each other in a widely different manner. Of the eight
will be with the northern hemisphere, while the southern passes through
will cause him no surprise that there should be geese and frigate-birds
will cease. Systematists will have only to decide (not that this will be
will give the observations which I made in some little detail. I opened
will have been possible during a very long period; and consequently the
will hereafter be briefly discussed. I will here only allude to what may
willing to admit that we know enough of the constitution of the universe
will laugh you to scorn. I have never met a pigeon, or poultry, or duck,
will not pretend to say; but conjointly they must limit in each country
will often be ranked by some authors as species. Look at the common oak,
will on this view have more or less perfectly obliterated its eyes, and
will retard the production of new species through natural selection, by
will say that the antennae in these two divisions of the same order are
will thus form two distinct families, or orders, according to the amount
wing of a bird and the membrane-covered wing of a bat; and still more so
wings, and legs; and its enormously developed crop, which it glories in
wings in nearly the same condition as the domestic Aylesbury duck: it is
wings, will be almost compelled to assume, in opposition to all analogy,
wings?" Yet these birds hold their place victoriously in the battle for
with a host of closely related or representative species; as we likewise
with a long lizard-like tail, bearing a pair of feathers on each joint,
with avicularia and vibracula, some with avicularia alone and a few with
with closely allied or representative species, evidently filling nearly
with confidence to the future, to young and rising naturalists, who will
with each stage beneficial to a changing species, will be favoured only
with illegitimate unions. It is well known that if pollen of a distinct
within a recent period than the islands separated by deeper channels, we
within sight of each other, having the same geological nature, the same
within the egg or seed produced by the mother, be exposed to conditions
within the egg or womb, structures which are of no service to it, either
within the same areas mean? He would be a bold man who, after comparing
within this chamber there are curious fleshy ridges. The most ingenious
with irregular teeth, and against these the terminal segment shuts down.
with its dissolved carbonic acid, and in colder countries to frost; the
with living creatures. Here we encounter a formidable objection; for it
 with modification--Classification of varieties--Descent always used in
with mongrels. Looking to the cases which I have collected of cross-bred
with more cases of difficulty; for he will encounter a greater number of
without being actually the same. Numerous instances could be given. The
without the end being known--for the young pointer can no more know that
with plants. Thus the main divisions of flowering plants are founded on
with rare exceptions, lays only one egg in a nest, so that the large and
With respect to plants, it has long been known what enormous ranges many
With respect to the apparently sudden extermination of whole families or
with respect to the singular fact that many terrestrial and fresh-water
with shorter legs, which more frequently attacks the shepherd's flocks.
with slow and slight successive modifications. The similarity of pattern
With species in a state of nature, every naturalist has in fact brought
with that of their illegitimate offspring, and we are led to extend the
with that of the Molothrus or cuckoo, I can see no difficulty in natural
with the basal edges of its six sides bevelled so as to join an inverted
with the Edentata of South America, still fewer genera and species will
with the former a long series of serviceable gradations still exists. In
With the giraffe, the continued preservation of the individuals of some
with their retention by inheritance of some characters in common, we can
with the Proteolepas: for the carapace in all other cirripedes consists
With these facts before me, I believe that natural selection, by acting
with this object and failed. The offspring from the first cross between
with those in France, although he finds in both a curious accordance in
woodpecker. Even in such trifling characters as the colouring, the harsh
words, which I wrote in 1859, about the existence of living beings long
work. At one end of a short series we have humble-bees, which use their
workers have been rendered sterile is a difficulty; but not much greater
workers of another caste, and they have an enormously developed abdomen
workers of the several sizes. Mr. Bates, in his interesting "Naturalist
working circularly as they deepen each cell. They do not make the whole
work on; not that mere individual differences are not amply sufficient,
works on natural history, rudimentary organs are generally said to have
world, for instance in South America, of naked metamorphic rocks, which
world. Hence an oceanic island at first sight seems to have been highly
World which cannot be paralleled in the New--at least so closely as the
worth noticing that in some cases of parthenogenesis, the embryos within
would already be largely preyed on by the reptiles or birds, which first
would be a million plants. The elephant is reckoned the slowest breeder
would be equally rash to suppose that it then became extinct. We forget
would be exposed to the attacks of somewhat different enemies. If, then,
would be if a directly opposite rule were to prevail when we go down one
would be of very high importance in classification. Nothing can be more
would be saved. Again, from the same cause, it would be advantageous to
would expect to raise a first-rate melting pear from the seed of a wild
would greatly lessen the chance of our being able to trace the stages of
would have formed a mamma. There is no more difficulty in understanding
would not receive colonists by similar means. Out of a hundred kinds of
would oftenest be visited by insects, and would oftenest be crossed; and
would possess webbed feet; that a thrush-like bird should dive and feed
would quickly become so inordinately great that no country could support
yards from a male tree, I put the stigmas of twenty flowers, taken from
years can hardly be considered as sufficient for the development of the
years, only these degraded flowers, departing so wonderfully in a number
yet are affected by the pollen of certain other species, for the germen
yet no one ox would ever have propagated its kind. Here is a better and
yielded many seeds; but the latter form did not yield a single seed when
yields a perfect gradation in the number of seeds produced, up to nearly
yield their places will commonly be allied, for they will partake of the
young of the tame rabbit; but I can hardly suppose that domestic rabbits
Zealand, South America, and the other southern lands, have been stocked
zebra-like bars, and its legs were feebly striped. All the stripes soon
zones; and likewise the close alliance of some of the inhabitants of the
zoologists. Several experienced ornithologists consider our British red
